JURASSIC PARK 
Michael Crichton 


"Reptiles are abhorrent because of their cold body, pale color, cartilaginous skeleton, filthy skin, 
fierce aspect, calculating eye, offensive smell, harsh voice, squalid habitation, and terrible 


venom; wherefore their Creator has not exerted his powers to make many of them." 


LINNAEUS, 1797 


"You cannot recall a new form of life." 


ERWIN CHARGAFF, 1972 
Introduction 
"The InGen Incident" 


The late twentieth century has witnessed a scientific gold rush of astonishing proportions: the 
headlong and furious haste to commercialize genetic engineering. This enterprise has proceeded 
so rapidly-with so little outside commentary-that its dimensions and implications are hardly 
understood at all. 

Biotechnology promises the greatest revolution in human history. By the end of this decade, it 
will have outdistanced atomic power and computers in its effect on our everyday lives. In the 
words of one observer, "Biotechnology is going to transform every aspect of human life: our 
medical care, our food, our health, our entertainment, our very bodies. Nothing will ever be the 
same again. It's literally going to change the face of the planet." 

But the biotechnology revolution differs in three important respects from past scientific 
transformations. 

First, it is broad-based. America entered the atomic age through the work of a single research 
institution, at Los Alamos. It entered the computer age through the efforts of about a dozen 
companies. But biotecbnology research is now carried out in more than two thousand 
laboratories in America alone. Five hundred corporations spend five billion dollars a year on this 
technology. 

Second, much of the research is thoughtless or frivolous. Efforts to engineer paler trout for 
better visibility in the stream, square trees for easier lumbering, and injectable scent cells so you'll 
always smell of your favorite perfume may seem like a joke, but they are not. Indeed, the fact that 
biotechnology can be applied to the industries traditionally subject to the vagaries of fashion, 
such as cosmetics and leisure activities, heightens concern about the whimsical use of this 
powerful new technology. 

Third, the work is uncontrolled. No one supervises it. No federal laws regulate it. There is no 
coherent government policy, in America or anywhere else in the world. And because the products 
of biotechnology range from drugs to farm crops to artificial snow, an intelligent policy is difficult. 

But most disturbing is the fact that no watchdogs are found among scientists themselves. It is 
remarkable that nearly every scientist in genetics research is also engaged in the commerce of 
biotechnology. There are no detached observers. Everybody has a stake. 


The commercialization of molecular biology is the most stunning ethical event in the history of 
science, and it has happened with astonishing speed. For four hundred years since Galileo, 
science has always proceeded as a free and open inquiry into the workings of nature. Scientists 
have always ignored national boundaries, holding themselves above the transitory concerns of 
politics and even wars. Scientists have always rebelled against secrecy in research, and have 
even frowned on the idea of patenting their discoveries, seeing themselves as working to the 
benefit of all mankind. And for many generations, the discoveries of scientists did indeed have a 
peculiarly selfless quality. 

When, in 1953, two young researchers in England, James Watson and Francis Crick, 
deciphered the structure of DNA, their work was bailed as a triumph of the human spirit, of the 
centuries-old quest to understand the universe in a scientific way. It was confidently expected 
that their discovery would be selflessly extended to the greater benefit of mankind. 

Yet that did not happen. Thirty years later, nearly all of Watson and Crick's scientific 
colleagues were engaged in another sort of enterprise entirely. Research in molecular genetics 
had become a vast, multibillion dollar commercial undertaking, and its origins can be traced not to 
1953 but to April 1976. 

That was the date of a now famous meeting, in which Robert Swanson, a venture capitalist, 
approached Herbert Boyer, a biochemist at the University of California. The two men agreed to 
found a commercial company to exploit Boyer's gene-splicing techniques. Their new company, 
Genentech, quickly became the largest and most successful of the genetic engineering start-ups. 


Suddenly it seemed as if everyone wanted to become rich. New companies were announced 
almost weekly, and scientists flocked to exploit genetic research. By 1986, at least 362 scientists, 
including 64 in the National Academy, sat on the advisory boards of biotech firms. The number of 
those who held equity positions or consultancies was several times greater. 

It is necessary to emphasize how significant this shift in attitude actually was. In the past, pure 
scientists took a snobbish view of business. They saw the pursuit of money as intellectually 
uninteresting, suited only to shopkeepers. And to do research for industry, even at the prestigious 
Bell or IBM labs, was only for those who couldn't get a university appointment. Thus the attitude of 
pure scientists was fundamentally critical toward the work of applied scientists, and to industry 
in general. Their long-standing antagonism kept university scientists free of contaminating 
industry ties, and whenever debate arose about technological matters, disinterested scientists 
were available to discuss the issues at the highest levels. 

But that is no longer true. There are very few molecular biologists and very few research 
institutions without commercial affiliations. The old days are gone. Genetic research continues, at a 
more furious pace than ever. But it is done in secret, and in haste, and for profit. 


In this commercial climate, it is probably inevitable that a company as ambitious as International 
Genetic Technologies, Inc., of Palo Alto, would arise. It is equally unsurprising that the genetic 
crisis it created should go unreported. After all, InGen's research was conducted in secret; the 
actual incident occurred in the most remote region of Central America; and fewer than twenty 
people were there to witness it. Of those, only a handful survived. 

Even at the end, when International Genetic Technologies filed for Chapter 11 protection in 
San Francisco Superior Court on October 5, 1989, the proceedings drew little press attention. It 
appeared so ordinary: InGen was the third small American bioengineering company to fail that 
year, and the seventh since 1986. Few court documents were made public, since the creditors 
were Japanese investment consortia, such as Hamaguri and Densaka, companies which 
traditionally shun publicity. To avoid unnecessary disclosure, Daniel Ross, of Cowan, Swain and 
Ross, counsel for InGen, also represented the Japanese investors. And the rather unusual 
petition of the vice consul of Costa Rica was heard behind closed doors. Thus it is not surprising 
that, within a month, the problems of InGen were quietly and amicably settled. 

Parties to that settlement, including the distinguished scientific board of advisers, signed a 
nondisclosure agreement, and none will speak about what happened-but many of the principal 
figures in the "InGen incident" are not signatories, and were willing to discuss the remarkable 
events leading up to those final two days in August 1989 on a remote island off the west coast of 
Costa Rica. 


JURASSIC PARK 
Prologue: 
The Bite of the Raptor 


The tropical rain fell in drenching sheets, hammering the corrugated roof of the clinic building, 
roaring down the metal gutters, splashing on the ground in a torrent. Roberta Carter sighed, and 
stared out the window. From the clinic, she could hardly see the beach or the ocean beyond, 
cloaked in low fog. This wasn't what she had expected when she had come to the fishing village of 
Bahja Anasco, on the west coast of Costa Rica, to spend two months as a visiting physician. 
Bobbie Carter had expected sun and relaxation, after two grueling years of residency in 
emergency medicine at Michael Reese in Chicago. 

She had been in Bahja Anasco now for three weeks. And it had rained every day. 

Everything else was fine. She liked the isolation of Bahja Anasco, and the friendliness of its 
people. Costa Rica had one of the twenty best medical systems in the world, and even in this 
remote coastal village, the clinic was well maintained, amply supplied. Her paramedic, Manuel 
Arag6n, was intelligent and well trained. Bobbie was able to practice a level of medicine equal to 
what she had practiced in Chicago. 

But the rain! The constant, unending rain! 


Across the examining room, Manuel cocked his head. "Listen," he said. 

"Believe me, | hear it," Bobbie said. 

"No. Listen." 

And then she caught it, another sound blended with the rain, a deeper rumble that built and 
emerged until it was clear: the rhythmic thumping of a helicopter. She thought, They can't be 
flying in weather like this. 

But the sound built steadily, and then the helicopter burst low through the ocean fog and 
roared overhead, circled, and came back. She saw the helicopter swing back over the water, 
near the fishing boats, then case sideways to the rickety wooden dock, and back toward the 
beach. 

It was looking for a place to land. 

It was a big-bellied Sikorsky with a blue stripe on the side, with the words "InGen 
Construction." That was the name of the construction company building a new resort on one of 
the offshore islands. The resort was said to be spectacular, and very complicated; many of the 
local people were employed in the construction, which had been going on for more than two 
years. Bobbie could imagine it-one of those huge American resorts with swimming pools and 
tennis courts, where guests could play and drink their daiquiris without having any contact with 
the real life of the country. 

Bobbie wondered what was so urgent on that island that the helicopter would fly in this 
weather. Through the windshield she saw the pilot exhale in relief as the helicopter settled onto 
the wet sand of the beach. Uniformed men jumped out, and flung open the big side door. She 
heard frantic shouts in Spanish, and Manuel nudged her. 

They were calling for a doctor. 


Two black crewmen carried a limp body toward her, while a white man barked orders. The white 
man had a yellow slicker. Red hair appeared around the edges of his Mets baseball cap. "Is there a 
doctor here?" he called to her, as she ran up. 

"I'm Dr. Carter," she said. The rain fell in heavy drops, pounding her head and shoulders. The 
red-halted man frowned at her. She was wearing cut-off jeans and a tank top. She had a 
stethoscope over her shoulder, the bell already rusted from the salt air. 

"Ed Regis. We've got a very sick man here, doctor." 

"Then you better take him to San Jos,," she said. San Jos, was the capital, just twenty minutes 
away by air. 

"We would, but we can't get over the mountains in this weather. You have to treat him here." 

Bobbie trotted alongside the injured man as they carried him to the clinic. He was a kid, no 
older than eighteen. Lifting away the blood-soaked shirt, she saw a big slashing rip along his 
shoulder, and another on the leg. 

"What happened to him?" 

"Construction accident," Ed shouted. "He fell. One of the backhoes ran over him." 

The kid was pale, shivering, unconscious. 

Manuel stood by the bright green door of the clinic, waving his arm. The men brought the body 
through and set it on the table in the center of the room. Manuel started an intravenous line, and 
Bobbie swung the light over the kid and bent to examine the wounds. Immediately she could see 
that it did not look good. The kid would almost certainly die. 

A big tearing laceration ran from his shoulder down his torso. At the edge of the wound, the 
flesh was shredded. At the center, the shoulder was dislocated, pale bones exposed. A second 
slash cut through the heavy muscles of the thigh, deep enough to reveal the pulse of the femoral 
artery below. Her first impression was that his leg had been ripped open. 

"Tell me again about this injury," she said. 

"| didn't see it," Ed said. "They say the backhoe dragged him." 

"Because it almost looks as if he was mauled," Bobbie Carter said, probing the wound. Like 
most emergency room physicians, she could remember in detail patients she had seen even 
years before. She had seen two maulings. One was a two-year-old child who had been attacked 
by a Rottweiler dog. The other was a drunken circus attendant who had had an encounter with a 
Bengal tiger. Both injuries were similar. There was a characteristic look to an animal attack. 


"Mauled?" Ed said. "No, no. It was a backhoe, believe me." Ed licked his lips as he spoke. He 
was edgy, acting as if he had done something wrong. Bobbie wondered why. If they were using 
inexperienced local workmen on the resort construction, they must have accidents all the time. 

Manuel said, "Do you want lavage?" 

"Yes," she said. "After you block him." 

She bent lower, probed the wound with her fingertips. If an earth mover had rolled over him, 
dirt would be forced deep into the wound. But there wasn't any dirt, just a slippery, slimy foam. 
And the wound had a strange odor, a kind of rotten stench, a smell of death and decay. She had 
never smelled anything like it before. 

"How long ago did this happen?" 

"An hour." 

Again she noticed how tense Ed Regis was. He was one of those eager, nervous types. And 
he didn't look like a construction foreman. More like an executive. He was obviously out of his 
depth. 

Bobbie Carter turned back to the injuries. Somehow she didn't think she was seeing 
mechanical trauma. It just didn't look right. No soil contamination of the wound site, and no crush- 
injury component. Mechanical trauma of any sort-an auto injury, a factory accident-almost always 
had some component of crushing. But here there was none. Instead, the man's skin was 
shredded -ripped-across his shoulder, and again across his thigh. 

It really did look like a maul. On the other hand, most of the body was unmarked, which was 
unusual for an animal attack. She looked again at the head, the arms, the hands - 

The hands. 

She felt a chill when she looked at the kid's bands. There were short slashing cuts on both 
palms, and bruises on the wrists and forearms. She had worked in Chicago long enough to know 
what that meant. 

"All right," she said. "Wait outside." 

"Why?" Ed said, alarmed. He didn't like that. 

"Do you want me to help him, or not?" she said, and pushed him out the door and closed it on 
his face. She didn't know what was going on, but she didn't like it. Manuel hesitated. "| continue 
to wash?" 

"Yes," she said. She reached for her little Olympus point-and-shoot. She took several 
snapshots of the injury, shifting her light for a better view. It really did look like bites, she thought. 
Then the kid groaned, and she put her camera aside and bent toward him. His lips moved, his 
tongue thick. 

"Raptor," he said. "Lo sa raptor..." 

At those words, Manuel froze, stepped back in horror. 

"What does it mean?" Bobbie said. 

Manuel shook his head. "I do not know, doctor. 'Lo sa raptor'-no es espaxol " 

"No?" It sounded to her like Spanish. "Then please continue to wash him." 

"No, doctor." He wrinkled his nose. "Bad smell." And he crossed himself. 

Bobbie looked again at the slippery foam streaked across the wound. She touched it, rubbing it 
between her fingers. It seemed almost like saliva. .. . 

The injured boy's lips moved. "Raptor," he whispered. 

In a tone of horror, Manuel said, "It bit him." 

"What bit him?" 

"Raptor." 

"What's a raptor?" "It 

means hupia." 

Bobbie frowned. The Costa Ricans were not especially superstitious, but she had heard the 
hupia mentioned in the village before. They were said to be night ghosts, faceless vampires who 
kidnapped small children. According to the belief, the hupia had once lived in the mountains of 
Costa Rica, but now inhabited the islands offshore. 

Manuel was backing away, murmuring and crossing himself. "It is not normal, this smell," he 
said. "It is the hupia." 

Bobbie was about to order him back to work when the injured youth opened his eyes and sat 
straight up on the table. Manuel shrieked in terror. The injured boy moaned and twisted his head, 


looking left and right with wide staring eyes, and then he explosively vomited blood. He went 
immediately into convulsions, his body vibrating, and Bobbie grabbed for him but he shuddered 
off the table onto the concrete floor. He vomited again. There was blood everywhere. Ed opened 
the door, saying, "What the hell's happening?" and when he saw the blood he turned away, his 
hand to his mouth. Bobbie was grabbing for a stick to put in the boy's clenched jaws, but even as 
she did it she knew it was hopeless, and with a final spastic jerk he relaxed and lay still. 

She bent to perform mouth-to-mouth, but Manuel grabbed her shoulder fiercely, pulling her 
back. "No," he said. "The hupia will cross over." 

"Manuel, for God's sake-" 

"No." He stared at her fiercely. "No. You do not understand these things." 

Bobbie looked at the body on the ground and realized that it didn't matter; there was no 
possibility of resuscitating him. Manuel called for the men, who came back into the room and took 
the body away. Ed appeared, wiping his mouth with the back of his hand, muttering, "I'm sure you 
did all you could," and then she watched as the men took the body away, back to the helicopter, 
and it lifted thunderously up into the sky. 

"It is better," Manuel said. 

Bobbie was thinking about the boy's hands. They had been covered with cuts and bruises, in 
the characteristic pattern of defense wounds. She was quite sure he had not died in a 
construction accident; he had been attacked, and he had held up his bands against his attacker. 
"Where is this island they've come from?" she asked. 

"In the ocean. Perhaps a hundred, hundred and twenty miles offshore," "Pretty far for a resort," 
she said. 

Manuel watched the helicopter. "I hope they never come back." 

Well, she thought, at least she had pictures. But when she turned back to the table, she saw 
that her camera was gone. 


The rain finally stopped later that night. Alone in the bedroom behind the clinic, Bobbie thumbed 
through her tattered paperback Spanish dictionary. The boy had said "raptor," and, despite 
Manuel's protests, she suspected it was a Spanish word. Sure enough, she found it in her 
dictionary. It meant "ravisher" or "abductor." 

That gave her pause. The sense of the word was suspiciously close to the meaning of hupia. 
Of course she did not believe in the superstition. And no ghost had cut those hands. What had 
the boy been trying to tell her? 

From the next room, she heard groans. One of the village women was in the first stage of 
labor, and Elena Morales, the local midwife, was attending her. Bobbie went into the clinic room 
and gestured to Elena to step outside for a moment. 

"Elena..." 

"Sj, doctor?" 

"Do you know what is a raptor?" 

Elena was gray-haired and sixty, a strong woman with a practical, no-nonsense air. In the 
night, beneath the stars, she frowned and said, "Raptor?" 

"Yes, You know this word?" 

" Sj." Elena nodded. "It means . . . a person who comes in the night and takes away a child." 

"A kidnapper?" 

"Yes." 

"A hupia?" 

Her whole manner changed. "Do not say this word, doctor." 

"Why not?" 

"Do not speak of hupia now,” Elena said firmly, nodding her head toward the groans of the 
laboring woman. "It is not wise to say this word now. 

"But does a raptor bite and cut his victims?" 

"Bite and cut?" Elena said, puzzled. "No, doctor. Nothing like this. A raptor is a man who takes 
a new baby." She seemed irritated by the conversation, impatient to end it. Elena started back 
toward the clinic. "I will call to you when she is ready, doctor. | think one hour more, perhaps two." 


Bobbie looked at the stars, and listened to the peaceful lapping of the surf at the shore. In the 
darkness she saw the shadows of the fishing boats anchored offshore. The whole scene was 
quiet, so normal, she felt foolish to be talking of vampires and kidnapped babies. 

Bobbie went back to her room, remembering again that Manuel had insisted it was not a 
Spanish word. Out of curiosity, she looked in the little English dictionary, and to her surprise she 
found the word there, too: 


raptor \ n [deriv. of L. raptor plunderer, fr. Raptus]: bird of prey. 


FIRST ITERATION 


"At the earliest drawings of the fractal curve, few clues to the 
underlying mathematical structre will be seen." 


IAN MALCOLM 
Almost 
Paradise 


Mike Bowman whistled cheerfully as he drove the Land Rover through the Cabo Blanco 
Biological Reserve, on the west coast of Costa Rica. It was a beautiful morning in July, and the 
road before him was spectacular: hugging the edge of a cliff, overlooking the jungle and the blue 
Pacific. According to the guidebooks, Cabo Blanco was unspoiled wilderness, almost a paradise. 
Seeing it now made Bowman feel as if the vacation was back on track. 

Bowman, a thirty-six-year-old real estate developer from Dallas, had come to Costa Rica with 
his wife and daughter for a two-week holiday. The trip had actually been his wife's idea; for weeks 
Ellen had filled his ear about the wonderful national parks of Costa Rica, and how good it would 
be for Tina to see them. Then, when they arrived, it turned out Ellen had an appointment to see a 
plastic surgeon in San Jos,. That was the first Mike Bowman had heard about the excellent and 
inexpensive plastic surgery available in Costa Rica, and all the luxurious private clinics in San 


Of course they'd had a huge fight, Mike felt she'd lied to him, and she had. And he put his foot 
down about this plastic surgery business. Anyway, it was ridiculous, Ellen was only thirty, and 
she was a beautiful woman. Hell, she'd been Homecoming Queen her senior year at Rice, and 
that was not even ten years earlier. But Ellen tended to be insecure, and worried. And it seemed 
as if in recent years she had mostly worried about losing her looks. 

That, and everything else. 

The Land Rover bounced in a pothole, splashing mud. Seated beside him, Ellen said, "Mike, 
are you sure this is the right road? We haven't seen any other people for hours." 

"There was another car fifteen minutes ago,” he reminded her. "Remember, the blue one?" 

"Going the other way .. ." 


"Darling, you wanted a deserted beach," he said, "and that's what you're going to get." 

Ellen shook her head doubtfully. "| hope you're right." 

"Yeah, Dad, | hope you're right," said Christina, from the back seat. She was eight years old. 

"Trust me, I'm right." He drove in silence a moment. "It's beautiful, isn't it? Look at that view. It's 
beautiful.” 

"It's okay," Tina said. 

Ellen got out a compact and looked at herself in the mirror, pressing under her eyes. She 
sighed, and put the compact away. 

The road began to descend, and Mike Bowman concentrated on driving. Suddenly a small 
black shape flashed across the road and Tina shrieked, "Look! Look!" Then it was gone, into the 
jungle. 

"What was it?" Ellen asked. "A monkey?" 

"Maybe a squirrel monkey," Bowman said. 

"Can | count it?" Tina said, taking her pencil out, She was keeping a list of all the animals she 
had seen on her trip, as a project for school. 

"| don't know," Mike said doubifully. 

Tina consulted the pictures in the guidebook. "| don't think it was a squirrel monkey," she said. 
"| think it was just another howler." They had seen several howler monkeys already on their trip, 

"Hey," she said, more brightly. "According to this book, ‘the beaches of Cabo Blanco are 
frequented by a variety of wildlife, including howler and white-faced monkeys, three-toed sloths, 
and coatimundis.' You think we'll see a three-toed sloth, Dad?" 

"| bet we do." 

"Really?" 

"Just look in the mirror." 

"Very funny, Dad." 

The road sloped downward through the jungle, toward the ocean. 


Mike Bowman felt like a hero when they finally reached the beach: a two-mile crescent of white 
sand, utterly deserted. He parked the Land Rover in the shade of the palm trees that fringed the 
beach, and got out the box lunches. Ellen changed into her bathing suit, saying, "Honestly, | don't 
know how I'm going to get this weight off." 

"You look great, hon." Actually, he felt that she was too thin, but he had learned not to mention 
that. 

Tina was already running down the beach. 

"Don't forget you need your sunscreen," Ellen called. 

"Later," Tina shouted, over her shoulder. "I'm going to see if there's a sloth. 

Ellen Bowman looked around at the beach, and the trees. "You think she's all right?" 

"Honey, there's nobody here for miles," Mike said. 

"What about snakes?" 

"Oh, for God's sake," Mike Bowman said. "There's no snakes on a beach." 

"Well, there might be. . . .” 

"Honey," he said firmly. "Snakes are cold-blooded. They're reptiles. They can't control their 
body temperature. It's ninety degrees on that sand. If a snake came out, it'd be cooked. Believe 
me. There's no snakes on the beach." He watched his daughter scampering down the beach, a 
dark spot on the white sand. "Let her go. Let her have a good time." 

He put his arm around his wife's waist. 


Tina ran until she was exhausted, and then she threw herself down on the sand and gleefully 
rolled to the water's edge. The ocean was warm, and there was hardly any surf at all. She sat for 
a while, catching her breath, and then she looked back toward her parents and the car, to see 
how far she had come. 

Her mother waved, beckoning her to return. Tina waved back cheerfully, pretending she didn't 
understand. Tina didn't want to put sunscreen on. And she didn't want to go back and hear her 
mother talk about losing weight. She wanted to stay right here, and maybe see a sloth. 

Tina had seen a sloth two days earlier at the zoo in San Jos,. It looked like a Muppets 
character, and it seemed harmless. In any case, it couldn't move fast; she could easily outrun it. 


Now her mother was calling to her, and Tina decided to move out of the sun, back from the 
water, to the shade of the palm trees. In this part of the beach, the palm trees overhung a gnarled 
tangle of mangrove roots, which blocked any attempt to penetrate inland. Tina sat in the sand 
and kicked the dried mangrove leaves. She noticed many bird tracks in the sand. Costa Rica was 
famous for its birds. The guidebooks said there were three times as many birds in Costa Rica as in 
all of America and Canada. 

In the sand, some of the three-toed bird tracks were small, and so faint they could hardly be 
seen. Other tracks were large, and cut deeper in the sand. Tina was looking idly at the tracks 
when she heard a chirping, followed by a rustling in the mangrove thicket. 

Did sloths make a chirping sound? Tina didn't think so, but she wasn't sure. The chirping was 
probably some ocean bird. She waited quietly, not moving, hearing the rustling again, and finally 
she saw the source of the sounds, A few yards away, a lizard emerged from the mangrove roots 
and peered at her. 

Tina held her breath. A new animal for her list! The lizard stood up on its hind legs, balancing 
on its thick tail, and stared at her. Standing like that, it was almost a foot tall, dark green with 
brown stripes along its back. Its tiny front legs ended in little lizard fingers that wiggled in the air. 
The lizard cocked its head as it looked at her. 

Tina thought it was cute. Sort of like a big salamander. She raised her hand and wiggled her 
fingers back. 

The lizard wasn't frightened. It came toward her, walking upright on its hind legs. It was hardly 
bigger than a chicken, and like a chicken it bobbed its head as it walked. Tina thought it would 
make a wonderful pet. 

She noticed that the lizard left three-toed tracks that looked exactly like bird tracks. The lizard 
came closer to Tina. She kept her body still, not wanting to frighten the little animal. She was 
amazed that it would come so close, but she remembered that this was a national park. All the 
animals in the park would know that they were protected. This lizard was probably tame. Maybe it 
even expected her to give it some food. Unfortunately she didn't have any. Slowly, Tina extended 
her hand, palm open, to show she didn't have any food. 

The lizard paused, cocked his head, and chirped. 

"Sorry," Tina said. "I just don't have anything." 

And then, without warning, the lizard jumped up onto her outstretched hand. Tina could feel its 
little toes pinching the skin of her palm, and she felt the surprising weight of the animal's body 
pressing her arm down. 

And then the lizard scrambled up her arm, toward her face. 


"| just wish | could see her," Ellen Bowman said, squinting in the sunlight. "That's all. Just see 
her." 

"I'm sure she's fine," Mike said, picking through the box lunch packed by the hotel. There was 
unappetizing grilled chicken, and some kind of a meat-filled pastry. Not that Ellen would cat any of 
it. 

"You don't think she'd leave the beach?" Ellen said. 

"No, hon, | don't." 

"| feel so isolated here," Ellen said. 

"| thought that's what you wanted," Mike Bowman said. 

"| did." 

"Well, then, what's the problem?" 

"| just wish | could see her, is all," Ellen said. 

Then, from down the beach, carried by the wind, they heard their daughter's voice. She was 
screaming. 


Puntarenas 
"I think she is quite comfortable now," Dr. Cruz said, lowering the plastic flap of the oxygen tent 


around Tina as she slept. Mike Bowman sat beside the bed, close to his daughter. Mike thought 
Dr. Cruz was probably pretty capable; he spoke excellent English, the result of training at medical 


centers In London and Baltimore. Dr. Cruz radiated competence, and the Cljnica Santa Marja, 
the modern hospital in Puntarenas, was spotless and efficient. 

But, even so, Mike Bowman felt nervous. There was no getting around the fact that his only 
daughter was desperately ill, and they were far from home. 

When Mike had first reached Tina, she was screaming hysterically. Her whole left arm was 
bloody, covered with a profusion of small bites, each the size of a thumbprint. And there were 
flecks of sticky foam on her arm, like a foamy saliva. 

He carried her back down the beach. Almost immediately her arm began to redden and swell. 
Mike would not soon forget the frantic drive back to civilization, the four-wheel-drive Land Rover 
slipping and sliding up the muddy track into the hills, while his daughter screamed in fear and 
pain, and her arm grew more bloated and red. Long before they reached the park boundaries, the 
swelling had spread to her neck, and then Tina began to have trouble breathing. . . . 

"She'll be all right now?" Ellen said, staring through the plastic oxygen tent. 

"| believe so," Dr. Cruz said. "| have given her another dose of steroids, and her breathing is 
much easier. And you can see the edema in her arm is greatly reduced." 

Mike Bowman said, "About those bites. . ." 

"We have no identification yet," the doctor said. "| myself haven't seen bites like that before. 
But you'll notice they are disappearing. It's already quite difficult to make them out. Fortunately | 
have taken photographs for reference. And | have washed her arm to collect some samples of 
the sticky saliva-one for analysis here, a second to send to the labs in San Jos,, and the third we 
will keep frozen in case it is needed. Do you have the picture she made?" 

"Yes," Mike Bowman said. He handed the doctor the sketch that Tina had drawn, in response 
to questions from the admitting officials. 

"This is the animal that bit her?" Dr. Cruz said, looking at the picture. 

"Yes," Mike Bowman said. "She said it was a green lizard, the size of a chicken or a crow." 

"| don't know of such a lizard," the doctor said. "She has drawn it standing on its hind legs. . . ." 

"That's right," Mike Bowman said. "She said it walked on its hind legs." 

Dr. Cruz frowned. He stared at the picture a while longer. "| am not an expert. I've asked for Dr. 
Guitierrez to visit us here. He is a senior researcher at the Reserva Biol¢gica de Carara, which is 
across the bay. Perhaps he can identify the animal for us." 

"Isn't there someone from Cabo Blanco?" Bowman asked. "That's where she was bitten." 

"Unfortunately not," Dr. Cruz said. "Cabo Blanco has no permanent staff, and no researcher 
has worked there for some time. You were probably the first people to walk on that beach in 
several months. But | am sure you will find Dr. Guitierrez to be knowledgeable." 

Dr. Guitierrez turned out to be a bearded man wearing khaki shorts and shirt. The surprise was 
that he was American. He was introduced to the Bowmans, saying in a soft Southern accent, "Mr. 
and Mrs. Bowman, how you doing, nice to meet you," and then explaining that he was a field 
biologist from Yale who had worked in Costa Rica for the last five years. Marty Guitierrez 
examined Tina thoroughly, lifting her arm gently, peering closely at each of the bites with a 
penlight, then measuring them with a small pocket ruler. After a while, Guitierrez stepped away, 
nodding to himself as if he had understood something. He then inspected the Polaroids, and 
asked several questions about the saliva, which Cruz told him was still being tested in the lab. 

Finally he turned to Mike Bowman and his wife, waiting tensely. "I think Tina's going to be fine. 
| just want to be clear about a few details," he said, making notes in a precise band. "Your 
daughter says she was bitten by a green lizard, approximately one foot high, which walked 
upright onto the beach from the mangrove swamp?" 

"That's right, yes." 

"And the lizard made some kind of a vocalization?" 

"Tina said it chirped, or squeaked." 

"Like a mouse, would you say?" 

"Yes." 

"Well, then,” Dr. Guitierrez said, "| know this lizard." He explained that, of the six thousand 
species of lizards in the world, no more than a dozen species walked upright. Of those species, 
only four were found in Latin America. And judging by the coloration, the lizard could be only one 
of the four. "| am sure this lizard was a Basiliscus amoratus, a striped basilisk lizard, found here 


in Costa Rica and also in Honduras. Standing on their hind legs, they are sometimes as tall as a 
foot." 

"Are they poisonous?" 

"No, Mrs. Bowman. Not at all." Guitierrez explained that the swelling in Tina's arm was an 
allergic reaction. "According to the literature, fourteen percent of people are strongly allergic to 
reptiles," he said, "and your daughter seems to be one of them." 

"She was screaming, she said it was so painful." 

"Probably it was," Guitierrez said. "Reptile saliva contains serotonin, which causes tremendous 
pain." He turned to Cruz. "Her blood pressure came down with antihistamines?" 

"Yes," Cruz said. "Promptly." 

"Serotonin," Guitierrez said. "No question." 

Still, Ellen Bowman remained uneasy. "But why would a lizard bite her in the first place?" 

"Lizard bites are very common," Guitierrez said. "Animal handlers in zoos get bitten all the 
time. And just the other day | heard that a lizard had bitten an infant in her Crib in Amaloya, about 
sixty miles from where you were. So bites do occur. I'm not sure why your daughter had so many 
bites. What was she doing at the time?" 

"Nothing. She said she was sitting pretty still, because she didn't want to frighten it away." 

"Sitting pretty still," Guitierrez said, frowning. He shook his head. "Well. | don't think we can say 
exactly what happened. Wild animals are unpredictable." 

"And what about the foamy saliva on her arm?" Ellen said. "| keep thinking about rabies. . . ." 

"No, no," Dr. Guitierrez said. "A reptile can't carry rabies, Mrs. Bowman. Your daughter has 
suffered an allergic reaction to the bite of a basilisk lizard. Nothing more serious." 

Mike Bowman then showed Guitierrez the picture that Tina had drawn. Guitierrez nodded. "I 
would accept this as a picture of a basillsk lizard," he said. "A few details are wrong, of course. 
The neck is much too long, and she has drawn the hind legs with only three toes instead of five. 
The tall is too thick, and raised too high. But otherwise this is a perfectly serviceable lizard of the 
kind we are talking about." 

"But Tina specifically said the neck was long," Ellen Bowman insisted. "And she said there 
were three toes on the foot." 

"Tina's pretty observant," Mike Bowman said. 

"I'm sure she is," Guitierrez said, smiling. "But | still think your daughter was bitten by a 
common basilisk amoratus, and had a severe herpetological reaction. Normal time course with 
medication is twelve hours. She should be just fine in the morning." 


In the modern laboratory in the basement of the Cljnica Santa Maria, word was received that Dr. 
Guitierrez had identified the animal that had bitten the American child as a harmless basilisk 
lizard. Immediately the analysis of the saliva was halted, even though a preliminary fractionation 
showed several extremely high molecular weight proteins of unknown biological activity. But the 
night technician was busy, and he placed the saliva samples on the holding shelf of the 
refrigerator. 

The next morning, the day clerk checked the holding shelf against the names of discharged 
patients. Seeing that BOWMAN, CHRISTINA L. was scheduled for discharge that morning, the 
clerk threw out the saliva samples. At the last moment, he noticed that one sample had the red 
tag which meant that it was to be forwarded to the university lab in San Jos,. He retrieved the test 
tube from the wastebasket, and sent it on its way. 


"Go on. Say thank you to Dr. Cruz," Ellen Bowman said, and pushed Tina forward. 

"Thank you, Dr. Cruz," Tina said. "I feel much better now." She reached up and shook the 
doctor's band. Then she said, "You have a different shirt." 

For a moment Dr. Cruz looked perplexed; then he smiled. "That's right, Tina. When | work all 
night at the hospital, in the morning | change my shirt." 

"But not your tie?" "No. 

Just my shirt." 

Ellen Bowman said, "Mike told you she's observant." 

"She certainly is." Dr. Cruz smiled and shook the little girl's band gravely. "Enjoy the rest of 
your holiday in Costa Rica, Tina." 


"I will." 

The Bowman family had started to leave when Dr. Cruz said, "Ob, Tina, do you remember the 
lizard that bit you?" 

"Uh-huh." 

"You remember its feet?" 

"Uh-huh." 

"Did it have any toes?" 

"Yes." 

"How many toes did it have?" 

"Three," she said. 

"How do you know that?" 

"Because | looked," she said. "Anyway, all the birds on the beach made marks in the sand with 
three toes, like this." She held up her hand, middle three fingers spread wide. "And the lizard 
made those kind of marks in the sand, too." 

"The lizard made marks like a bird?" 

"Uh-huh," Tina said. "He walked like a bird, too. He jerked his head like this, up and down." 
She took a few steps, bobbing her head. 

After the Bowmans had departed, Dr. Cruz decided to report this conversation to Guitierrez, at 
the biological station. 

"| must admit the girl's story is puzzling," Guitierrez said. "| have been doing some checking 
myself. | am no longer certain she was bitten by a basilisk. Not certain at all." 

"Then what could it be?" 

"Well," Guitierrez said, "let's not speculate prematurely. By the way, have you heard of any 
other lizard bites at the hospital?" 

"No, why?" 

"Let me know, my friend, if you do." 


The Beach 


Marty Guitierrez sat on the beach and watched the afternoon sun fall lower in the sky, until it 
sparkled harshly on the water of the bay, and its rays reached beneath the palm trees, to where 
he sat among the mangroves, on the beach of Cabo Blanco. As best he could determine, he was 
sitting near the spot where the American girl had been, two days before. 

Although it was true enough, as he had told the Bowmans, that lizard bites were common, 
Guitierrez had never heard of a basilisk lizard biting anyone. And he had certainly never heard of 
anyone being hospitalized for a lizard bite. Then, too, the bite radius on Tina's arm appeared 
slightly too large for a basilisk. When he got back to the Carara station, he had checked the small 
research library there, but found no reference to basilisk lizard bites. Next he checked 
International BioSciences Services, a computer database in America, But he found no references 
to basilisk bites, or hospitalization for lizard bites. 

He then called the medical officer in Amaloya, who confirmed that a nine-day-old infant, 
sleeping in its crib, had been bitten on the foot by an animal the grandmother-the only person 
actually to see it-claimed was a lizard. Subsequently the foot had become swollen and the infant 
had nearly died. The grandmother described the lizard as green with brown stripes. It had bitten 
the child several times before the woman frightened it away. 

"Strange," Guitierrez had said. 

"No, like all the others," the medical officer replied, adding that he had heard of other biting 
incidents: A child in V squez, the next village up the coast, had been bitten while sleeping. And 
another in Puerta Sotrero. All these incidents had occurred in the last two months. All had 
involved sleeping children and infants. 

Such a new and distinctive pattern led Guitierrez to suspect the presence of a previously 
unknown species of lizard. This was particularly likely to happen in Costa Rica. Only seventy-five 
miles wide at its narrowest point, the country was smaller than the state of Maine. Yet, within its 
limited space, Costa Rica had a remarkable diversity of biological habitats: seacoasts on both the 
Atlantic and the Pacific; four separate mountain ranges, including twelve-thousand-foot peaks 
and active volcanoes; rain forests, cloud forests, temperate zones, swampy marshes, and arid 


deserts. Such ecological diversity sustained an astonishing diversity of plant and animal life. 
Costa Rica had three times as many species of birds as all of North America. More than a 
thousand species of orchids. More than five thousand species of insects. 

New species were being discovered all the time at a pace that had increased in recent years, 
for a sad reason. Costa Rica was becoming deforested, and as jungle species lost their habitats, 
they moved to other areas, and sometimes changed behavior as well. 

So a new species was perfectly possible. But along with the excitement of a new species was 
the worrisome possibility of new diseases. Lizards carried viral diseases, including several that 
could be transmitted to man. The most serious was central saurian encephalitis, or CSE, which 
caused a form of sleeping sickness in human beings and horses. Guitierrez felt it was important 
to find this new lizard, if only to test it for disease. 

Sitting on the beach, he watched the sun drop lower, and sighed. Perhaps Tina Bowman had 
seen a new animal, and perhaps not. Certainly Guitierrez had not. Earlier that morning, he had 
taken the air pistol, loaded the clip with ligamine darts, and set out for the beach with high hopes. 
But the day was wasted. Soon he would have to begin the drive back up the hill from the beach; 
he did not want to drive that road in darkness. 

Guitierrez got to his feet and started back up the beach. Farther along, he saw the dark shape 
of a howler monkey, ambling along the edge of the mangrove swamp. Guitierrez moved away, 
stepping out toward the water. If there was one howler, there would probably be others in the 
trees overhead, arid howlers tended to urinate on intruders. 

But this particular howler monkey seemed to be alone, and walking slowly, and pausing 
frequently to sit on its haunches. The monkey had something in its mouth. As Guitierrez came 
closer, he saw it was eating a lizard. The tail and the hind legs drooped from the monkey's jaws. 
Even from a distance, Guitierrez could see the brown stripes against the green. 

Guitierrez dropped to the ground and aimed the pistol. The howler monkey, accustomed to 
living in a protected reserve, stared curiously. He did not run away, even when the first dart 
whined harmlessly past him. When the second dart struck deep in the thigh, the howler shrieked in 
anger and surprise, dropping the remains of its meal as it fled into the jungle. 

Guitierrez got to his feet and walked forward. He wasn't worried about the monkey; the 
tranquilizer dose was too small to give it anything but a few minutes of dizziness. Already he was 
thinking of what to do with his new find. Guitierrez himself would write the preliminary report, but 
the remains would have to be sent back to the United States for final positive identification, of 
course. To whom should he send it? The acknowledged expert was Edward H. Simpson, 
emeritus professor of zoology at Columbia University, in New York. An elegant older man with 
swept-back white hair, Simpson was the world's leading authority on lizard taxonomy. Probably, 
Marty thought, he would send his lizard to Dr. Simpson. 


New York 


Dr. Richard Stone, head of the Tropical Diseases Laboratory of Columbia University Medical 
Center, often remarked that the name conjured up a grander place than it actually was. In the 
early twentieth century, when the laboratory occupied the entire fourth floor of the Biomedical 
Research Building, crews of technicians worked to eliminate the scourges of yellow fever, 
malaria, and cholera. But medical successes-and research laboratories in Nairobi and Sao 
Paulo-had left the TDL a much less important place than it once was. Now a fraction of its former 
size, it employed only two full-time technicians, and they were primarily concerned with 
diagnosing illnesses of New Yorkers who had traveled abroad. The lab's comfortable routine was 
unprepared for what it received that morning. 

"Oh, very nice," the technician in the Tropical Diseases Laboratory said, as she read the 
customs label. "Partially masticated fragment of unidentified Costa Rican lizard." She wrinkled 
her nose. "This one's all yours, Dr. Stone." 

Richard Stone crossed the lab to inspect the new arrival. "Is this the material from Ed 
Simpson's lab?" 

"Yes," she said. "But | don't know why they'd send a lizard to us. 


"His secretary called," Stone said. "Simpson's on a field trip in Borneo for the summer, and 
because there's a question of communicable disease with this lizard, she asked our lab to take a 
took at it. Let's see what we've got." 

The white plastic cylinder was the size of a half-gallon milk container, it had locking metal 
latches and a screw top. It was labeled "International Biological Specimen Container" and 
plastered with stickers and warnings in four languages. The warnings were intended to keep the 
cylinder from being opened by suspicious customs officials. 

Apparently the warnings had worked; as Richard Stone swung the big light over, he could see 
the seals were still intact. Stone turned on the air handlers and pulled on plastic gloves and a 
face mask. After all, the lab had recently identified specimens contaminated with Venezuelan 
equine fever, Japanese B encephalitis, Kyasanur Forest virus, Langat virus, and Mayaro. Then 
he unscrewed the top. 

There was the hiss of escaping gas, and white smoke boiled out. The cylinder turned frosty 
cold. Inside he found a plastic zip-lock sandwich bag, containing something green. Stone spread a 
surgical drape on the table and shook out the contents of the bag. A piece of frozen flesh struck 
the table with a dull thud. 

"Huh," the technician said. "Looks eaten." 

"Yes, it does," Stone said. "What do they want with us?" 

The technician consulted the enclosed documents. "Lizard is biting local children. They have a 
question about identification of the species, and a concern about diseases transmitted from the 
bite." She produced a child's picture of a lizard, signed TINA at the top. "One of the kids drew a 
picture of the lizard." 

Stone glanced at the picture. "Obviously we can't verify the species," Stone said. "But we can 
check diseases easily enough, if we can get any blood out of this fragment. What are they calling 
this animal?" 

"'Basiliscus amoratus with three-toed genetic anomaly,’ " she said, reading. 

"Okay," Stone said. "Let's get started. While you're waiting for it to thaw, do an X-ray and take 
Polaroids for the record. Once we have blood, start running antibody sets until we get some 
matches. Let me know if there's a problem." 


Before lunchtime, the lab had its answer: the lizard blood showed no significant reactivity to any 
viral or bacterial antigen. They had run toxicity profiles as well, and they had found only one 
positive match: the blood was mildly reactive to the venom of the Indian king cobra. But such 
cross-reactivity was common among reptile species, and Dr. Stone did not think it noteworthy to 
include in the fax his technician sent to Dr. Martin Guitierrez that same evening. 

There was never any question about identifying the lizard; that would await the return of Dr. 
Simpson. He was not due back for several weeks, and his secretary asked if the TDL would 
please store the lizard fragment in the meantime. Dr. Stone put it back in the zip-lock bag and 
stuck it in the freezer. 


Martin Guitierrez read the fax from the Columbia Medical Center/Tropical Diseases Laboratory. It 
was brief: - 


SUBJECT: Basiliscus amoratus with genetic anomaly 
(forwarded from Dr. Simpson's office) 


MATERIALS: _ posterior segment, ? partially eaten animal 


PROCEDURES PERFORMED. X-ray, Microscopic, immunological RTX for 
viral, parasitic, bacterial disease. 


FINDINGS: No histologic or immunologic evidence for any communicable disease in man in this 
Basiliscus amoratus sample. 


(signed) 
Richard A. Stone, M.D., director 


Guitierrez made two assumptions based on the memo. First, that his identification of the lizard 
as a basilisk had been confirmed by scientists at Columbia University. And second, that the 
absence of communicable disease meant the recent episodes of sporadic lizard bites implied no 
serious health hazards for Costa Rica. On the contrary, he felt his original views were correct: 
that a lizard species had been driven from the forest into a new habitat, and was coming into 
contact with village people. Guitierrez was certain that in a few more weeks the lizards would 
settle down and the biting episodes won end. 


The tropical rain fell in great drenching sheets, hammering the corrugated roof of the clinic in 
Bahja Anasco. It was nearly midnight; power had been lost in the storm, and the midwife Elena 
Morales was working by flashlight when she heard a squeaking, chirping sound. Thinking that it 
was a rat, she quickly put a compress on the forehead of the mother and went into the next room 
to check on the newborn baby. As her hand touched the doorknob, she heard the chirping again, 
and she relaxed. Evidently it was just a bird, flying in the window to get out of the rain. Costa 
Ricans said that when a bird came to visit a newborn child, it brought good luck. 

Elena opened the door. The infant lay in a wicker bassinet, swaddled in a light blanket, only its 
face exposed. Around the rim of the bassinet, three dark-green lizards crouched like gargoyles. 
When they saw Elena, they cocked their heads and stared curiously at her, but did not flee. In the 
light of her flashlight Elena saw the blood dripping from their snouts. Softly chirping, one lizard 
bent down and, with a quick shake of its head, tore a ragged chunk of flesh from the baby. 

Elena rushed forward, screaming, and the lizards fled into the darkness. But long before she 
reached the bassinet, she could see what had happened to the infant's face, and she knew the 
child must be dead. The lizards scattered into the rainy night, chirping and squealing, leaving 
behind only bloody three-toed tracks, like birds. 


The Shape of the Data 


Later, when she was calmer, Elena Morales decided not to report the lizard attack. Despite the 
horror she had seen, she began to worry that she might be criticized for leaving the baby 
unguarded. So she told the mother that the baby had asphyxiated, and she reported the death on 
the forms she sent to San Jos, as SIDS: sudden infant death syndrome. This was a syndrome of 
unexplained death among very young children; it was unremarkable, and her report went 
unchallenged. 

The university lab in San Jos, that analyzed the saliva sample from Tina Bowman's arm made 
several remarkable discoveries. There was, as expected, a great deal of serotonin. But among 
the salivary proteins was a real monster:molecular mass of 1,980, one of the largest proteins 
known. Biological activity was still under study, but it seemed to be a neurotoxic poison related to 
cobra venom, although more primitive in structure. 

The lab also detected trace quantities of the gamma-amino metbionine hydrolase. Because 
this enzyme was a marker for genetic engineering, and not found in wild animals, technicians 
assumed it was a lab contaminant and did not report it when they called Dr, Cruz, the referring 
physician in Puntarenas. 

The lizard fragment rested in the freezer at Columbia University, awaiting the return of Dr. 
Simpson, who was not expected for at least a month. And so things might have remained, had 
not a technician named Alice Levin walked into the Tropical Diseases Laboratory, seen Tina 
Bowman's picture, and said, "Oh, whose kid drew the dinosaur?" 

"What?" Richard Stone said, turning slowly toward her. 

"The dinosaur. Isn't that what it is? My kid draws them all the time." 

"This is a lizard," Stone said. "From Costa Rica. Some girl down there drew a picture of it." 

"No," Alice Levin said, shaking her head. "Look at it. It's very clear. Big head, long neck, stands 
on its hind legs, thick tail. It's a dinosaur." 

"It can't be. It was only a foot tall." 

"So? There were little dinosaurs back then," Alice said. "Believe me, | know. | have two boys, 
I'm an expert. The smallest dinosaurs were under a foot. Teenysaurus or something, | don't 
know. Those names are impossible. You'll never learn those names if you're over the age of ten." 


"You don't understand,” Richard Stone said. "This is a picture of a contemporary animal. They 
sent us a fragment of the animal. It's in the freezer now." Stone went and got it, and shook it out of 
the baggie. 

Alice Levin looked at the frozen piece of leg and tail, and shrugged. She didn't touch it. "| don't 
know," she said. "But that looks like a dinosaur to me." 

Stone shook his head. "Impossible." 

"Why?" Alice Levin said. "It could be a leftover or a remnant or whatever they call them." 

Stone continued to shake his head. Alice was uninformed; she was just a technician who 
worked in the bacteriology lab down the hall. And she had an active imagination. Stone 
remembered the time when she thought she was being followed by one of the surgical orderlies. . .. 

"You know," Alice Levin said, "if this is a dinosaur, Richard, it could be a big deal." 

"It's not a dinosaur." 

"Has anybody checked it. "No," 

Stone said. 

"Well, take it to the Museum of Natural History or something," Alice Levin said. "You really 
should." 

"I'd be embarrassed." 

"You want me to do it for you?" she said. 

"No," Richard Stone said. "| don't." 

"You're not going to do anything?" 

"Nothing at all." He put the baggie back in the freezer and slammed the door. "It's not a 
dinosaur, it's a lizard. And whatever it is, it can wait until Dr. Simpson gets back from Borneo to 
identify it. That's final, Alice. This lizard's not going anywhere." 


SECOND ITERATION 


"With subsequent drawings of the fractal curve, sudden changes may appear." 


IAN MALCOM 
The Shore of the Inland Sea 


Alan Grant crouched down, his nose inches from the ground. The temperature was over a 
hundred degrees. His knees ached, despite the rug-layer's pads he wore. His lungs burned from 
the harsh alkaline dust. Sweat dripped off his forehead onto the ground. But Grant was oblivious to 
the discomfort. His entire attention was focused on the six-inch square of earth in front of him. 
Working patiently with a dental pick and an artist's camel brush, he exposed the tiny L-shaped 
fragment of jawbone. It was only an inch long, and no thicker than his little finger. The teeth were 


a row of small points, and had the characteristic media] angling. Bits of bone flaked away as he 
dug. Grant paused for a moment to paint the bone with rubber cement before continuing to 
expose it. There was no question that this was the jawbone from an infant carnivorous dinosaur. 
Its owner had died seventy-nine million years ago, at the age of about two months. With any luck, 
Grant might find the rest of the skeleton as well. If so, it would be the first complete skeleton of a 
baby carnivore - 

"Hey, Alan!" 

Alan Grant looked up, blinking in the sunlight. He pulled down his sunglasses, and wiped his 
forehead with the back of his arm. 

He was crouched on an eroded hillside in the badlands outside Snakewater, Montana. 
Beneath the great blue bowl of sky, blunted hills, exposed outcroppings of crumbling limestone, 
stretched for miles in every direction. There was not a tree, or a bush. Nothing but barren rock, 
hot sun, and whining wind. 

Visitors found the badlands depressingly bleak, but when Grant looked at this landscape, he 
saw something else entirely. This barren land was what remained of another, very different world, 
which had vanished eighty million years ago. In his mind's eye, Grant saw himself back in the 
warm, swampy bayou that formed the shoreline of a great inland sea. This inland sea was a 
thousand miles wide, extending all the way from the newly upthrust Rocky Mountains to the 
sharp, craggy peaks of the Appalachians. All of the American West was underwater. 

At that time, there were thin clouds in the sky overhead, darkened by the smoke of nearby 
volcanoes. The atmosphere was denser, richer in carbon dioxide. Plants grew rapidly along the 
shoreline. There were no fish in these waters, but there were clams and snails. Pterosaurs 
swooped down to scoop algae from the surface. A few carnivorous dinosaurs prowled the 
swampy shores of the lake, moving among the palm trees. And offshore was a small island, 
about two acres in size. Ringed with dense vegetation, this island formed a protected sanctuary 
where herds of herbivorous duckbilled dinosaurs laid their eggs in communal nests, and raised 
their squeaking young. 

Over the millions of years that followed, the pale green alkaline lake grew shallower, and finally 
vanished. The exposed land buckled and cracked under the heat. And the offshore island with its 
dinosaur eggs became the eroded hillside in northern Montana which Alan Grant was now 
excavating. 

"Hey, Alan!" 

He stood, a barrel-chested, bearded man of forty. He heard the chugging of the portable 
generator, and the distant clatter of the jackhammer cutting into the dense rock on the next hill. 
He saw the kids working around the jackhammer, moving away the big pieces of rock after 
checking them for fossils. At the foot of the hill, he saw the six tipis of his camp, the flapping mess 
tent, and the trailer that served as their field laboratory. And he saw Ellie waving to him, from the 
shadow of the field laboratory. 

"Visitor!" she called, and pointed to the east. 

Grant saw the cloud of dust, and the blue Ford sedan bouncing over the rutted road toward 
them. He glanced at his watch: right on time. On the other hill, the kids looked up with interest. 
They didn't get many visitors in Snakewater, and there had been a lot of speculation about what a 
lawyer from the Environmental Protection Agency would want to see Alan Grant about. 

But Grant knew that paleontology, the study of extinct life, had in recent years taken on an 
unexpected relevance to the modern world. The modem world was changing fast, and urgent 
questions about the weather, deforestation, global warming, or the ozone layer often seemed 
answerable, at least in part, with information from the past. Information that paleontologists could 
provide. He had been called as an expert witness twice in the past few years. 

Grant started down the hill to meet the car. 


The visitor coughed in the white dust as he slammed the car door. "Bob Morris, EPA," he said, 
extending his hand. "I'm with the San Francisco office. " 

Grant introduced himself and said, "You look hot. Want a beer?" 

"Jesus, yeah." Morris was in his late twenties, wearing a tie, and pants from a business suit. 
He carried a briefcase. His wing-tip shoes crunched on the rocks as they walked toward the 
trailer. 


"When | first came over the hill, | thought this was an Indian reservation," Morris said, pointing 
to the tipis. 

"No," Grant said. "Just the best way to live out here." Grant explained that in 1978, the first 
year of the excavations, they had come out in North Slope octahedral tents, the most advanced 
available. But the tents always blew over in the wind. They tried other kinds of tents, with the 
same result. Finally they started putting up tipis, which were larger inside, more comfortable, and 
more stable in wind. "These're Blackfoot tipis, built around four poles," Grant said. "Sioux tipis are 
built around three. But this used to be Blackfoot territory, so we thought . . ." 

"Uh-huh," Morris said. "Very fitting." He squinted at the desolate landscape and shook his 
head. "How long you been out here?" 

"About sixty cases," Grant said. When Morris looked surprised, he explained, "We measure 
time in beer. We start in June with a hundred cases. We've gone through about sixty so far." 

"Sixty-three, to be exact," Ellie Sattler said, as they reached the trailer. Grant was amused to 
see Morris gaping at her. Ellie was wearing cut-off jeans and a workshirt tied at her midriff. She 
was twenty-four and darkly tanned. Her blond hair was pulled back. 

"Ellie keeps us going,” Grant said, introducing her. "She's very good at what she does." 

"What does she do?" Morris asked. 

"Paleobotany," Ellie said. "And | also do the standard field preps." She opened the door and 
they went inside. 

The air conditioning in the trailer only brought the temperature down to eighty-five degrees, but 
it seemed cool after the midday beat. The trailer had a series of long wooden tables, with tiny 
bone specimens neatly laid out, tagged and labeled. Farther along were ceramic dishes and 
crocks. There was a strong odor of vinegar. 

Morris glanced at the bones. "I thought dinosaurs were big," he said. 

"They were," Ellie said. "But everything you see here comes from babies. Snakewater is 
important primarily because of the number of dinosaur nesting sites here. Until we started this 
work, there were hardly any infant dinosaurs known. Only one nest had ever been found, in the 
Gobi Desert. We've discovered a dozen different hadrosaur nests, complete with eggs and bones 
of infants." 

While Grant went to the refrigerator, she showed Morris the acetic acid baths, which were used 
to dissolve away the limestone from the delicate bones. 

"They look like chicken bones," Morris said, peering into the ceramic dishes. 

"Yes," she said. "They're very bird-like." 

"And what about those?" Morris said, pointing through the trailer window to piles of large bones 
outside, wrapped in heavy plastic. 

"Rejects," Ellie said. "Bones too fragmentary when we took them out of the ground, In the old 
days we'd just discard them, but nowadays we send them for genetic testing." 

"Genetic testing?" Morris said. 

"Here you go," Grant said, thrusting a beer into his band. He gave another to Ellie. She 
chugged hers, throwing her long neck back. Morris stared. 

"We're pretty informal here," Grant said. "Want to step into my office?" 

"Sure," Morris said. Grant led him to the end of the trailer, where there was a torn couch, a 
sagging chair, and a battered endtable. Grant dropped onto the couch, which creaked and 
exhaled a cloud of chalky dust. He leaned back, thumped his boots up on the endtable, and 
gestured for Morris to sit in the chair. "Make yourself comfortable." 

Grant was a professor of paleontology at the University of Denver, and one of the foremost 
researchers in his field, but he had never been comfortable with social niceties. He saw himself 
as an outdoor man, and he knew that all the important work in paleontology was done outdoors, 
with your bands. Grant had little patience for the academics, for the museum curators, for what 
he called Teacup Dinosaur Hunters. And he took some pains to distance himself in dress and 
behavior from the Teacup Dinosaur Hunters, even delivering his lectures in jeans and sneakers. 

Grant watched as Morris primly brushed off the seat of the chair before he sat down. Morris 
opened his briefcase, rummaged through his papers, and glanced back at Ellie, who was lifting 
bones with tweezers from the acid bath at the other end of the trailer, paying no attention to them. 
"You're probably wondering why I'm here." 

Grant nodded. "It's a long way to come, Mr. Morris." 


"Well," Morris said, "to get right to the point, the EPA is concerned about the activities of the 
Hammond Foundation. You receive some funding from them." 

"Thirty thousand dollars a year," Grant said, nodding. "For the last five years." 

"What do you know about the foundation?" Morris said. 

Grant shrugged. "The Hammond Foundation is a respected source of academic grants. They 
fund research all over the world, including several dinosaur researchers. | know they support Bob 
Kerry out of the Tyrrell in Alberta, and John Weller in Alaska. Probably more." 

"Do you know why the Hammond Foundation supports so much dinosaur research?" Morris 
asked. 

"Of course. It's because old John Hammond is a dinosaur nut." 

"You've met Hammond?" 

Grant shrugged. "Once or twice. He comes here for brief visits. He's quite elderly, you know. 
And eccentric, the way rich people sometimes are. But always very enthusiastic. Why?" 

"Well," Morris said, "the Hammond Foundation is actually a rather mysterious organization." He 
pulled out a Xeroxed world map, marked with red dots, and passed it to Grant. "These are the 
digs the foundation financed last year. Notice anything odd about them? Montana, Alaska, 
Canada, Sweden .. . They're all sites in the north. There's nothing below the forty-fifth parallel." 
Morris pulled out more maps. "It's the same, year after year. Dinosaur projects to the south, in 
Utah or Colorado or Mexico, never get funded. The Hammond Foundation only supports cold- 
weather digs. We'd like to know why." 

Grant shuffled through the maps quickly. If it was true that the foundation only supported cold- 
weather digs, then it was strange behavior, because some of the best dinosaur researchers were 
working in hot climates, and - 

"And there are other puzzles," Morris said. "For example, what is the relationship of dinosaurs 
to amber?" 

"Amber?" 

"Yes. It's the hard yellow resin of dried tree sap-" 

"| know what it is," Grant said. "But why are you asking?" 

"Because," Morris said, "over the last five years, Hammond has purchased enormous 
quantities of amber in America, Europe, and Asia, including many pieces of museum-quality 
jewelry. The foundation has spent seventeen million dollars on amber. They now possess the 
largest privately held stock of this material in the world." 

"| don't get it," Grant said. 

"Neither does anybody else," Morris said. "As far as we can tell, it doesn't make any sense at 
all. Amber is easily synthesized. It has no commercial or defense value. There's no reason to 
stockpile it. But Hammond has done just that, over many years." 

"Amber," Grant said, shaking his head. 

"And what about his island in Costa Rica?" Morris continued. "Ten years ago, the Hammond 
Foundation leased an island from the government of Costa Rica. Supposedly to set up a 
biological preserve." 

"| don't know anything about that," Grant said, frowning. 

"| haven't been able to find out much," Morris said. "The island is a hundred miles off the west 
coast. It's very rugged, and it's in an area of ocean where the combinations of wind and current 
make it almost perpetually covered in fog. They used to call it Cloud Island. Isla Nublar. 
Apparently the Costa Ricans were amazed that anybody would want it." Morris searched in his 
briefcase. "The reason | mention it," he said, "is that, according to the records, you were paid a 
consultant's fee in connection with this island." 

"| was?" Grant said. 

Morris passed a sheet of paper to Grant. It was the Xerox of a check issued in March 1984 
from InGen Inc., Farallon Road, Palo Alto, California. Made out to Alan Grant In the amount of 
twelve thousand dollars. At the lower corner, the check was marked CONSULTANT 
SERVICES/COSTA RICA/JUVENILE HYPERSPACE. 

"Ob, sure," Grant said. "| remember that. It was weird as hell, but | remember it. And it didn't 
have anything to do with an island.” 


Alan Grant had found the first clutch of dinosaur eggs in Montana in 1979, and many more in the 
next two years, but he hadn't gotten around to publishing his findings until 1983. His paper, with 
its report of a herd of ten thousand duckbilled dinosaurs living along the shore of a vast inland 
sea, building communal nests of eggs in the mud, raising their infant dinosaurs in the herd, made 
Grant a celebrity overnight. The notion of maternal instincts in giant dinosaurs-and the drawings 
of cute babies poking their snouts out of the eggs-had appeal around the world. Grant was 
besieged with requests for interviews, lectures, books. Characteristically, he turned them all 
down, wanting only to continue his excavations. But it was during those frantic days of the mid- 
1980s that he was approached by the InGen corporation with a request for consulting services. 

"Had you heard of InGen before?" Morris asked. "No." 

"How did they contact you?" 

"Telephone call. It was aman named Gennaro or Gennino, something like that." 

Morris nodded. "Donald Gennaro," he said. "He's the legal counsel for InGen." 

"Anyway, he wanted to know about eating habits of dinosaurs. And he offered me a fee to 
draw up a paper for him." Grant drank his beer, set the can on the floor. "Gennaro was 
particularly interested in young dinosaurs. Infants and juveniles. What they ate. | guess he 
thought | would know about that." 

"Did you?" 

"Not really, no. | told him that. We had found lots of skeletal material, but we had very little 
dietary data. But Gennaro said he knew we hadn't published everything, and he wanted whatever 
we had. And he offered a very large fee. Fifty thousand dollars." 

Morris took out a tape recorder and set it on the endtable. "You mind?" 

"No, go ahead." 

"So Gennaro telephoned you in 1984. What happened then?" 

"Well," Grant said. "You see our operation here. Fifty thousand would support two full summers 
of digging. | told him I'd do what | could." 

"So you agreed to prepare a paper for him." 

"Yes." 

"On the dietary habits of juvenile dinosaurs?" 

"Yes." 

"You met Gennaro?" 

"No. Just on the phone." 

"Did Gennaro say why he wanted this information?" 

"Yes," Grant said. "He was planning a museum for children, and he wanted to feature baby 
dinosaurs. He said he was hiring a number of academic consultants, and named them. There 
were paleontologists like me, and a mathematician from Texas named lan Malcolm, and a couple 
of ecologists. A systems analyst. Good group." 

Morris nodded, making notes. "So you accepted the consultancy?" 

"Yes. | agreed to send him a summary of our work: what we knew about the habits of the 
duckbilled hadrosaurs we'd found." 

"What kind of information did you send?" Morris asked. 

"Everything: nesting behavior, territorial ranges, feeding behavior, social behavior. Everything." 

"And how did Gennaro respond?" 

"He kept calling and calling. Sometimes in the middle of the night. Would the dinosaurs eat 
this? Would they eat that? Should the exhibit include this? | could never understand why he was 
so worked up. | mean, | think dinosaurs are important, too, but not that important. They've been 
dead sixty-five million years. You'd think his calls could wait until morning." 

"| see," Morris said. "And the fifty thousand dollars?" 

Grant shook his head. "I got tired of Gennaro and called the whole thing off. We settled up for 
twelve thousand. That must have been about the middle of '85." 

Morris made a note. "And InGen? Any other contact with them?" 

"Not since 1985." 

"And when did the Hammond Foundation begin to fund your research?" 

"I'd have to look," Grant said. "But it was around then. Mid-eighties." 

"And you know Hammond as just a rich dinosaur enthusiast." 

"Yes." 


Morris made another note. 

"Look," Grant said. "If the EPA is so concerned about John Hammond and what he's doing-the 
dinosaur sites in the north, the amber purchases, the island in Costa Rica-why don't you 'ust ask 
him about it?" 

"At the moment, we can't," Morris said. "Why not?" Grant said. 

"Because we don't have any evidence of wrongdoing," Morris said. "But personally, | think it's 
clear John Hammond is evading the law." 


"| was first contacted," Morris explained, "by the Office of Technology Transfer. The OTT 
monitors shipments of American technology which might have military significance. They called 
to say that InGen had two areas of possible illegal technology transfer. First, InGen shipped three 
Cray XMPs to Costa Rica. InGen characterized it as transfer within corporate divisions, and said 
they weren't for resale. But OTT couldn't imagine why the hell somebody'd need that power in 
Costa Rica." 

"Three Crays," Grant said. "is that a kind of computer?" 

Morris nodded. "Very powerful supercomputers. To put it in perspective, three Crays represent 
more computing power than any other privately held company in America. And InGen sent the 
machines to Costa Rica. You have to wonder why." 

"| give up. Why?" Grant said. 

"Nobody knows. And the Hoods are even more worrisome," Morris continued. "Hoods are 
automated gene sequencers-machines that work out the genetic code by themselves. They're so 
new that they haven't been put on the restricted lists yet. But any genetic engineering lab is likely to 
have one, if it can afford the half-million-dollar price tag." He flipped through his notes. "Well, it 
seems InGen shipped twenty-four Hood sequencers to their island in Costa Rica. 

"Again, they said it was a transfer within divisions and not an export," Morris said. "There 
wasn't much that OTT could do. They're not officially concerned with use. But InGen was 
obviously setting up one of the most powerful genetic engineering facilities in the world in an 
obscure Central American country. A country with no regulations. That kind of thing has 
happened before." 

There had already been cases of American bioenginecring companies moving to another 
country so they would not be hampered by regulations and rules. The most flagrant, Morris 
explained, was the Biosyn rabies case. 

In 1986, Genetic Biosyn Corporation of Cupertino tested a bioengineered rabies vaccine on a 
farm in Chile. They didn't inform the government of Chile, or the farm workers involved. They 
simply released the vaccine. 

The vaccine consisted of live rabies virus, genetically modified to be nonvirulent. But the 
virulence hadn't been tested; Biosyn didn't know whether the virus could still cause rabies or not. 
Even worse, the virus had been modified. Ordinarily you couldn't contract rabies unless you were 
bitten by an animal. But Biosyn modified the rabies virus to cross the pulmonary alveoli; you 
could get an infection just inhaling it. Biosyn staffers brought this live rabies virus down to Chile in 
a carry-on bag on a commercial airline flight. Morris often wondered what would have happened 
if the capsule had broken open during the flight. Everybody on the plane might have been 
infected with rabies. 

It was outrageous. It was irresponsible. It was criminally negligent. But no action was taken 
against Biosyn. The Chilean farmers who unwittingly risked their lives were ignorant peasants; 
the government of Chile had an economic crisis to worry about; and the American authorities had 
no jurisdiction. So Lewis Dodgson, the geneticist responsible for the test, was still working at 
Biosyn. Biosyn was still as reckless as ever. And other American companies were hurrying to set 
up facilities in foreign countries that lacked sophistication about genetic research. Countries that 
perceived genetic engineering to be like any other high-tech development, and thus welcomed it to 
their lands, unaware of the dangers posed. 

"So that's why we began our investigation of InGen," Morris said. "About three weeks ago." 

"And what have you actually found?" Grant said. 

"Not much," Morris admitted. "When | go back to San Francisco, we'll probably have to close 
the investigation. And | think I'm about finished here." He started packing up his briefcase- "By 
the way, what does ‘juvenile hyperspace’ mean?" 


"That's just a fancy label for my report," Grant said. " 'Hyperspace' is a term for 
multidimensional space-like three-dimensional tic-tac-toe. | you were to take all the behaviors of 
an animal, its eating and movement and sleeping, you could plot the animal within the 
multidimensional space. Some paleontologists refer to the behavior of an animal as occurring in 
an ecological hyperspace. ‘Juvenile hyperspace’ would just refer to the behavior of juvenile 
dinosaurs-if you wanted to be as pretentious as possible." 

At the far end of the trailer, the phone rang. Ellie answered it. She said, "He's in a meeting right 
now. Can he call you back?" 

Morris snapped his briefcase shut and stood. "Thanks for your help and the beer," he said. 

"No problem," Grant said. 

Grant walked with Morris down the trailer to the door at the far end. Morris said, "Did 
Hammond ever ask for any physical materials from your site? Bones, or eggs, or anything like 
that?" 

"No," Grant said. 

"Dr. Sattler mentioned you do some genetic work here. . . ." 

"Well, not exactly," Grant said. "When we remove fossils that are broken or for some other 
reason not suitable for museum preservation, we send the bones out to a lab that grinds them up 
and tries to extract proteins for us, The proteins are then identified and the report is sent back to 
us." 

"Which lab is that?" Morris asked. 

"Medical Biologic Services in Salt Lake." 

"How'd you choose them?" 

"Competitive bids." 

"The lab has nothing to do with InGen?" Morris asked. "Not 

that | know," Grant said. 

They came to the door of the trailer. Grant opened it, and felt the rush of hot air from outside. 
Morris paused to put on his sunglasses. 

"One last thing," Morris said. "Suppose InGen wasn't really making a museum exhibit. Is there 
anything else they could have done with the information in the report you gave them?" 

Grant laughed. "Sure. They could feed a baby hadrosaur." 

Morris laughed, too. "A baby hadrosaur. That'd be something to see. How big were they?" 

"About so," Grant said, holding his hands six inches apart. "Squirrelsize." 

"And how long before they become full-grown?" 

"Three years," Grant said. "Give or take." 

Morris held out his band. "Well, thanks again for your help." 

“Take it easy driving back," Grant said. He watched for a moment as Morris walked back 
toward his car, and then closed the trailer door. 

Grant said, "What did you think?" 

Ellie shrugged. "Na<ve." 

"You like the part where John Hammond is the evil arch-villain?" Grant laughed. "John 
Hammond's about as sinister as Walt Disney. By the way, who called?" 

"Oh," Ellie said, "it was a woman named Alice Levin. She works at Columbia Medical Center. 
You know her?" 

Grant shook his head. "No." 

"Well, it was something about identifying some remains. She wants you to call her back right 
away." 


Skeleton 


Ellie Sattler brushed a strand of blond hair back from her face and turned her attention to the acid 
baths. She had six in a row, at molar strengths from 5 to 30 percent. She 'had to keep an eye on 
the stronger solutions, because they would eat through the limestone and begin to erode the 
bones. And infant-dinosaur bones were so fragile, She marveled that they had been preserved at 
all, after eighty million years. 

She listened idly as Grant said, "Miss Levin? This is Alan Grant. What's this about a... You 
have what? A what?" He began to laugh. "Oh, | doubt that very much, Miss Levin. . . . No, | really 


don't have time, I'm sorry . . . . Well, I'd take a look at it, but | can pretty much guarantee it's a 
basilisk lizard. But . . . yes, you can do that. All right. Send it now." Grant hung up, and shook his 
head. "These people." 

Ellie said, "What's it about?" 

"Some lizard she's trying to identify," Grant said. "She's going to fax me an X-ray." He walked 
over to the fax and waited as the transmission came through. "Incidentally, I've got a new find for 
you. A good one.” 

"Yes?" 

Grant nodded. "Found it just before the kid showed up. On South Hill, horizon four. Infant 
velociraptor: jaw and complete dentition, so there's no question about identity. And the site looks 
undisturbed. We might even get a full skeleton." 

"That's fantastic," Ellie said. "How young?" 

"Young," Grant said. "Two, maybe four months at most." 

"And it's definitely a velociraptor?" 

"Definitely," Grant said. "Maybe our luck has finally turned." 

For the last two years at Snakewater, the team had excavated only duckbilled hadrosaurs. 
They already had evidence for vast herds of these grazing dinosaurs, roaming the Cretaceous 
plains in groups of ten or twenty thousand, as buffalo would later roam. 

But increasingly the question that faced them was: where were the predators? 

They expected predators to be rare, of course. Studies of predator/prey populations in the 
game parks of Africa and India suggested that, roughly speaking, there was one predatory 
carnivore for every four hundred herbivores. That meant a herd of ten thousand duckbills would 
support only twenty-five tyrannosaurs. So it was unlikely that they would find the remains of a 
large predator. 

But where were the smaller predators? Snakewater had dozens of nesting sites-in some 
places, the ground was literally covered with fragments of dinosaur eggshells-and many small 
dinosaurs ate eggs. Animals like Dromaeosaurus, Oviraptor, Velociraptor, and Coelurus- 
predators three to six feet tall-must have been found here in abundance. 

But they had discovered none so far. 

Perhaps this velociraptor skeleton did mean their luck had changed. And an infant! Ellie knew 
that one of Grant's dreams was to study infant-rearing behavior in carnivorous dinosaurs, as he 
had already studied the behavior of herbivores. Perhaps this was the first step toward that dream. 
"You must be pretty excited," Ellie said. 

Grant didn't answer. 

"| said, you must be excited,” Ellie repeated. 

"My God," Grant said. He was staring at the fax. 


Ellie looked over Grant's shoulder at the X-ray, and breathed out slowly. "You think it's an 
amassicus?" 

"Yes," Grant said. "Or a triassicus. The skeleton is so light." "But 

it's no lizard," she said. 

"No," Grant said. "This is not a lizard. No three-toed lizard has walked on this planet for two 
hundred million years." 

Ellie's first thought was that she was looking at a hoax-an ingenious, skillful hoax, but a hoax 
nonetheless. Every biologist knew that the threat of a hoax was omnipresent. The most famous 
hoax, the Piltdown man, had gone undetected for forty years, and its perpetrator was still 
unknown. More recently, the distinguished astronomer Fred Hoyle had claimed that a fossil 
winged dinosaur, Archaeopteryx, on display in the British Museum, was a fraud. (It was later 
shown to be genuine.) 

The essence of a successful hoax was that it presented scientists with what they expected to 
see. And, to Ellie's eye, the X-ray image of the lizard was exactly correct. The three-toed foot was 
well balanced, with the medial claw smallest. The bony remnants of the fourth and fifth toes were 
located up near the metatarsal joint. The tibia was strong, and considerably longer than the 
femur. At the hip, the acetabulum was complete. The tail showed forty-five vertebrae. It was a 
Procompsognathus. 

"Could this X-ray be faked?" 


"| don't know," Grant said. "But it's almost impossible to fake an X-ray. And Procompsognathus 
is an obscure animal. Even people familiar with dinosaurs have never heard of it." 

Ellie read the note. "Specimen acquired on the beach of Cabo Blanco, July 16... . Apparently a 
howler monkey was eating the animal, and this was all that was recovered. Oh... and it says 
the lizard attacked a little girl." 

"| doubt that," Grant said. "But perhaps. Procompsognathus was so small and light we assume 
it must be a scavenger, only feeding off dead creatures. And you can tell the size"-he measured 
quickly-"it's about twenty centimeters to the hips, which means the full animal would be about a 
foot tall. About as big as a chicken. Even a child would look pretty fearsome to it. It might bite an 
infant, but not a child." 

Ellie frowned at the X-ray image. "You think this could really be a legitimate rediscovery?" she 
said. "Like the coelacanth?" 

"Maybe," Grant said. The coelacanth was a five-foot-long fish thought to have died out sixty- 
five million years ago, until a specimen was pulled from the ocean in 1938. But there were other 
examples. The Australian mountain pygmy possum was known only from fossils until a live one 
was found in a garbage can in Melbourne. And a ten-thousand-year-old fossil fruit bat from New 
Guinea was described by a zoologist who not long afterward received a living specimen in the 
mail. 

"But could it be real?" she persisted. "What about the age?" 

Grant nodded. "The age is a problem." 

Most rediscovered animals were rather recent additions to the fossil record: ten or twenty 
thousand years old. Some were a few million years old- in the case of the coelacanth, sixty-five 
million years old. But the specimen they were looking at was much, much older than that. 
Dinosaurs had died out in the Cretaceous period, sixty-five million years ago. They had flourished 
as the dominant life form on the planet in the Jurassic, 190 million years ago. And they had first 
appeared in the Triassic, roughly 220 million years ago. 

It was during the early Triassic period that Procompsognathus had lived-a time so distant that 
our planet didn't even look the same. All the continents were joined together in a single 
landmass, called Pangaca, which extended from the North to the South Pole-a vast continent of 
ferns and forests, with a few large deserts. The Atlantic Ocean was a narrow lake between what 
would become Africa and Florida. The air was denser. The land was warmer. There were 
hundreds of active volcanoes. And it was in this environment that Procompsognathus lived. 

"Well," Ellie said. "We know animals have survived. Crocodiles are basically Triassic animals 
living in the present. Sharks are Triassic. So we know it has happened before." 

Grant nodded. "And the thing is," he said, "how else do we explain it? It's either a fake-which | 
doubt-or else it's a rediscovery. What else could it be?" 

The phone rang. "Alice Levin again," Grant said. "Let's see if she'll send us the actual 
specimen." He answered it and looked at Ellie, surprised. "Yes, I'll hold for Mr. Hammond. Yes. 
Of course." 

"Hammond? What does he want?" Ellie said. 

Grant shook his head, and then said into the phone, "Yes, Mr. Hammond. Yes, it's good to 
hear your voice, too... .Yes...." He looked at Ellie. "Oh, you did? Oh yes? Is that right?" 

He cupped his hand over the mouthpiece and said, "Still as eccentric as ever. You've got to 
hear this." 

Grant pushed the speaker button, and Ellie heard a raspy old-man's voice speaking rapidly: "- 
hell of an annoyance from some EPA fellow, seems to have gone off half cocked, all on his own, 
running around the country talking to people, stirring up things. | don't suppose anybody's come 
to see you way out there?" 

"As a matter of fact," Grant said, "somebody did come to see me." 

Hammond snorted. "| was afraid of that. Smart-ass kid named Morris?" 

"Yes, his name was Morris," Grant said. 

"He's going to see all our consultants," Hammond said. "He went to see lan Malcolm the other 
day-you know, the mathematician in Texas? That's the first | knew of it. We're having one hell of a 
time getting a handle on this thing, it's typical of the way government operates, there isn't any 
complaint, there isn't any charge, just harassment from some kid who's unsupervised and is 
running around at the taxpayers’ expense. Did he bother you? Disrupt your work?" 


"No, no, he didn't bother me." 

"Well, that's too bad, in a way," Hammond said, "because I'd try and get an injunction to stop 
him if he had. As it is, | had our lawyers call over at EPA to find out what the hell their problem is. 
The head of the office claims he didn't know there was any investigation! You figure that one out. 
Damned bureaucracy is all it is. Hell, | think this kid's trying to get down to Costa Rica, poke 
around, get onto our island. You know we have an island down there?" 

"No," Grant said, looking at Ellie, "| didn't know." 

"Oh yes, we bought it and started our operation oh, four or five years ago now. | forget exactly. 
Called Isla Nublar-big island, hundred miles offshore. Going to be a biological preserve. 
Wondertul place. Tropical jungle. You know, you ought to see it, Dr. Grant." 

"Sounds interesting,” Grant said, "but actually-" 

"It's almost finished now, you know," Hammond said. "I've sent you some material about it. Did 
you get my material?" 

"No, but we're pretty far from-" 

"Maybe it'll come today. Look it over. The island's just beautiful. It's got everything. We've been 
in construction now thirty months. You can imagine. Big park. Opens in September next year. 
You really ought to go see it. 

"It sounds wonderful, but-" 

"As a matter of fact," Hammond said, "I'm going to insist you see it, Dr. Grant. | know you'd find 
it right up your alley. You'd find it fascinating.” 

"I'm in the middle of-" Grant said. 

"Say, I'll tell you what," Hammond said, as if the idea had just occurred to him. "I'm having 
some of the people who consulted for us go down there this weekend. Spend a few days and 
look it over. At our expense, of course. It'd be terrific if you'd give us your opinion." 

"| couldn't possibly," Grant said. 

"Oh, just for a weekend," Hammond said, with the irritating, cheery persistence of an old man. 
"That's all I'm talking about, Dr. Grant. | wouldn't want to interrupt your work. | know how 
important that work is. Believe me, | know that. Never interrupt your work. But you could hop on 
down there this weekend, and be back on Monday." 

"No, | couldn't," Grant said. "I've just found a new skeleton and-" 

"Yes, fine, but | still think you should come-" Hammond said, not really listening. 

"And we've just received some evidence for a very puzzling and remarkable find, which seems 
to be a living procompsognathid." 

"A what?" Hammond said, slowing down. "I didn't quite get that. You said a living 
procompsognathid?" 

"That's right," Grant said. "It's a biological specimen, a partial fragment of an animal collected 
from Central America. A living animal." 

"You don't say," Hammond said. "A living animal? How extraordinary." 

"Yes," Grant said. "We think so, too. So, you see, this isn't the time for me to be leaving-" 

"Central America, did you say?" 

"Yes." 

"Where in Central America is it from, do you know?" 

"A beach called Cabo Blanco, | don't know exactly where-" 

"| see." Hammond cleared his throat, "And when did this, ah, specimen arrive in your hands?" 

"Just today." 

"Today, | see. Today. | see. Yes." Hammond cleared his throat again. 

Grant looked at Ellie and mouthed, What's going on? Ellie 

shook her head. Sounds upset. 

Grant mouthed, See if Morris is still here. 

She went to the window and looked out, but Morris's car was gone. She turned back. 

On the speaker, Hammond coughed. "Ah, Dr. Grant. Have you told anybody about it yet?" 

"No." 

"Good, that's good. Well. Yes. I'll tell you frankly, Dr. Grant, I'm having a little problem about 
this island. This EPA thing is coming at just the wrong time." 

"How's that?" Grant said. 


"Well, we've had our problems and some delays. . . . Let's just say that I'm under a little 
pressure here, and I'd like you to look at this island for me. Give me your opinion. I'll be paying 
you the usual weekend consultant rate of twenty thousand a day. That'd be sixty thousand for 
three days. And if you can spare Dr. Sattler, she'll go at the same rate. We need a botanist. What 
do you say?" 

Ellie looked at Grant as he said, "Well, Mr. Hammond, that much money would fully finance our 
expeditions for the next two summers." 

"Good, good," Hammond said blandly. He seemed distracted now, his thoughts elsewhere. "I 
want this to be easy. . . . Now, I'm sending the corporate jet to pick you up at that private airfield 
cast of Choteau. You know the one | mean? It's only about two hours' drive from where you are. 
You be there at five p.m. tomorrow and I'll be waiting for you. Take you right down. Can you and 
Dr. Sattler make that plane?" 

"| guess we can." 

"Good. Pack lightly. You don't need passports. I'm looking forward to it. See you tomorrow," 
Hammond said, and he hung up. 


Cowan, Swain and Ross 


Midday sun streamed into the San Francisco law offices of Cowan, Swain and Ross, giving the 
room a cheerfulness that Donald Gennaro did not feel. He listened on the phone and looked at 
his boss, Daniel Ross, cold as an undertaker in his dark pinstripe suit. 

"| understand, John," Gennaro said. "And Grant agreed to come? Good, good . . . yes, that 
sounds fine to me. My congratulations, John." He hung up the phone and turned to Ross. 

"We can't trust Hammond any more. He's under too much pressure. The EPA's investigating 
him, he's behind schedule on his Costa Rican resort, and the investors are getting nervous. 
There have been too many rumors of problems down there. Too many workmen have died. And 
now this business about a living procompsit-whatever on the mainland. . . " 

"What does that mean?" Ross said. 

"Maybe nothing," Gennaro said. "But Hamachi is one of our principal investors. | got a report 
last week from Hamachi's representative in San Jos,, the capital of Costa Rica. According to the 
report, some new kind of lizard is biting children on the coast." 

Ross blinked. "New lizard?" 

"Yes," Gennaro said. "We can't screw around with this. We've got to inspect that island right 
away. I've asked Hammond to arrange independent site inspections every week for the next 
three weeks." 

"And what does Hammond say?" 

"He insists nothing is wrong on the island. Claims he has all these security precautions." 

"But you don't believe him," Ross said. 

"No," Gennaro said. "I don't." 

Donald Gennaro had come to Cowan, Swain from a background in investment banking. 
Cowan, Swain's high-tech clients frequently needed capitalization, and Gennaro helped them find 
the money. One of his first assignments, back in 1982, had been to accompany John Hammond 
while the old man, then nearly seventy, put together the funding to start the InGen corporation. 
They eventually raised almost a billion dollars, and Gcnnaro remembered it as a wild ride. 

"Hammond's a dreamer," Gennaro said. 

"A potentially dangerous dreamer," Ross said. "We should never have gotten involved. What is 
our financial position?" 

"The firm," Gennaro said, "owns five percent." 

"General or limited?" 

"General." 

Ross shook his head. "We should never have done that." 

"It seemed wise at the time," Gennaro said. "Hell, it was eight years ago. We took it in lieu of 
some fees. And, if you remember, Hammond's plan was extremely speculative. He was really 
pushing the envelope. Nobody really thought he could pull it off." 

"But apparently he has," Ross said. "In any case, | agree that an inspection is overdue. What 
about your site experts?" 


"I'm starting with experts Hammond already hired as consultants, early in the project." Gennaro 
tossed a list onto Ross's desk. "First group is a paleontologist, a paleobotanist, and a 
mathematician. They go down this weekend. I'll go with them." 

"Will they tell you the truth?" Ross said. 

"| think so. None of them had much to do with the island, and one of them-the mathematician, 
lan Malcolm-was openly hostile to the project from the start. Insisted it would never work, could 
never work." 

"And who else?" 

"Just a technical person: the computer system analyst. Review the park's computers and fix 
some bugs. He should be there by Friday morning.” 

Fine," Ross said. "You're making the arrangements?" 

"Hammond asked to place the calls himself. | think he wants to pretend that he's not in trouble, 
that it's just a social invitation. Showing off his island.” 

"All right," Ross said. "But just make sure it happens. Stay on top of it. | want this Costa Rican 
situation resolved within a week." Ross got up, and walked out of the room. 


Gennaro dialed, heard the whining hiss of a radiophone. Then he heard a voice say, "Grant 
here." 

"Hi, Dr. Grant, this is Donald Gennaro. I'm the general counsel for InGen. We talked a few 
years back, | don't know if you remember-" 

"| remember," Grant said. 

"Well," Gennaro said. "I just got off the phone with John Hammond, who tells me the good 
news that you're coming down to our island in Costa Rica. . . ." 

"Yes," Grant said. "| guess we're going down there tomorrow." 

"Well, | just want to extend my thanks to you for doing this on short notice. Everybody at InGen 
appreciates it. We've asked fan Malcolm, who like you was one of the early consultants, to come 
down as well. He's the mathematician at UT in Austin?" 

"John Hammond mentioned that," Grant said. 

"Well, good," Gennaro said. "And I'll be coming, too, as a matter of fact. By the way, this 
specimen you have found of a pro... procom. . . what is it?" 

"Procompsognathus," Grant said. 

"Yes. Do you have the specimen with you, Dr. Grant? The actual specimen?" 

"No," Grant said. "I've only seen an X-ray. The specimen is in New York. A woman from 
Columbia University called me." 

"Well, | wonder if you could give me the details on that," Gennaro said. "Then | can run down 
that specimen for Mr. Hammond, who's very excited about it. I'm sure you want to see the actual 
specimens too. Perhaps | can even get it delivered to the island while you're all down there," 
Gennaro said. 

Grant gave him the information. "Well, that's fine, Dr. Grant," Gennaro said. "My regards to Dr. 
Sattler. | look forward to meeting you and him tomorrow." And Gennaro hung up. 


Plans 


"This just came," Ellie said the next day, walking to the back of the trailer with a thick manila 
envelope. "One of the kids brought it back from town. It's from Hammond." 

Grant noticed the blue-and-white InGen logo as he tore open the envelope. Inside there was 
no cover letter, just a bound stack of paper. Pulling it out, he discovered it was blueprints. They 
were reduced, forming a thick book. The cover was marked: ISLA NUBLAR RESORT GUEST 
FACILITIES (FULL SET: SAFARI LODGE). 

"What the hell is this?" he said. 

As he flipped open the book, a sheet of paper fell out. 


Dear Alan and Ellie: 


As you can imagine we don't have much in the way of formal promotional materials yet. But 
this should give you some idea of the Isla Nublar project. | think it's Very exciting! 


Looking forward to discussing this with you! Hope you can join us! 


Regards, 
John 


"| don't get it," Grant said. He flipped through the sheets. "These are architectural plans." He 
turned to the top sheet: 


VISITOR CENTER/LODGE ISLA NUBLAR RESORT 
CLIENT InGen Inc., Palo Alto, Calif. 
ARCHITECTS Dunning, Murphy & Associates, New 


York. Richard Murphy, design partner; 
Theodore Chen, senior designer; 
Sheldon James, administrative partner. 


ENGINEERS Harlow, Whitney & Fields, Boston, 
structural; A.T.Misikawa, Osaka, 

mechanical. 

LANDSCAPING Shepperton Rogers, London; 


A.Ashikiga, H. leyasu, Kanazawa. 


ELECTRICAL N. V. Kobayashi, Tokyo. A. R 
Makasawa, senior consultant. 


COMPUTER C/C Integrated Computer Systems, Inc., 
Cambridge, Mass. Dennis Nedry, 
project supervisor. 


Grant turned to the plans themselves. They were stamped INDUSTRIAL SECRETS DO NOT 
COPY and CONFIDENTIAL WORK PRODUCT-NOT FOR DISTRIBUTION. Each sheet was 
numbered, and at the top: "These plans represent the confidential creations of InGen Inc. You 
must have signed document 112/4A or you risk prosecution." 

"Looks pretty paranoid to me," he said. 

"Maybe there's a reason," Ellie said. 

The next page was a topographical map. It showed Isla Nublar as an inverted teardrop, 
bulging at the north, tapering at the south. The island was eight miles long, and the map divided it 
into several large sections. 

The northern section was marked VISITOR AREA and it contained structures marked "Visitor 
Arrivals," "Visitor Center/Administration," " Power/Desalinization/Support,” "Hammond Res.," and 
"Safari Lodge." Grant could see the outline of a swimming pool, the rectangles of tennis courts, 
and the round squiggles that represented planting and shrubbery. 

"Looks like a resort, all right," Ellie said. 

There followed detail sheets for the Safari Lodge itself. In the elevation sketches, the lodge 
looked dramatic: a long low building with a series of pyramid shapes on the roof. But there was 
little about the other buildings in the visitor area. 

And the rest of the island was even more mysterious. As far as Grant could tell, it was mostly 
open space. A network of roads, tunnels, and outlying buildings, and a long thin lake that 
appeared to be man-made, with concrete dams and barriers. But, for the most part, the island 
was divided into big curving areas with very little development at all. Each area was marked by 
codes: 

/P/PROC/V/2A, /D/TRIC/L/5(4A+l), /LN/OTHN/C/4(3A+]), and /VV/ HADR/X/ 11(6A + 3 + 3DB). 

"Is there an explanation for the codes?" she said. 


Grant flipped the pages rapidly, but he couldn't find one. 

"Maybe they took it out," she said. 

"I'm telling you," Grant said. "Paranoid." He looked at the big curving divisions, separated from 
one another by the network of roads. There were only six divisions on the whole island. And each 
division was separated from the road by a concrete moat. Outside each moat was a fence with a 
little lightning sign alongside it. That mystified them until they were finally able to figure out It 
meant the fences were electrified. 

"That's odd," she said. "Electrified fences at a resort?" 

"Miles of them," Grant said. "Electrified fences and moats, together. And usually with a road 
alongside them as well." 

"Just like a zoo,” Ellie said. 

They went back to the topographical map and looked closely at the contour lines. The roads 
had been placed oddly. The main road ran north-soutb, right through the central hills of the 
island, including one section of road that seemed to be literally cut into the side of a cliff, above a 
river. It began to look as if there had been a deliberate effort to leave these open areas as big 
enclosures, separated from the roads by moats and electric fences. And the roads were raised 
up above ground level, so you could see over the fences. . . . 

"You know," Ellie said, "some of these dimensions are enormous. Look at this. This concrete 
moat is thirty feet wide. That's like a military fortification." 

"So are these buildings,” Grant said. He had noticed that each open division had a few 
buildings, usually located in out-of-the-way corners. But the buildings were all concrete, with thick 
walls. In side-view elevations they looked like concrete bunkers with small windows. Like the Nazi 
pillboxes from old war movies. 

At that moment, they heard a muffled explosion, and Grant put the papers aside. "Back to 
work," he said. 


"Fire!" 

There was a slight vibration, and then yellow contour lines traced across the computer screen. 
This time the resolution was perfect, and Alan Grant had a glimpse of the skeleton, beautifully 
defined, the long neck arched back. It was unquestionably an infant velociraptor, and it looked in 
perfect- 

The screen went blank. 

"| hate computers," Grant said, squinting in the sun. "What happened now?" 

"Lost the integrator input," one of the kids said. "Just a minute." The kid bent to look at the 
tangle of wires going into the back of the battery-powered portable computer. They had set the 
computer up on a beer carton on top of Hill Four, not far from the device they called Thumper. 

Grant sat down on the side of the hill and looked at his watch. He said to Ellie, "We're going to 
have to do this the old-fashioned way." 

One of the kids overheard. "Aw, Alan." 

"Look," Grant said, "I've got a plane to catch. And | want the fossil protected before | go." 

Once you began to expose a fossil, you had to continue, or risk losing it. Visitors imagined the 
landscape of the badlands to be unchanging, but in fact it was continuously eroding, literally right 
before your eyes; all day long you could hear the clatter of pebbles rolling down the crumbling 
hillside. And there was always the risk of a rainstorm; even a brief shower would wash away a 
delicate fossil. Thus Grant's partially exposed skeleton was at risk, and it had to be protected until 
he returned. 

Fossil protection ordinarily consisted of a tarp over the site, and a trench around the perimeter 
to control water runoff. The question was how large a trench the velociraptor fossil required. To 
decide that, they were using computer-assisted sonic tomography, or CAST. This was a new 
procedure, in which Thumper fired a soft lead slug into the ground, setting up shock waves that 
were read by the computer and assembled into a kind of X-ray image of the hillside. They had 
been using it all summer with varying results. 

Thumper was twenty feet away now, a big silver box on wheels, with an umbrella on top. It 
looked like an ice-cream vendor's pushcart, parked incongruously on the badlands. Thumper had 
two youthful attendants loading the next soft lead pellet. 


So far, the CAST program merely located the extent of finds, helping Grant's team to dig more 
efficiently. But the kids claimed that within a few years it would be possible to generate an image 
so detailed that excavation would he redundant. You could get a perfect image of the bones, in 
three dimensions, and it promised a whole new era of archaeology without excavation. 

But none of that had happened yet. And the equipment that worked flawlessly in the university 
laboratory proved pitifully delicate and fickle in the field. 

"How much longer?" Grant said. 

"We got it now, Alan. It's not bad." 

Grant went to look at the computer screen. He saw the complete skeleton, traced in bright 
yellow. It was indeed a young specimen. The outstanding characteristic of Velociraptor-the 
single-toed claw, which in a full-grown animal was a curved, six-inch-long weapon capable of 
ripping open its prey-was in this infant no larger than the thorn on a rosebush. It was hardly 
visible at all on the screen. And Velociraptor was a lightly built dinosaur in any case, an animal as 
fine-boned as a bird, and presumably as intelligent. 

Here the skeleton appeared in perfect order, except that the head and neck were bent back, 
toward the posterior. Such neck flexion was so common in fossils that some scientists had 
formulated a theory to explain it, suggesting that the dinosaurs had become extinct because they 
had been poisoned by the evolving alkaloids in plants. The twisted neck was thought to signify 
the death agony of the dinosaurs. Grant had finally put that one to rest, by demonstrating that 
many species of birds and reptiles underwent a postmortem contraction of posterior neck 
ligaments, which bent the head backward in a characteristic way. It had nothing to do with the 
cause of death; it had to do with the way a carcass dried in the sun. 

Grant saw that this particular skeleton had also been twisted laterally, so that the right leg and 
foot were raised up above the backbone. 

"It looks kind of distorted,” one of the kids said. "But | don't think it's the computer." 

"No," Grant said. "It's just time. Lots and lots of time." 

Grant knew that people could not imagine geological time. Human life was lived on another 
scale of time entirely. An apple turned brown in a few minutes. Silverware turned black in a few 
days. A compost heap decayed in a season. A child grew up in a decade. None of these 
everyday human experiences prepared people to be able to imagine the meaning of eighty 
million years - the length of time that had passed since this little animal had died. 

In the classroom, Grant had tried different comparisons. If you imagined the human lifespan of 
sixty years was compressed to an hour, then eighty million years would still be 3,652 years-older 
than the pyramids. The velociraptor had been dead a long time. 

"Doesn't look very fearsome," one of the kids said. 

"He wasn't," Grant said. "At least, not until he grew up." Probably this baby had scavenged, 
feeding off carcasses slain by the adults, after the big animals had gorged themselves, and lay 
basking in the sun. Carnivores could eat as much as 25 percent of their body weight in a single 
meal, and it made them sleepy afterward. The babies would chitter and scramble over the 
indulgent, somnolent bodies of the adults, and nip little bites from the dead animal. The babies 
were probably cute little animals. 

But an adult velociraptor was another matter entirely. Pound for pound, a velociraptor was the 
most rapacious dinosaur that ever lived. Although relatively small-about two hundred pounds, the 
size of a leopard-velociraptors were quick, intelligent, and vicious, able to attack with sharp jaws, 
powerful clawed forearms, and the devastating single claw on the foot. 

Velociraptors hunted in packs, and Grant thought it must have been a sight to see a dozen of 
these animals racing at full speed, leaping onto the back of a much larger dinosaur, tearing at the 
neck and slashing at the ribs and belly. .. . 

"We're running out of time,” Ellie said, bringing him back. 

Grant gave instructions for the trench. From the computer image, they knew the skeleton lay in 
a relatively confined area; a ditch around a two-meter square would be sufficient. Meanwhile, 
Ellie lashed down the tarp that covered the side of the hill. Grant helped her pound in the final 
stakes. 

"How did the baby die?" one of the kids asked. 

"| doubt we'll know," Grant replied. "Infant mortality in the wild is high. In African parks, it runs 
seventy percent among some carnivores. It could have been anything - disease, separation from 


the group, anything. Or even attack by an adult. We know these animals hunted in packs, but we 
don't know anything about their social behavior in a group." 

The students nodded. They had all studied animal behavior, and they knew, for example, that 
when a new male took over a lion pride, the first thing he did was kill all the cubs. The reason 
was apparently genetic: the male had evolved to disseminate his genes as widely as possible, 
and by killing the cubs he brought all the females into heat, so that he could impregnate them. It 
also prevented the females from wasting their time nurturing the offspring of another male. 

Perhaps the velociraptor hunting pack was also ruled by a dominant male. They knew so little 
about dinosaurs, Grant thought. After 150 years of research and excavation all around the world, 
they still knew almost nothing about what the dinosaurs had really been like. 

"We've got to go," Ellie said, "if we're going to get to Choteau by five." 


Hammond 


Gennaro's secretary bustled in with a new suitcase. It still had the sales tags on it. "You know, 
Mr. Gennaro," she said severely, "when you forget to pack it makes me think you don't really 
want to go on this trip." 

"Maybe you're right," Gennaro said. "I'm missing my kid's birthday." Saturday was Amanda's 
birthday, and Elizabeth had invited twenty screaming four-year-olds to share it, as well as Cappy 
the Clown and a magician. His wife hadn't been happy to hear that Gennaro was going out of 
town. Neither was Amanda. 

"Well, | did the best | could on short notice," his secretary said. "There's running shoes your 
size, and khaki shorts and shirts, and a shaving kit. A pair of jeans and a sweatshirt if it gets cold. 
The car is downstairs to take you to the airport. You have to leave now to make the flight." 

She left. Gennaro walked down the hallway, tearing the sales tags off the suitcase. As he 
passed the all-glass conference room, Dan Ross left the table and came outside. 

"Have a good trip," Ross said. "But let's be very clear about one thing. | don't know how bad 
this situation actually is, Donald. But if there's a problem on that island, burn it to the ground." 

"Jesus, Dan... We're talking about a big investment." 

"Don't hesitate. Don't think about it. Just do it. Hear me?" 

Gennaro nodded. "I hear you," he said. "But Hammond- " 

"Screw Hammond," Ross said. 


"My boy, my boy," the familiar raspy voice said. "How have you been, my boy?" 

"Very well, sir," Gennaro replied. He leaned back in the padded leather chair of the Gulfstream II 
jet as it flew east, toward the Rocky Mountains. 

"You never call me any more," Hammond said reproachfully. "I've missed you, Donald. How is 
your lovely wife?" 

"She's fine. Elizabeth's fine. We have a little girl now." 

"Wonderful, wonderful. Children are such a delight. She'd get a kick out of our new park in 
Costa Rica." 

Gennaro had forgotten how short Hammond was; as he sat in the chair, his feet didn't touch 
the carpeting-he swung his legs as he talked. There was a childlike quality to the man, even 
though Hammond must now be . . . what? Seventy-five? Seventy-six? Something like that. He 
looked older than Gennaro remembered, but then, Gennaro hadn't seen him for almost five 
years. 

Hammond was flamboyant, a born showman, and back in 1983 he had had an elephant that 
he carried around with him in a little cage. The elephant was nine inches high and a foot long, 
and perfectly formed, except his tusks were stunted. Hammond took the elephant with him to 
fund-raising meetings. Gennaro usually carried it into the room, the cage covered with a little 
blanket, like a tea cozy, and Hammond would give his usual speech about the prospects for 
developing what he called "consumer biologicals." Then, at the dramatic moment, Hammond 
would whip away the blanket to reveal the elephant. And he would ask for money. 

The elephant was always a rousing success; its tiny body, hardly bigger than a cat's, promised 
untold wonders to come from the laboratory of Norman Atherton, the Stanford geneticist who was 
Hammond's partner in the new venture. 


But as Hammond talked about the elephant, he left a great deal unsaid. For example, 
Hammond was starting a genetics company, but the tiny elephant hadn't been made by any 
genetic procedure; Atherton had simply taken a dwarf-elephant embryo and raised it in an 
artificial womb with hormonal modifications. That in itself was quite an achievement, but nothing 
like what Hammond hinted had been done. 

Also, Atherton hadn't been able to duplicate his miniature elephant, and he'd tried. For one 
thing, everybody who saw the elephant wanted one. Then, too, the elephant was prone to colds, 
particularly during winter. The sneezes coming through the little trunk filled Hammond with dread. 
And sometimes the elephant would get his tusks stuck between the bars of the cage and snort 
irritably as he tried to get free; sometimes he got infections around the tusk line. Hammond 
always fretted that his elephant would die before Atherton could grow a replacement. 

Hammond also concealed from prospective investors the fact that the elephant's behavior had 
changed substantially in the process of miniaturization. The little creature might look like an 
elephant, but he acted like a vicious rodent, quick-moving and mean-tempered. Hammond 
discouraged people from petting the elephant, to avoid nipped fingers. 

And although Hammond spoke confidently of seven billion dollars in annual revenues by 1993, 
his project was intensely speculative. Hammond had vision and enthusiasm, but there was no 
certainty that his plan would work at all. Particularly since Norman Atherton, the brains behind the 
project, bad terminal cancer-which was a final point Hammond neglected to mention. 

Even so, with Gennaro's help, Hammond got his money. Between September of 1983 and 
November of 1985, John Alfred Hammond and his "Pachyderm Portfolio" raised $870 million in 
venture capital to finance his proposed corporation, International Genetic Technologies, Inc. And 
they could have raised more, except Hammond insisted on absolute secrecy, and he offered no 
return on capital for at least five years. That scared a lot of investors off. In the end, they'd had to 
take mostly Japanese consortia. The Japanese were the only investors who had the patience. 


Sitting in the leather chair of the jet, Gennaro thought about how evasive Hammond was. The old 
man was now ignoring the fact that Gennaro's law firm had forced this trip on him. Instead, 
Hammond behaved as if they were engaged in a purely social outing. "It's too bad you didn't 
bring your family with you, Donald," he said . 

Gennaro shrugged. "It's my daughter's birthday. Twenty kids already scheduled. The cake and 
the clown. You know how it is." 

"Oh, | understand," Hammond said. "Kids set their hearts on things." 

"Anyway, is the park ready for visitors?" Gennaro asked. 

"Well, not officially," Hammond said. "But the hotel is built, so there is a place to stay. .. ." 

"And the animals?" 

"Of course, the animals are all there. All in their spaces." 

Gennaro said, "| remember in the original proposal you were hoping for a total of twelve. . . .” 

"Ob, we're far beyond that. We have two hundred and thirty-eight an'mals, Donald.” 

Two hundred and thirty-eight?" 

The old man giggled, pleased at Gennaro's reaction. "You can't imagine it. We have herds of 
them." 

"Two hundred and thirty-eight . .. How many species?" 

"Fifteen different species, Donald." 

"That's incredible," Gennaro said. "That's fantastic. And what about all the other things you 
wanted? The facilities? The computers?" 

"All of it, all of it," Hammond said. "Everything on that island is state-of-the-art. You'll see for 
yourself, Donald. It's perfectly wonderful. That's why this ... concern. . . is so misplaced. There's 
absolutely no problem with the island." 

Gennaro said, "Then there should be absolutely no problem with an inspection." 

"And there isn't," Hammond said. "But it slows things down. Everything has to stop for the 
official visit... ." 

"You've had delays anyway. You've postponed the opening." 

"Oh, that " Hammond tugged at the red silk handkerchief in the breast pocket of his sportcoat. 
"It was bound to happen. Bound to happen." 

"Why?" Gennaro asked. 


"Well, Donald," Hammond said, "to explain that, you have to go back to the initial concept of 
the resort. The concept of the most advanced amusement park in the world, combining the latest 
electronic and biological technologies. I'm not talking about rides. Everybody has rides. Coney 
Island has rides. And these days everybody has animatronic environments. The haunted house, 
the pirate den, the wild west, the earthquake-everyone has those things. So we set out to make 
biological attractions. Living attractions. Attractions so astonishing they would capture the 
imagination of the entire world." 

Gennaro had to smile. It was almost the same speech, word for word, that he had used on the 
investors, SO many years ago. "And we can never forget the ultimate object of the project in 
Costa Rica-to make money," Hammond said, staring out the windows of the jet. "Lots and lots of 
money. 

"| remember," Gennaro said. 

"And the secret to making money in a park," Hammond said, "is to limit your Personnel costs. 
The food handlers, ticket takers, cleanup crews, repair teams. To make a park that runs with 
minimal staff. That was why we invested in all the computer technology-we automated wherever 
we could.” 

"| remember. . . ." 

"But the plain fact is," Hammond said, when you put together all the animals and all the 
computer systems, you run into snags. Who ever got a major computer system up and running 
on schedule? Nobody | know." 

"So you've just had normal start-up delays?" 

"Yes, that's right," Hammond said. "Normal delays." 

"| heard there were accidents during construction," Gennaro said. "Some workmen died. . . ." 

"Yes, there were several accidents," Hammond said. "And a total of three deaths. Two workers 
died building the cliff road. One other died as a result of an earth-mover accident in January. But 
we haven't had any accidents for months now." He put his band on the younger man's arm. 
"Donald," he said, "believe me when | tell you that everything on the island is going forward as 
planned. Everything on that island is perfectly fine." 

The intercom clicked. The pilot said, "Seat belts, please. We're landing in Choteau." 


Choteau 


Dry plains stretched away toward distant black buttes. The afternoon wind blew dust and 
tumbleweed across the cracked concrete. Grant stood with Ellie near the Jeep and waited while 
the sleek Grumman jet circled for a landing. 

"| hate to wait on the money men," Grant grumbled. 

Ellie shrugged."Goes with the job." 

Although many fields of science, such as physics and chemistry, had become federally funded, 
paleontology remained strongly dependent on private patrons. Quite apart from his own curiosity 
about the island in Costa Rica, Grant understood that, if John Hammond asked for his help, he 
would give it. That was how patronage worked-how it had always worked. 

The little jet landed and rolled quickly toward them. Ellie shouldered her bag. The iet came to a 
stop and a stewardess in a blue uniform opened the door. 

Inside, he was surprised at how cramped it was, despite the luxurious appointments. Grant 
had to hunch over as he went to shake Hammond's hand. 

"Dr. Grant and Dr. Sattler," Hammond said. "It's good of you to join us. Allow me to introduce 
my associate, Donald Gennaro." 

Gennaro was a stocky, muscular man in his mid-thirties wearing an Armani suit and wire-frame 
glasses. Grant disliked him on sight. He shook hands quickly. When Ellie shook hands, Gennaro 
said in surprise, "You're a woman." 

"These things happen," she said, and Grant thought: She doesn't like him, either- 

Hammond turned to Gennaro. "You know, of course, what Dr. Grant and Dr. Sattler do. They 
are paleontologists. They dig up dinosaurs." And then he began to laugh, as if he found the idea 
very funny. 

"Take your seats, please," the stewardess said, closing the door. Immediately the plane began to 
move. 


"You'll have to excuse us," Hammond said, "but we are in a bit of a rush. Donald thinks it's 
important we get right down there." 

The pilot announced four hours' flying time to Dallas, where they would refuel, and then go on 
to Costa Rica, arriving the following morning. 

"And how long will we be in Costa Rica?" Grant asked. 

"Well, that really depends," Gennaro said. "We have a few things to clear up." 

"Take my word for it," Hammond said, turning to Grant. "We'll be down there no more than 
forty-eight hours." 

Grant buckled his seat belt. "This island of yours that we're going to-| haven't heard anything 
about it before. Is it some kind of secret?" 

"In a way," Hammond said. "We have been very, very careful about making sure nobody 
knows about it, until the day we finally open that island to a surprised and delighted public." 


Target of Opportunity 


The Biosyn Corporation of Cupertino, California, had never called an emergency meeting of its 
board of directors. The ten directors now sitting in the conference room were irritable and 
impatient. It was 8:00 p.m. They had been talking among themselves for the last ten minutes, but 
slowly had fallen silent. Shuffling papers. Looking pointedly at their watches. 

"What are we waiting for?" one asked. 

"One more," Lewis Dodgson said. "We need one more." He glanced at his watch. Ron Meyer's 
office had said he was coming up on the six o'clock plane from San Diego. He should be here by 
now, even allowing for traffic from the airport. 

"You need a quorum?" another director asked. 

"Yes," Dodgson said. "We do." 

That shut them up for a moment. A quorum meant that they were going to be asked to make 
an important decision. And God knows they were, although Dodgson would have preferred not to 
call a meeting at all. But Steingarten, the head of Biosyn, was adamant. "You'll have to get their 
agreement for this one, Lew," he had said. 

Depending on who you talked to, Lewis Dodgson was famous as the most aggressive 
geneticist of his generation, or the most reckless. Thirty-four, balding, hawk-faced, and intense, 
he had been dismissed by Johns Hopkins as a graduate student, for planning gene therapy on 
human patients without obtaining the proper FDA protocols. Hired by Biosyn, he had conducted 
the controversial rabies vaccine test in Chile. Now he was the head of product development at 
Biosyn, which supposedly consisted of "reverse engineering": taking a competitor's product, 
tearing it apart, learning how it worked, and then making your own version. In practice, it involved 
industrial espionage, much of it directed toward the InGen corporation. 

In the 1980s, a few genetic engineering companies began to ask, "What is the biological 
equivalent of a Sony Walkman?" These companies weren't interested in pharmaceuticals or 
health; they were interested in entertainment, sports, leisure activities, cosmetics, and pets. The 
perceived demand for "consumer biologicals" in the 1990s was high. InGen and Biosyn were 
both at work in this field. 

Biosyn had already achieved some success, engineering a new, pale trout under contract to 
the Department of Fish and Game of the State of Idaho. This trout was easier to spot in streams, 
and was said to represent a step forward in angling. (At least, it eliminated complaints to the Fish 
and Came Department that there were no trout in the streams.) The fact that the pale trout 
sometimes died of sunburn, and that its flesh was soggy and tasteless, was not discussed. 
Biosyn was still working on that, and- 

The door opened and Ron Meyer entered the room, slipped into a seat. Dodgson now had his 
quorum. He immediately stood. 

"Gentlemen," he said, "we're here tonight to consider a target of opportunity: InGen." 

Dodgson quickly reviewed the background. InGen's start-up in 1983, with Japanese investors. 
The purchase of three Cray XMP supercomputers. The purchase of Isla Nublar in Costa Rica. 
The stockpiling of amber. The unusual donations to zoos around the world, from the New York 
Zoological Society to the Rantbapur Wildlife Park in India. 


"Despite all these clues," Dodgson said, "we still had no idea where InGen might be going. The 
company seemed obviously focused on animals; and they had hired researchers with an interest in 
the past-paleoblologists, DNA phylogeneticists, and so on. 

"Then, in 1987, InGen bought an obscure company called Millipore Plastic Products in 
Nashville, Tennessee. This was an agribusiness company that had recently patented a new 
plastic with the characteristics of an avian eggshell. This plastic could be shaped into an egg and 
used to grow chick embryos. Starting the following year, InGen took the entire output of this 
millipore plastic for its own use." 

"Dr. Dodgson, this is all very interesting-" 

"At the same time," Dodgson continued, "construction was begun on Isla Nublar, This involved 
massive earthworks, including a shallow lake two miles long, in the center of the island. Plans for 
resort facilities were let out with a high degree of confidentiality, but it appears that InGen has 
built a private zoo of large dimensions on the island." 

One of the directors leaned forward and said, "Dr. Dodgson. So what?" 

"It's not an ordinary zoo," Dodgson said. "This zoo is unique in the world. It seems that InGen 
has done something quite extraordinary. They have managed to clone extinct animals from the 
past." 

"What animals?" 

"Animals that hatch from eggs, and that require a lot of room in a zoo." 

"What animals?" 

"Dinosaurs," Dodgson said. "They are cloning dinosaurs." 


The consternation that followed was entirely misplaced, in Dodgson's view. The trouble with 
money men was that they didn't keep up: they had invested in a field, but they didn't know what 
was possible. 

In fact, there had been discussion of cloning dinosaurs in the technical literature as far back as 
1982. With each passing year, the manipulation of DNA had grown easier. Genetic material had 
already been extracted from Egyptian mummies, and from the hide of a quagga, a zebra-like 
African animal that had become extinct in the 1880s. By 1985, it seemed possible that quagga 
DNA might be reconstituted, and a new animal grown. If so, it would be the first creature brought 
back from extinction solely by reconstruction of its DNA. If that was possible, what else was also 
possible? The mastodon? The saber-toothed tiger? The dodo? 

Or even a dinosaur? 

Of course, no dinosaur DNA was known to exist anywhere in the world. But by grinding up 
large quantities of dinosaur bones it might be possible to extract fragments of DNA. Formerly it 
was thought that fossilization eliminated all DNA. Now that was recognized as untrue. If enough 
DNA fragments were recovered, it might be possible to clone a living animal. 

Back in 1982, the technical problems had seemed daunting. But there was no theoretical 
barrier. It was merely difficult, expensive, and unlikely to work, Yet it was certainly possible, if 
anyone cared to try. 

InGen had apparently decided to try. 

"What they have done," Dodgson said, "is build the greatest single tourist attraction in the 
history of the world. As you know, zoos are extremely popular. Last year, more Americans visited 
zoos than all professional baseball and football games combined. And the Japanese love zoos- 
there are fifty zoos in Japan, and more being built. And for this zoo, InGen can charge whatever 
they want, Two thousand dollars a day, ten thousand dollars a day . . . And then there is the 
merchandising. The picture books, T-shirts, video games, caps, stuffed toys, comic books, and 
pets.” 

"Pets?" 

"Of course. If InGen can make full-size dinosaurs, they can also make pygmy dinosaurs as 
household pets. What child won't want a little dinosaur as a pet? A little patented animal for their 
very own. InGen will sell millions of them. And InGen will engineer them so that these pet 
dinosaurs can only eat InGen pet food. .. ." 

"Jesus," somebody said. 

"Exactly," Dodgson said. "The zoo is the centerpiece of an enormous enterprise." 

"You said these dinosaurs will be patented?" 


"Yes. Genetically engineered animals can now be patented. The Supreme Court ruled on that 
in favor of Harvard in 1987. InGen will own its dinosaurs, and no one else can legally make 
them." 

"What prevents us from creating our own dinosaurs?" someone said. 

"Nothing, except that they have a five-year start. It'll be almost impossible to catch up before 
the end of the century." 

He paused. "Of course, if we could obtain examples of their dinosaurs, we could reverse 
engineer them and make our own, with enough modifications in the DNA to evade their patents." 

"Can we obtain examples of their dinosaurs?" 

Dodgson paused. "! believe we can, yes." 

Somebody cleared his throat. "There wouldn't be anything illegal about it. . . ." 

"Oh no," Dodgson said quickly. "Nothing illegal. I'm talking about a legitimate source of their 
DNA. A disgruntled employee, or some trash improperly disposed of, something like that." 

"Do you have a legitimate source, Dr. Dodgson?" 

"| do," Dodgson said. "But I'm afraid there is some urgency to the decision, because InGen is 
experiencing a small crisis, and my source will have to act within the next twenty-four hours." 

A long silence descended over the room. The men looked at the secretary, taking notes, and 
the tape recorder on the table in front of her. 

"| don't see the need for a formal resolution on this," Dodgson said. "Just a sense of the room, 
as to whether you feel | should proceed. . . ." 

Slowly the heads nodded. 

Nobody spoke. Nobody went on record. They just nodded silently. 

“Thank you for coming, gentlemen," Dodgson said. "I'll take it from here." 


Airport 


Lewis Dodgson entered the coffee shop in the departure building of the San Francisco airport 
and looked around quickly. His man was already there, waiting at the counter. Dodgson sat down 
next to him and placed the briefcase on the floor between them. 

"You're late, pal," the man said. He looked at the straw hat Dodgson was wearing and laughed. 
"What is this supposed to be, a disguise?" 

"You never know," Dodgson said, suppressing his anger. For six months, Dodgson had 
patiently cultivated this man, who had grown more obnoxious and arrogant with each meeting. 
But there was nothing Dodgson could do about tbat-both men knew exactly what the stakes 
were. 

Bioengineered DNA was, weight for weight, the most valuable material in the world. A single 
microscopic bacterium, too small to see with the naked eye, but containing the genes for a heart- 
attack enzyme, streptokinase, or for "ice-minus," which prevented frost damage to crops, might 
be worth five billion dollars to the right buyer. 

And that fact of life had created a bizarre new world of industrial espionage. Dodgson was 
especially skilled at it. In 1987, he convinced a disgruntled geneticist to quit Cetus for Biosyn, and 
take five strains of engineered bacteria with her. The geneticist simply put a drop of each on the 
fingernails of one hand, and walked out the door. 

But InGen presented a tougher challenge. Dodgson wanted more than bacterial DNA; he 
wanted frozen embryos, and he knew InGen guarded its embryos with the most elaborate 
security measures. To obtain them, he needed an InGen employee who had access to the 
embryos, who was willing to steal them, and who could defeat the security. Such a person was 
not easy to find. 

Dodgson had finally located a susceptible InGen employee earlier in the year. Although this 
particular person had no access to genetic material, Dodgson kept up the contact, meeting the 
man monthly at Carlos and Charlie's in Silicon Valley, helping him in small ways. And now that 
InGen was inviting contractors and advisers to visit the island, it was the moment that Dodgson 
had been waiting for-because it meant his man would have access to embryos. 

"Let's get down to it," the man said. "I've got ten minutes before my flight," 

"You want to go over it again?" Dodgson said. 

"Hell no, Dr. Dodgson," the man said. "| want to see the damn money." 


Dodgson flipped the latch on the briefcase and opened it a few inches. The man glanced down 
casually. "That's all of it?" 

"That's half of it. Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars." 

"Okay. Fine." The man turned away, drank his coffee. "That's fine, Dr. Dodgson." 

Dodgson quickly locked the briefcase. "That's for all fifteen species, you remember." 

"| remember. Fifteen species, frozen embryos. And how am | going to transport them?" 

Dodgson handed the man a large can of Gillette Foamy shaving cream. 

"That's it?" "That's 

it.” 

"They may check my luggage. . . ." 

Dodgson shrugged. "Press the top," he said. 

The man pressed it, and white shaving cream puffed into his hand. "Not bad." He wiped the 
foam on the edge of his plate. "Not bad." 

"The can's a little heavier than usual, is all." Dodgson's technical team had been assembling it 
around the clock for the last two days. Quickly he showed him how it worked. 

"How much coolant gas is inside?" 

"Enough for thirty-six hours. The embryos have to be back in San Jos, by then." 

"That's up to your guy in the boat," the man said. "Better make sure he has a portable cooler 
on board." 

"I'll do that," Dodgson said. 

"And let's just review the bidding. .. ." 

"The deal is the same," Dodgson said. "Fifty thousand on delivery of each embryo. If they're 
viable, an additional fifty thousand each." 

"That's fine. Just make sure you have the boat waiting at the east dock of the island, Friday 
night. Not the north dock, Where the big supply boats arrive. The east dock. It's a small utility 
dock. You got that?" 

"| got it," Dodgson said. "When will you be back in San Jos,?" 

"Probably Sunday." The man pushed away from the counter. 

Dodgson fretted. "You're sure you know how to work the-" 

"| Know," the man said. "Believe me, | know." 

"Also," Dodgson said, "we think the island maintains constant radio contact with InGen 
corporate headquarters in California, so-" 

"Look, I've got it covered," the man said. "Just relax, and get the money ready. | want it all 
Sunday morning, in San Jos, airport, in cash." 

"It'll be waiting for you," Dodgson said. "Don't worry." 


Malcolm 


Shortly before midnight, be stepped on the plane at the Dallas airport, a tall, thin, balding man of 
thirty-five, dressed entirely in black: black shirt, black trousers, black socks, black sneakers. 

"Ah, Dr. Malcolm," Hammond said, smiling with forced graciousness. 

Malcolm grinned. "Hello, John. Yes, | am afraid your old nemesis is here." 

Malcolm shook bands with everyone, saying quickly, "lan Malcolm, how do you do? | do 
maths." He struck Grant as being more amused by the outing than anything else. 

Certainly Grant recognized his name. lan Malcolm was one of the most famous of the new 
generation of mathematicians who were openly interested in "how the real world works." These 
scholars broke with the cloistered tradition of mathematics in several important ways. For one 
thing, they used computers constantly, a practice traditional mathematicians frowned on. For 
another, they worked almost exclusively with nonlinear equations, in the emerging field called 
chaos theory. For a third, they appeared to care that their mathematics described something that 
actually existed in the real world. And finally, as if to emphasize their emergence from academia 
into the world, they dressed and spoke with what one senior mathematician called "a deplorable 
excess of personality." In fact, they often behaved like rock stars. 

Malcolm sat in one of the padded chairs. The stewardess asked him if he wanted a drink. He 
said, "Diet Coke, shaken not stirred." 

Humid Dallas air drifted through the open door. Ellie said, "Isn't it a little warm for black?" 


"You're extremely pretty, Dr. Sattler," he said. "I could look at your legs all day. But no, as a 
matter of fact, black is an excellent Color for heat. If you remember your black-body radiation, 
black is actually best in heat. Efficient radiation. In any case, | wear only two colors, black and 
gray." 

Ellie was staring at him, her mouth open. "These colors are appropriate for any occasion," 
Malcolm continued, and they go well together, should | mistakenly put on a pair of gray socks 
with my black trousers." 

"But don't you find it boring to wear only two colors?" 

"Not at all. | find it liberating. | believe my life has value, and | don't want to waste it thinking 
about clothing," Malcolm said. "I don't want to think about what | will wear in the morning. Truly, 
can you imagine anything more boring than fashion? Professional sports, perhaps. Grown men 
swatting little balls, while the rest of the world pays money to applaud. But, on the whole, | find 
fashion even more tedious than sports.” 

"Dr. Malcolm," Hammond explained, "is a man of strong opinions." 

"And mad as a hatter," Malcolm said cheerfully. "But you must admit, these are nontrivial 
issues. We live in a world of frightful givens. It is given that you will behave like this, given that 
you will care about that. No one thinks about the givens. Isn't it amazing? In the information 
society, nobody thinks. We expected to banish paper, but we actually banished thought." 

Hammond turned to Gennaro and raised his hands. "You invited him." 

"And a lucky thing, too," Malcolm said. "Because it sounds as if you have a serious problem." 

"We have no problem," Hammond said quickly. 

"| always maintained this island would be unworkable," Malcolm said. "| predicted it from the 
beginning.” He reached into a soft leather briefcase. "And | trust by now we all know what the 
eventual outcome is going to be. You're going to have to shut the thing down." 

"Shut it down!" Hammond stood angrily. "This is ridiculous." 

Malcolm shrugged, indifferent to Hammond's outburst. "I've brought copies of my original 
paper for you to took at," he said. "The original consultancy paper | did for InGen. The 
mathematics are a bit sticky, but | can walk you through it. Are you leaving now?" 

"| have some phone calls to make," Hammond said, and went into the adjoining cabin. 

"Well, it's a long flight," Malcolm said to the others. "At least my paper will give you something 
to do." 


The plane flew through the night. 

Grant knew that lan Malcolm had his share of detractors, and he could understand why some 
found his style too abrasive, and his applications of chaos theory too glib. Grant thumbed through 
the paper, glancing at the equations. 

Gennaro said, "Your paper concludes that Hammond's island is bound to fail?" 

"Correct." 

"Because of chaos theory?" 

"Correct. To be more precise, because of the behavior of the system in phase space." 
Gennaro tossed the paper aside and said, "Can you explain this in English?" 

"Surely," Malcolm said. "Let's see where we have to start. You know what a nonlinear equation 

"No." 

"Strange attractors?" 

"No." 

"All right," Malcolm said. "Let's go back to the beginning." He paused, staring at the ceiling. 
"Physics has had great success at describing certain kinds of behavior: planets in orbit, 
spacecraft going to the moon, pendulums and springs and rolling balls, that sort of thing. The 
regular movement of objects. These are described by what are called linear equations, and 
mathematicians can solve those equations easily. We've been doing it for hundreds of years." 

"Okay," Gennaro said. 

"But there is another kind of behavior, which physics handles badly. For example, anything to 
do with turbulence. Water coming out of a spout. Air moving over an airplane wing. Weather. 
Blood flowing through the heart. Turbulent events are described by nonlinear equations. They're 
bard to solve-in fact, they're usually impossible to solve. So physics has never understood this 


whole class of events. Until about ten years ago. The new theory that describes them is called 
chaos theory. 

"Chaos theory originally grew out of attempts to make computer models of weather in the 
1960s. Weather is a big complicated system, namely the earth's atmosphere as it interacts with 
the land and the sun. The behavior of this big complicated system always defied understanding. 
So naturally we couldn't predict weather. But what the early researchers learned from computer 
models was that, even if you could understand it, you still couldn't predict it. Weather prediction is 
absolutely impossible. The reason is that the behavior of the system is sensitively dependent on 
initial conditions." 

"You lost me," Gennaro said. 

use acannon to fire a shell of a certain weight, at a certain speed, and a certain angle of 
inclination-and if | then fire a second shell with almost the same weight, speed, and angle-what 
well happen?" 

"The two shells will land at almost the same spot." 

"Right," Malcolm said. "That's linear dynamics." 

"Okay." 

"But if | have a weather system that | start up with a certain temperature and a certain wind 
speed and a certain humidity-and if | then repeat it with almost the same temperature, wind, and 
humidity-the second system will not behave almost the same. It'll wander off and rapidly will 
become very different from the first. Thunderstorms instead of sunshine. That's nonlinear 
dynamics. They are sensitive to initial conditions: tiny differences become amplified." 

"| think | see," Gennaro said. 

"The shorthand is the ‘butterfly effect.’ A butterfly flaps its wings in Peking, and weather in New 
York is different." 

"So chaos is all just random and unpredictable?" Gennaro said. "Is that it?" 

"No," Malcolm said. "We actually find bidden regularities within the complex variety of a 
system's behavior. That's why chaos has now become a very broad theory that's used to study 
everything from the stock market, to rioting crowds, to brain waves during epilepsy. Any sort of 
complex system where there is confusion and unpredictability. We can find an underlying order. 
Okay?" 

"Okay," Gennaro said. "But what is this underlying order?" 

"It's essentially characterized by the movement of the system within phase space," Malcolm 
said. 

"Jesus," Gennaro said. "All | want to know is why you think Hammond's island can't work." 

"| understand," Malcolm said. "I'll get there. Chaos theory says two things. First, that complex 
systems like weather have an underlying order. Second, the reverse of that-that simple systems 
can produce complex behavior. For example, pool balls. You hit a pool ball, and it starts to carom 
off the sides of the table. In theory, that's a fairly simple system, almost a Newtonian system. 
Since you can know the force imparted to the ball, and the mass of the ball, and you can 
calculate the angles at which it will strike the walls, you can predict the future behavior of the ball. 
In theory, you could predict the behavior of the ball far into the future, as it keeps bouncing from 
side to side. You could predict where it will end up three hours from now, in theory." 

"Okay." Gennaro nodded. 

But in fact," Malcolm said, "it turns out you can't predict more than a few seconds into the 
future. Because almost immediately very small effects-imperfections in the surface of the ball, tiny 
indentations in the wood of the table-start to make a difference. And it doesn't take long before 
they overpower your careful calculations. So it turns out that this simple system of a pool ball ona 
table has unpredictable behavior." 

" Okay." 

"And Hammond's project," Malcolm said, "is another apparently simple system-animals within 
a zoo environment-that will eventually show unpredictable behavior." 

"You know this because of . . ." 

"Theory," Malcolm said. 

"But hadn't you better see the island, to see what he's actually done?" 

"No. That is quite unnecessary. The details don't matter. Theory tells me that the island will 
quickly proceed to behave in unpredictable fashion. 


"And you're confident of your theory." 
"Ob, yes," Malcolm said. "Totally confident." He sat back in the chair. "There is a problem with 
that island. It is an accident waiting to happen." 


Isla Nublar 


With a whine, the rotors began to swing in circles overhead, casting shadows on the runway of 
San Jos, airport. Grant listened to the crackle in his earphones as the pilot talked to the tower. 

They had picked up another passenger in San Jos,, a man named Dennis Nedry, who had 
flown In to meet them. He was fat and sloppy, eating a candy bar, and there was sticky chocolate 
on his fingers, and flecks of aluminum foil on his shirt. Nedry had mumbled something about 
doing computers on the island, and hadn't offered to shake hands. 

Through the Plexi bubble Grant watched the airport concrete drop away beneath his feet, and 
he saw the shadow of the helicopter racing along as they went west, toward the mountains. 

"It's about a forty-minute trip," Hammond said, from one of the rear seats. 

Grant watched the low hills rise up, and then they were passing through intermittent clouds, 
breaking out into sunshine. The mountains were rugged, though he was surprised at the amount 
of deforestation, acre after acre of denuded, eroded hills. "Costa Rica," Hammond said, "has 
better population control than other countries in Central America. But, even so, the land is badly 
deforested. Most of this is within the last ten years." 

They came down out of the clouds on the other side of the mountains, and Grant saw the 
beaches of the west coast. They flashed over a small coastal village. 

"Bahja Anasco," the pilot said. "Fishing village." He pointed north. "Up the coast there, you see 
the Cabo Blanco preserve. They have beautiful beaches." The pilot headed straight out over the 
ocean. The water turned green, and then deep aquamarine. The sun shone on the water. It was 
about ten in the morning. 

"Just a few minutes now," Hammond said, "and we should be seeing Isla Nublar." 

Isla Nublar, Hammond explained, was not a true island. Rather, it was a seamount, a volcanic 
upthrusting of rock from the ocean floor. "Its volcanic origins can be seen all over the island," 
Hammond said. "There are steam vents in many places, and the ground is often hot underfoot. 
Because of this, and also because of prevailing currents, Isla Nublar lies in a foggy area. As we 
get there you will see-ah, there we are." 

The helicopter rushed forward, low to the water. Ahead Grant saw an island, rugged and 
craggy, rising sharply from the ocean. 

"Christ, it looks like Alcatraz," Malcolm said. 

Its forested slopes were wreathed in fog, giving the island a mysterious appearance. 

"Much larger, of course," Hammond said. "Eight miles long and three miles wide at the widest 
point, in total some twenty-two square Miles. Making it the largest private animal preserve in 
North America." 

The helicopter began to climb, and headed toward the north end of the island. Grant was trying 
to see through the dense fog. 

"It's not usually this thick," Hammond said. He sounded worried. 

At the north end of the island, the hills were highest, rising more than two thousand feet above 
the ocean. The tops of the hills were in fog, but Grant saw rugged cliffs and crashing ocean 
below. The helicopter climbed above the hills, "Unfortunately," Hammond said, "we have to land 
on the island. | don't like to do it, because it disturbs the animals. And it's sometimes a bit thrilling- 


Hammond's voice cut off as the pilot said, "Starting our descent now. Hang on, folks." The 
helicopter started down, and immediately they were blanketed in fog. Grant heard a repetitive 
electronic beeping through his earphones, but he could see nothing at all; then he began dimly to 
discern the green branches of pine trees, reaching through the mist. Some of the branches were 
close. 

"How the hell is he doing this?" Malcolm said, but nobody answered. 

The pilot swung his gaze left, then right, looking at the pine forest. The trees were still close. 
The helicopter descended rapidly. 

"Jesus," Malcolm said. 


The beeping was louder. Grant looked at the pilot. He was concentrating. Grant glanced down 
and saw a giant glowing fluorescent cross beneath the Plexi bubble at his feet. There were 
flashing lights at the corners of the cross. The pilot corrected slightly and touched down ona 
helipad. The sound of the rotors faded, and died. 

Grant sighed, and released his seat belt. 

"We have to come down fast, that way," Hammond said, "because of the wind shear. There is 
often had wind shear on this peak, and. . . well, we're safe." 

Someone was running up to the helicopter. A man with a baseball cap and red hair. He threw 
open the door and said cheerfully, "Hi, I'm Ed Regis. Welcome to Isla Nublar, everybody. And 
watch your step, please." 


A narrow path wound down the hill. The air was chilly and damp. As they moved lower, the mist 
around them thinned, and Grant could see the landscape better. It looked, he thought, rather like 
the Pacific Northwest, the Olympic Peninsula. 

"That's right," Regis said. "Primary ecology is deciduous rain forest. Rather different from the 
vegetation on the mainland, which is more classical rain forest. But this is a microclimate that only 
occurs at elevation, on the slopes of the northern hills. The majority of the island is tropical." 

Down below, they could see the white roofs of large buildings, nestled among the planting. 
Grant was surprised: the construction was elaborate. They moved lower, out of the mist, and now 
he could see the full extent of the island, stretching away to the south. As Regis had said, it was 
mostly covered in tropical forest. 

To the south, rising above the palm trees, Grant saw a single trunk with no leaves at all, just a 
big curving stump. Then the stump moved, and twisted around to face the new arrivals. Grant 
realized that he was not seeing a tree at all. 

He was looking at the graceful, curving neck of an enormous creature, rising fifty feet into the 
air. 

He was looking at a dinosaur. 


Welcome 


"My God," Ellie said softly. They were all staring at the animal above the trees. "My God." 

Her first thought was that the dinosaur was extraordinarily beautiful. Books portrayed them as 
oversize, dumpy creatures, but this long-necked animal had a gracefulness, almost a dignity, 
about its movements. And it was quick-there was nothing lumbering or dull in its behavior. The 
sauropod peered alertly at them, and made a low trumpeting sound, rather like an elephant. A 
moment later, a second head rose above the foliage, and then a third, and a fourth. 

"My God," Ellie said again. 


Gennaro was speechless. He had known all along what to expect-he had known about it for 
years-but he had somehow never believed it would happen, and now, he was shocked into 
silence. The awesome power of the new genetic technology, which he had formerly considered to 
he just so many words in an overwrought sales pitch-the power suddenly became clear to him. 
These animals were so big! They were enormous! Big as a house! And so many of them! Actual 
damned dinosaurs! Just as real as you could want. 

Gennaro thought: We are going to make a fortune on this place. A fortune. He 

hoped to God the island was safe. 


Grant stood on the path on the side of the hill, with the mist on his face, staring at the gray necks 
craning above the palms. He felt dizzy, as if the ground were sloping away too steeply. He had 
trouble getting his breath. Because he was looking at something he had never expected to see in 
his life. Yet he was seeing it. 

The animals in the mist were perfect apatosaurs, medium-size sauropods. His stunned mind 
made academic associations: North American herbivores, late Jurassic horizon. Commonly 
called "brontosaurs." First discovered by E. D. Cope in Montana in 1876. Specimens associated 
with Morrison formation strata in Colorado, Utah, and Oklahoma. Recently Berman and McIntosh 
had reclassified it a diplodocus based on skull appearance, Traditionally, Brontosaurus was 


thought to spend most of its time in shallow water, which would help support its large bulk. 
Although this animal was clearly not in the water, it was moving much too quickly, the head and 
neck shifting above the palms in a very active manner-a surprisingly active manner- 

Grant began to laugh. 

"What is it?" Hammond said, worried. "Is something wrong?" 

Grant just shook his head, and continued to laugh. He couldn't tell them that what was funny 
was that he had seen the animal for only a few seconds, but he had already begun to accept it- 
and to use his observations to answer long-standing questions in the field. 

He was still laughing as he saw a fifth and a sixth neck crane up above the palm trees. The 
sauropods watched the people arrive. They reminded Grant of oversize giraffes-they had the 
same pleasant, rather stupid gaze. 

"| take it they're not animatronic," Malcolm said. "They're very lifelike." 

"Yes, they certainly are," Hammond said. "Well, they should be, shouldn't they?" 

From the distance, they heard the trumpeting sound again. First one animal made it, and then 
the others joined in. 

"That's their call," Ed Regis said. "Welcoming us to the island." 

Grant stood and listened for a moment, entranced. 

"You probably want to know what happens next," Hammond was saying, continuing down the 
path. "We've scheduled a complete tour of the facilities for you, and a trip to see the dinosaurs in 
the park later this afternoon. I'll be joining you for dinner, and will answer any remaining questions 
you may have then. Now, if you'll go with Mr. Regis. . ." 

The group followed Ed Regis toward the nearest buildings. Over the path, a crude band- 
painted sign read: "Welcome to Jurassic Park." 


THIRD ITERATION 


"Details emerge more clearly as the fractal curve is redrawn." 


IAN MALCOM 
Jurassic Park 


They moved into a green tunnel of overarching palms leading toward the main visitor building. 
Everywhere, extensive and elaborate planting emphasized the feeling that they were entering a 
new world, a prehistoric tropical world, and leaving the normal world behind. 

Ellie said to Grant, "They look pretty good." 

"Yes," Grant said. "| want to see them up close. | want to lift up their toe pads and inspect their 
claws and feel their skin and open their laws and have a look at their teeth. Until then | don't know 
for sure. But yes, they look good. " 

"| suppose it changes your field a bit," Malcolm said. 

Grant shook his head. "It changes everything," he said. 

For 150 years, ever since the discovery of gigantic animal bones in Europe, the study of 
dinosaurs had been an exercise in scientific deduction. Paleontology was essentially detective 
work, searching for clues in the fossil bones and the trackways of the long-vanished giants. The 
best paleontologists were the ones who could make the most clever deductions. 

And all the great disputes of paleontology were carried out in this fashion-including the bitter 
debate, in which Grant was a key figure, about whether dinosaurs were warm-blooded. 

Scientists had always classified dinosaurs as reptiles, cold-blooded creatures drawing the heat 
they needed for life from the environment. A mammal could metabolize food to produce bodily 
warmth, but a reptile could not. Eventually a handful of researchers-led chiefly by John Ostrom 
and Robert Bakker at Yale-began to suspect that the concept of sluggish, cold-blooded dinosaurs 
was inadequate to explain the fossil record. In classic deductive fashion, they drew conclusions 
from several lines of evidence. 

First was posture: lizards and reptiles were bent-legged sprawlers, hugging the ground for 
warmth. Lizards didn't have the energy to stand on their hind legs for more than a few seconds. 
But the dinosaurs stood on straight legs, and many walked erect on their hind legs. Among living 
animals, erect posture occurred only in warm-blooded mammals and birds. Thus dinosaur 
posture suggested warm-bloodedness. 

Next they studied metabolism, calculating the pressure necessary to push blood up the 
eigbteen-foot-long neck of a brachlosaur, and concluding that it could only be accomplished by a 
four-chambered, hot-blooded heart. 

They studied trackways, fossil footprints left in mud, and concluded that dinosaurs ran as fast 
as a man; such activity implied warm blood. They found dinosaur remains above the Arctic Circle, 
in a frigid environment unimaginable for a reptile. And the new studies of group behavior, based 
largely on Grant's own work, suggested that dinosaurs had a complex social life and reared their 
young, as reptiles did not. Crocodiles and turtles abandon their eggs. But dinosaurs probably did 
not. 

The warm-blooded controversy had raged for fifteen years, before a new perception of 
dinosaurs as quick-moving, active animals was acecpted-but not without lasting animosities. At 
conventions, there were still colleagues who did not speak to one another. 

But now, if dinosaurs could be cloned-why, Grant's field of study was going to change instantly. 
The paleontological study of dinosaurs was finished. The whole enterprise-the museum balls with 
their giant skeletons and flocks of echoing schoolchildren, the university laboratories with their 
bone trays, the research papers, the journals-all of it was going to end. 

"You don't seem upset," Malcolm said. 

Grant shook his head. "It's been discussed, in the field. Many people imagined it was coming. 
But not so soon." 

"Story of our species," Malcolm said, laughing. "Everybody knows it's coming, but not so soon." 

As they walked down the path, they could no longer see the dinosaurs, but they could hear 
them, trumpeting softly in the distance. 

Grant said, "My only question is, where'd they get the DNA?" 

Grant was aware of serious speculation in laboratories in Berkeley, Tokyo, and London that it 
might eventually be possible to clone an extinct animal such as a dinosaur-if you could get some 
dinosaur DNA to work with. The problem was that all known dinosaurs were fossils, and the 
fossilization destroyed most DNA, replacing it with inorganic material. Of course, if a dinosaur 
was frozen, or preserved in a peat bog, or mummified in a desert environment, then its DNA 
might be recoverable. 


But nobody had ever found a frozen or mummified dinosaur. So cloning was therefore 
impossible. There was nothing to clone from. All the modern genetic technology was useless, It 
was like having a Xerox copier but nothing to copy with it. 

Ellie said, "You can't reproduce a real dinosaur, because you can't get real dinosaur DNA." 

"Unless there's a way we haven't thought of," Grant said. "Like what?" she said. "I don't 

know," Grant said. 


Beyond a fence, they came to the swimming pool, which spilled over into a series of waterfalls 
and smaller rocky pools. The area was planted with huge ferns. "Isn't this extraordinary?" Ed 
Regis said. "Especially on a misty day, these plants really contribute to the prehistoric 
atmosphere. These are authentic Jurassic ferns, of course." 

Ellie paused to look more closely at the ferns. Yes, it was just as he said: Serenna veriformans, a 
plant found abundantly in fossils more than two hundred million years old, now common only in 
the wetlands of Brazil and Colombia. But whoever had decided to place this particular fern at 
poolside obviously didn't know that the spores of veriformans contained a deadly beta-carboline 
alkaloid. Even touching the attractive green fronds could make you sick, and if a child were to 
take a mouthful, he would almost certainly die-the toxin was fifty times more poisonous than 
oleander. 

People were so naive about plants, Ellie thought. They just chose plants for appearance, as 
they would choose a picture for the wall. It never occurred to them that plants were actually living 
things, busily performing all the living functions of respiration, ingestion, excretion, reproduction- 
and defense. 

But Ellie knew that, in the earth's history, plants had evolved as competitively as animals, and 
in some ways more fiercely. The poison in Serenna veriformans was a minor example of the 
elaborate chemical arsenal of weapons that plants had evolved. There were terpenes, which 
plants spread to poison the soil around them and inhibit competitors; alkaloids, which made them 
unpalatable to insects and predators (and children); and pheromones, used for communication. 
When a Douglas fir tree was attacked by beetles, it produced an anti-feedant chemical-and so did 
other Douglas firs in distant parts of the forest. It happened in response to a warning 
alleochemical secreted by the trees that were under attack. 

People who imagined that life on earth consisted of animals moving against a green 
background seriously misunderstood what they were seeing. That green background was busily 
alive. Plants grew, moved, twisted, and turned, fighting for the sun; and they interacted 
continuously with ammals-discouraging some with bark and thorns; poisoning others, and feeding 
still others to advance their own reproduction, to spread their pollen and seeds. It was a complex, 
dynamic process which she never ceased to find fascinating. And which she knew most people 
simply didn't understand. 

But if planting deadly ferns at poolside was any indication, then it was clear that the designers of 
Jurassic Park had not been as careful as they should have been. 

"Isn't it just wonderful?" Ed Regis was saying. "If you look up ahead, you'll see our Safari 
Lodge." Ellie saw a dramatic, low building, with a series of glass pyramids on the roof. "That's 
where you'll all be staying here in Jurassic Park." 


Grant's suite was done in beige tones, the rattan furniture in green jungle-print motifs. The room 
wasn't quite finished; there were stacks of lumber in the closet, and pieces of electrical conduit on 
the floor. There was a television set in the corner, with a card on top: 


Channel 2: Hypsilophodont Highlands 
Channel 3: Triceratops Territory 
Channel 4: Sauropod Swamp 
Channel 5: Carnivore Country 
Channel 6: Stegosaurus South 
Channel 7: Velociraptor Valley 
Channel 8: Pterosaur Peak 


He found the names irritatingly cute. Grant turned on the television but got only static. He shut 
it off and went into his bedroom, tossed his suitcase on the bed. Directly over the bed was a large 
pyramidal skylight. It created a tented feeling, like sleeping under the stars. Unfortunately the 
glass had to be protected by heavy bars, so that striped shadows fell across the bed. 

Grant paused. He had seen the plans for the lodge, and be didn't remember bars on the 
skylight. In fact, these bars appeared to be a rather crude addition. A black steel frame had been 
constructed outside the glass walls, and the bars welded to the frame. 

Puzzled, Grant moved from the bedroom to the living room. His window looked out on the 
swimming pool. 

"By the way, those ferns are poison," Ellie said, walking into his room. "But did you notice 
anything about the rooms, Alan?" 

"They changed the plans." 

"| think so, yes." She moved around the room. "The windows are small," she said. "And the 
glass is tempered, set in a steel frame. The doors are steel-clad. That shouldn't be necessary. 
And did you see the fence when we came in?" 

Grant nodded. The entire lodge was enclosed within a fence, with bars of incb-thick steel. The 
fence was gracefully landscaped and painted flat black to resemble wrought iron, but no cosmetic 
effort could disguise the thickness of the metal, or its twelve-foot height. 

"| don't think the fence was in the plans, either,” Ellie said. "It looks to me like they've turned 
this place into a fortress." 

Grant looked at his watch. "We'll be sure to ask why," he said. "The tour starts in twenty 
minutes." 


When Dinosaurs ruled the Earth 


They met in the visitor building: two stories high, and all glass with exposed black anodized 
girders and supports. Grant found it determinedly high-tech. 

There was a small auditorium dominated by a robot Tyrannosaurus rex, poised menacingly by 
the entrance to an exhibit area labeled WHEN DINOSAURS RULED THE EARTH. Farther on 
were other displays: WHAT IS A DINOSAUR? and THE MESOZOIC WORLD. But the exhibits 
weren't completed; there were wires and cables all over the floor. Gennaro climbed up on the 
stage and talked to Grant, Ellie, and Malcolm, his voice echoing slightly in the room. 

Hammond sat in the back, his hands folded across his chest. 

"We're about to tour the facilities," Gennaro said. "I'm sure Mr. Hammond and his staff will 
show everything in the best light. Before we go, | wanted to review why we are here, and what | 
need to decide before we leave. Basically, as you all realize by now, this is an island in which 
genetically engineered dinosaurs have been allowed to move in a natural park-like setting, 
forming a tourist attraction. The attraction isn't open to tourists yet, but it will be in a year. 

"Now, my question for you is a simple one. Is this island safe? Is it safe for visitors, and is it 
safely containing the dinosaurs?" 

Gennaro turned down the room lights. "There are two pieces of evidence which we have to 
deal with. First of all, there is Dr. Grant's identification of a previously unknown dinosaur on the 
Costa Rican mainland. This dinosaur is known only from a partial fragment. It was found in July 
of this year, after it supposedly bit an American girl on a beach. Dr. Grant can tell you more later. 
I've asked for the original fragment, which is in a lab in New York, to be flown here so that we can 
inspect it directly. Meanwhile, there is a second piece of evidence. 

"Costa Rica has an excellent medical service, and it tracks all kinds of data. Beginning in 
March, there were reports of lizards biting infants in their cribs-and also, | might add, biting old 
people who were sleeping soundly. These lizard bites were sporadically reported in coastal 
villages from Ismaloya to Puntarenas. After March, lizard bites were no longer reported. 
However, | have this graph from the Public Health Service in San Jos, of infant mortality in the 
towns of the west coast earlier this year." 


"| direct your attention to two features of this graph," Gennaro said. "First, infant mortality is low in 
the months of January and February, then spikes in March, then it's low again in April. But from 
May onward, it is high, right through July, the month the American girl was bitten. The Public 


Health Service feels that something is now affecting infant mortality, and it is not being reported 
by the workers in the coastal villages. The second feature is the puzzling biweekly spiking, which 
seems to suggest some kind of alternating phenomenon is at work." 

The lights came back on. "All right," Gennaro said. "That's the evidence | want explained. Now, 
are there any-" 

"We can save ourselves a great deal of trouble," Malcolm said. "I'll explain it for you now." 

"You will?" Gennaro said. 

"Yes," Malcolm said. "First of all, animals have very likely gotten off the island." 

"Oh balls," Hammond growled, from the back. 

"And second, the graph from the Public Health Service is almost certainly unrelated to any 
animals that have escaped." 

Grant said, "How do you know that?" 

"You'll notice that the graph alternates between high and low spikes," Malcolm said. "That is 
characteristic of many complex systems. For example, water dripping from a tap. If you turn on 
the faucet lust a little, you'll get a constant drip, drip, drip. But if you open it a little more, so that 
there's a bit of turbulence in the flow, then you'll get alternating large and small drops. Drip drip . . 
. Drip drip . . . Like that. You can try it yourself. Turbulence produces alternation-it's a signature. 
And you will get an alternating graph like this for the spread of any new illness in a community," 

"But why do you Say it isn't caused by escaped dinosaurs?" Grant said. 

"Because it is a nonlinear signature," Malcolm said. "You'd need hundreds of escaped 
dinosaurs to cause it. And | don't think hundreds of dinosaurs have escaped. So | conclude that 
some other phenomenon, such as a new variety of flu, is causing the fluctuations you see in the 
graph." 

Gennaro said, "But you think that dinosaurs have escaped?" 

" Probably, yes." 

"Why?" 

"Because of what you are attempting here. Look, this island is an attempt to re-create a natural 
environment from the past. To make an isolated world where extinct creatures roam freely. 
Correct?" 

"Yes." 

"But from my point of view, such an undertaking is impossible. The mathematics are so self- 
evident that they don't need to be calculated. It's rather like my asking you whether, on a billion 
dollars in income, you had to pay tax. You wouldn't need to pull out your calculator to check. 
You'd know tax was owed. And, similarly, | know overwhelmingly that one cannot successfully 
duplicate nature in this way, or hope to isolate it." 

"Why not? After all, there are zoos." 

"Zoos don't re-create nature," Malcolm said. "Let's be clear. Zoos take the nature that already 
exists and modify it very slightly, to create holding pens for animals. Even those minimal 
modifications often fail. The animals escape with regularity. But a zoo is not a model for this park. 
This park is attempting something far more ambitious than that. Something much more akin to 
making a space station on earth." 

Gennaro shook his head. "I don't understand." 

"Well, it's very simple. Except for the air, which flows freely, everything about this park is meant 
to be isolated. Nothing gets in, nothing out. The animals kept here are never to mix with the 
greater ecosystems of earth. They are never to escape." 

"And they never have," Hammond snorted. 

"Such isolation is impossible," Malcolm said flatly. "It simply cannot be done." 

"It can. It's done all the time." 

"| beg your pardon," Malcolm said. "But you don't know what you are talking about." 

"You arrogant little snot," Hammond said. He stood, and walked out of the room. 

"Gentlemen, gentlemen," Gennaro said. 

"I'm sorry," Malcolm said, "but the point remains. What we call 'nature’ is in fact a complex 
system of far greater subtlety than we are willing to accept. We make a simplified image of nature 
and then we botch it up, I'm no environmentalist, but you have to understand what you don't 
understand. How many times must the point be made? How many times must we see the 
evidence? We build the Aswan Dam and claim it is going to revitalize the country. Instead, it 


destroys the fertile Nile Delta, produces parasitic infestation, and wrecks the Egyptian economy. 
We build the-" 

"Excuse me," Gennaro said. "But | think | hear the helicopter. That's probably the sample for 
Dr. Grant to look at." He started out of the room. They all followed. 


At the foot of the mountain, Gennaro was screaming over the sound of the helicopter. The veins 
of his neck stood out. "You did what? You invited who?" 

"Take it easy," Hammond said. 

Gennaro screamed, "Are you out of your goddamned mind?" 

"Now, look here," Hammond said, drawing himself up. "I think we have to get something clear-" 

"No," Gennaro said. "No, you get something clear. This is not a social outing. This is not a 
weekend excursion-" 

"This is my island," Hammond said, "and | can invite whomever | want." 

"This is a serious investigation of your island because your investors are concerned that it's out 
of control. We think this is a very dangerous place, and-" 

"You're not going to shut me down, Donald-" 

"I will if | have to-" 

"This is a safe place," Hammond said, "no matter what that damn mathematician is saying-" 

"It's not-" 

"And I'll demonstrate its safety-" 

"And | want you to put them Tight back on that helicopter," Gennaro said. 

"Can't," Hammond said, pointing toward the clouds. "It's already leaving." And, indeed, the 
sound of the rotors was fading. 

"God damn it," Gennaro said, "don't you see you're needlessly risking-" 

"Ah ah," Hammond said. "Let's continue this later. | don't want to upset the children." 

Grant turned, and saw two children coming down the hillside, led by Ed Regis. There was a 
bespectacled boy of about eleven, and a girl a few years younger, perhaps seven or eight, her 
blond hair pushed up under a Mets baseball cap, and a baseball glove slung over her shoulder. 
The two kids made their way nimbly down the path from the helipad, and stopped some distance 
from Gennaro and Hammond. 

Low, under his breath, Gennaro said, "Christ." 

"Now, take it easy," Hammond said. "Their parents are getting a divorce, and | want them to 
have a fun weekend here." 

The girl waved tentatively. 

"Hi, Grandpa," she said. "We're here." 


The Tour 


Tim Murphy could see at once that something was wrong. His grandfather was in the middle of 
an argument with the younger, red-faced man opposite him. And the other adults, standing 
behind, looked embarrassed and uncomfortable. Alexis felt the tension, too, because she hung 
back, tossing her baseball in the air. He had to push her: "Go on, Lex." 

"Go on yourself, Timmy." 

"Don't be a worm," he said. 

Lex glared at him, but Ed Regis said cheerfully, "I'll introduce you to everybody, and then we 
can take the tour." 

"| have to go," Lex said. 

"I'll just introduce you first," Ed Regis said. 

"No, | have to go." 

But Ed Regis was already making introductions. First to Grandpa, who kissed them both, and 
then to the man he was arguing with. This man was muscular and his name was Gennaro. The 
rest of the introductions Were a blur to Tim. There was a blond woman wearing shorts, and a 
man with a beard who wore jeans and a Hawaiian shirt. He looked like the outdoors type. Then a 
fat college kid who had something to do with computers, and finally a thin man in black, who 
didn't shake hands, but just nodded his head. Tim was trying to organize his impressions, and 


was looking at the blond woman's legs, when he suddenly realized that he knew who the 
bearded man was. 

"Your mouth is open," Lex said. 

Tim said, "| know him." 

"Oh sure. You just met him." 

"No," Tim said. "| have his book." 

The bearded man said, "What book is that, Tim?" "Lost 

World of the Dinosaurs, " Tim said. 

Alexis snickered. "Daddy says Tim has dinosaurs on the brain," she said. 

Tim hardly heard her. He was thinking of what he knew about Alan Grant. Alan Grant was one 
of the principal advocates of the theory that dinosaurs were warm-blooded. He had done lots of 
digging at the place called Egg Hill in Montana, which was famous because so many dinosaur 
eggs had been found there. Professor Grant had found most of the dinosaur eggs that had ever 
been discovered. He was also a good illustrator, and he drew the pictures for his own books. 

"Dinosaurs on the brain?" the bearded man said. "Well, as a matter of fact, | have that same 
problem." 

"Dad says dinosaurs are really stupid," Lex said. "He says Tim should get out in the air and 
play more sports," 

Tim felt embarrassed. "I thought you had to go," he said. "Ina 

minute," Lex said. 

"| thought you were in such a rush." 

"I'm the one who would know, don't you think, Timothy?" she said putting her hands on her 
hips, copying her mother's most irritating stance. 

"Tell you what," Ed Regis said. "Why don't we all just head on over to the visitor center and we 
can begin our tour." Everybody started walking. Tim heard Gennaro whisper to his grandfather, "I 
could kill you for this," and then Tim looked up and saw that Dr Grant had fallen into step beside 
him. 

"How old are you, Tim?" 

"Eleven." 

"And how long have you been interested in dinosaurs?" Grant asked. 

Tim swallowed. "A while now," he said. He felt nervous to be talking to Dr. Grant. "We go to 
museums sometimes, when | can talk my family into it. My father.” 

"Your father's not especially interested?" 

Tim nodded, and told Grant about his family's last trip to the Museum of Natural History. His 
father had looked at a skeleton and said, "That's a big one." 

Tim had said, "No, Dad, that's a medium-size one, a camptosaurus." 

"Oh, | don't know. Looks pretty big to me." 

"It's not even full-grown, Dad." 

His father squinted at the skeleton. "What is it, Jurassic?" 

"Jeez. No. Cretaceous." 

"Cretaceous? What's the difference between Cretaceous and Jurassic?" 

"Only about a hundred million years," Tim said. 

"Cretaceous is older?" 

"No, Dad, Jurassic is older." 

"Well," his father said, stepping back, "it looks pretty damn big to me." And he turned to Tim for 
agreement. Tim knew he had better agree with his father, so he just muttered something. And 
they went on to another exhibit- 

Tim stood in front of one skeleton-Tyrannosaurus rex, the mightiest predator the earth had 
ever known-for a long time. Finally his father said, "What are you looking at?" 

"I'm counting the vertebrae," Tim said. 

"The vertebrae?" 

"In the backbone." 

| know what vertebrae are," his father said, annoyed. He stood there a while longer and then 
he said, "Why are you counting them?" 

"| think they're wrong. Tyrannosaurs should only have thirty-seven vertebrae in the tall. This 
has more." 


"You mean to tell me," his father said, "that the Museum of Natural History has a skeleton 
that's wrong? | can't believe that." 

"It's wrong," Tim said. 

His father stomped off toward a guard in the corner. "What did you do now?" his mother said to 
Tim. 

"| didn't do anything," Tim said. "I just said the dinosaur is wrong, that's all." 

And then his father came back with a funny look on his face, because of course the guard told 
him that the tyrannosaurus had too many vertebrae in the tail. 

"How'd you know that?" his father asked. "I read 

it," Tim said. 

"That's pretty amazing, son," he said, and he put his hand on his shoulder, giving it a squeeze. 
"You know how many vertebrae belong in that tail. I've never seen anything like it. You really do 
have dinosaurs on the brain." 

And then his father said he wanted to catch the last half of the Mets game on TV, and Lex said 
she did, too, so they left the museum. And Tim didn't see any other dinosaurs, which was why 
they had come there in the first place. But that was how things happened in his family. 


How things used to happen in his family, Tim corrected himself. Now that his father was getting a 
divorce from his mother, things would probably be different. His father had already moved out, 
and even though it was weird at first, Tim liked it. He thought his mother had a boyfriend, but he 
couldn't be sure, and of course he would never mention it to Lex. Lex was heartbroken to be 
separated from her father, and in the last few weeks she had become so obnoxious that- 

"Was it 5027?" Grant said. "I'm 

sorry?" Tim said. 

"The tyrannosaurus at the museum. Was it 5027?" 

"Yes," Tim said. "How'd you know?" 

Grant smiled. "They've been talking about fixing it for years. But now it may never happen." 

"Why is that?" 

"Because of what is taking place here," Grant said, "on your grandfather's island." 

Tim shook his head. He didn't understand what Grant was talking about. "My mom said it was 
just a resort, you know, with swimming and tennis." 

"Not exactly,” Grant said. "I'll explain as we walk along." 


Now I'm a damned babysitter, Ed Regis thought unhappily, tapping his foot as he waited in the 
visitor center. That was what the old man had told him him: You watch my kids like a hawk, 
they're your responsibility for the weekend. 

Ed Regis didn't like it at all. He felt degraded. He wasn't a damn babysitter. And, for that 
matter, he wasn't a damned tour guide, even for VIPs. He was the head of public relations for 
Jurassic Park, and he had much to prepare between now and the opening, a year away. Just to 
coordinate with the PR firms in San Francisco and London, and the agencies in New York and 
Tokyo, was a full-time job-especially since the agencies couldn't yet be told what the resort's real 
attraction was. The firms were all designing teaser campaigns, nothing specific, and they were 
unhappy. Creative people needed nurturing. They needed encouragement to do their best work. 
He couldn't waste his time taking scientists on tours. 

But that was the trouble with a career in public relations-nobody saw you as a professional. 
Regis had been down here on the island off and on for the past seven months, and they were still 
pushing odd jobs on him. Like that episode back in January. Harding should have handled that. 
Harding, or Owens, the general contractor. Instead, it had fallen to Ed Regis. What did he know 
about taking care of some sick workman? And now he was a damn tour guide and babysitter. He 
turned back and counted the heads. Still one short. 

Then, in the back, he saw Dr. Sattler emerge from the bathroom. "All right, folks, let's begin our 
tour on the second floor." 


Tim went with the others, following Mr. Regis up the black suspended staircase to the second 
floor of the building. They passed a sign that read: 


CLOSED AREA 
AUTHORIZED PERSONNEL ONLY 
BEYOND THIS POINT 


Tim felt a thrill when he saw that sign. They walked down the secondfloor hallway. One wall 
was glass, looking out onto a balcony with palm trees in the light mist. On the other wall were 
stenciled doors, like offices: PARK WARDEN ... GUEST SERVICES ... GENERAL MANAGER. . 


Halfway down the corridor they came to a glass partition marked with another sign: 


Underneath were more signs: 


CAUTION 

Teratogenic Substances 

Pregnant Women Avoid Exposure 
To This Area 


DANGER 
Radioactive Isotopes In Use 
Carcinogenic Potential 


Tim grew more excited all the time. Teratogenic substances! Things that made monsters! It 
gave him a thrill, and he was disappointed to hear Ed Regis say, "Never mind the signs, they're 
just up for legal reasons. | can assure you everything is perfectly safe." He led them through the 
door. There was a guard on the other side. Ed Regis turned to the group. 

"You may have noticed that we have a minimum of personnel on the island. We can run this 
resort with a total of twenty people. Of course, we'll have more when we have guests here, but at 
the moment there's only twenty. Here's our control room. The entire park is controlled from here." 

They paused before windows and peered into a darkened room that looked like a small version 
of Mission Control. There was a vertical glass see-through map of the park, and facing it a bank 
of glowing computer consoles- Some of the screens displayed data, but most of them showed 
video images from around the park. There were just two people inside, standing and talking. 

“The man on the left is our chief engineer, John Arnold"-Regis pointed to a thin man ina 
button-down short-sleeve shirt and tie, smoking a cigarette-"and next to him, our park warden, 
Mr. Robert Muldoon, the famous white bunter from Nairobi." Muldoon was a burly man in khaki, 
sunglasses dangling from his shirt pockct. He glanced out at the group, gave a brief nod, and 
turned back to the computer screens. "I'm sure you want to see this room," Ed Regis said, "but 
first, let's see how we obtain dinosaur DNA." 


The sign on the door said EXTRACTIONS and, like all the doors in the laboratory building, it 
opened with a security card. Ed Regis slipped the card in the slot; the light blinked; and the door 
opened. 

Inside, Tim saw a small room bathed in green light. Four technicians in lab coats were peering 
into double-barreled stereo microscopes, or looking at images on high resolution video screens. 
The room was filled with yellow stones. The stones were in glass shelves; in cardboard boxes; in 
large pull-out trays. Each stone was tagged and numbered in black ink. 

Regis introduced Henry Wu, a slender man in his thirties. "Dr. Wu is our chief geneticist. I'll let 
him explain what we do here." 

Henry Wu smiled. "At least I'll try," he said. "Genetics is a bit complicated. But you're probably 
wondering where our dinosaur DNA comes from." 

"It crossed my mind," Grant said. 


"As a matter of fact," Wu said, "there are two possible sources. Using the Loy antibody 
extraction technique, we can sometimes get DNA directly from dinosaur bones." 

"What kind of a yield?" Grant asked. 

"Well, most soluble protein is leached out during fossilization, but twenty percent of the 
proteins are still recoverable by grinding up the bones and using Loy's procedure. Dr. Loy himself 
has used it to obtain proteins from extinct Australian marsupials, as well as blood cells from 
ancient human remains. His technique is so refined it can work with a mere fifty nanograms of 
material. That's fifty-billionths of a gram." 

"And you've adapted his technique here?" Grant asked. 

"Only as a backup," Wu said. "As you can imagine, a twenty percent yield is insufficient for our 
work. We need the entire dinosaur DNA strand in order to clone. And we get it here." He held up 
one of the yellow stones. "From amber-the fossilized resin of prehistoric tree sap." 

Grant looked at Ellie, then at Malcolm. 

"That's really quite clever," Malcolm said, nodding. "I still 

don't understand,” Grant admitted. 

"Tree sap," Wu explained, "often flows over insects and traps them. The insects are then 
perfectly preserved within the fossil. One finds all kinds of insects in amber-including biting 
insects that have sucked blood from larger animals." 

"Sucked the blood," Grant repeated. His mouth fell open. "You mean sucked the blood of 
dinosaurs. 

"Hopefully, yes." 

"And then the insects are preserved in amber. . . ." Grant shook his head. "I'll be damned-that 
just might work." 

"| assure you, it does work," Wu said. He moved to one of the microscopes, where a technician 
positioned a piece of amber containing a fly under the microscope. On the video monitor, they 
watched as he inserted a long needle through the amber, into the thorax of the prehistoric fly. 

"If this insect has any foreign blood cells, we may be able to extract them, and obtain paleo- 
DNA, the DNA of an extinct creature. We won't know for sure, of course, until we extract 
whatever is in there, replicate it, and test it. That is what we have been doing for five years now. It 
has been a long, slow process-but it has paid off. 

"Actually, dinosaur DNA is somewhat easier to extract by this process than mammalian DNA. 
The reason is that mammalian red cells have no nuclei, and thus no DNA in their red cells. To 
clone a mammal, you must find a white cell, which is much rarer than red cells. But dinosaurs 
had nucleated red cells, as do modern birds. It is one of the many indications we have that 
dinosaurs aren't really reptiles at all. They are big leathery birds." 

Tim saw that Dr. Grant still looked skeptical, and Dennis Nedry, the messy fat man, appeared 
completely uninterested, as if he knew it all already. Nedry kept looking impatiently toward the 
next room. 

"| see Mr. Nedry has spotted the next phase of our work," Wu said. "How we identify the DNA 
we have extracted. For that, we use powerful computers." 

They went through sliding doors into a chilled room. There was a loud humming sound. Two 
six-foot-tall round towers stood in the center of the room, and along the walls were rows of waist- 
high stainless-steel boxes. "This is our high-tech laundromat," Dr. Wu said. "The boxes along the 
walls are all Hamachi-Hood automated gene sequencers. They are being run, at very high speed, 
by the Cray XMP supercomputers, which are the towers in the center of the room. In essence, 
you are standing in the middle of an incredibly powerful genetics factory." 

There were several monitors, all running so fast it was hard to see what they were showing. 
Wu pushed a button and slowed one image. 


1 GCGTTGCTGGCGTTTTTCCA TAGGCTCCGCCCCCCTGACG AGCATCACAA 
AAATCGACGC 

61 GGTGGCGAAA CCCGACAGGA CTATAAAGAT ACCAGGCGTT 
TCCCCCTGGA AGCTCCCTCG 


121 TGTTCCGACC CTGCCGCTTA CCGGATACCT GTCCGCCTTT CTCCCTTCGG 
GAAGCCTGGC 


181 


241 


301 


361 


421 


481 


541 


601 


661 


721 


781 


841 


901 


961 


1021 


1081 


1141 


1201 


1281 


1341 


TGCTCACGCT GTAGGTATCT CAGTTCGGTG TAGGTCGTTC GCTCCAAGCT 


GGGCTGTGTG 

CCGTTCAGCC CGACCGCTGC GCCTTATCCG GTAACTATCG TCTTGAGTCC 
AACCCGGTAA 

AGTAGGACAGGTGCCGGCAG CGCTCTGGGTCATTTTCGGC GAGAACCGCT 
TTCGCTGGAG 

ATCGGCCTGT CGCTTGCGGTATTCGGAATC TTGCACGCCC TCGCTCAAGC 
CTTCGTCACT 

CCAAACGTTT CGGCGAGAAG CAGGCCATTA TCGCCGGCAT 
GGCGGCCGAC GCGCTGGGCT 

GGCGTTCGCG ACGCGAGGCT GGATGGCCTT CCCCATTATG 
ATTCTTCTCG CTTCCGGCGG 

CCCGCGTTGC AGGCCATGCT GTCCAGGCAG GTAGATGACG 
ACCATCAGGGACAGCTTCAA 

CGGCTCTTAC CAGCCTAACT TCGATCACTG GACCGCTGAT CGTCACGGCG 
ATTTATGCCG 

CACATGGACGCGTTGCTGGCGTTTTTCCAT AGGCTCCGCC CCCCTGACGA 
GCATCACAAA 

CAAGTCAGAG GTGGCGAAACCCGACAGGAG TATAAAGATA CCAGGCGTTT 
CCCCCTGGAA 

GCGCTCTCCT GTTCCGACCC TGCCGCTTAC CGGATACCTG TCCGCCTTTC 
TCCCTTCGGG 

CTTTCTCAAT GCTCACGCTGTAGGTATCTC AGTTCGGTGT AGGTCGTTCG 
CTCCAAGCTG 

ACGAACCCCCCGTTCAGCCC GACCGCTGCG CCTTATCCGG TAACTATCGT 
CTTGAGTCCA 

ACACGACTTA ACGGGTTGGC ATGGATTGTA GGCGCCGCCC 
TATACCTTGT CTGCCTCCCC 

GCGGTGCATG GAGCCGGGCC ACCTCGACCT GAATGGAAGC 
CGGCGGCACC TCGCTAACGG 

CCAAGAATTG GAGCCAATCA ATTCTTGCGG AGAACTGTGA ATGCGCAAAG 
CAACCCTTGG 

CCATCGCGTC CGCCATCTCC AGCAGCCGCA CGCGGCGCAT 
CTCGGGCAGC GTTGGGTCCT 

GCGCATGATC GTGCT............. CCTGTCGTTG AGGACCCGGC 

TAGGCTGGCG GGGTTGCCTT 

AGAATGAATC ACCGATACGC GAGCGAACGTGAAGCGACTGCTGCTGCAAA 
ACGTCTGCGA 


AACATGAATG GTCTTCGGTT TCCGTGTTTC GTAAAGTCTG GAAACGCGGA 
AGTCAGCGCC 


"Here you see the actual structure of a small fragment of dinosaur DNA," Wu said. "Notice the 
sequence is made up of four basic compounds-adenine, thymine, guanine, and cytosine. This 
amount of DNA probably contains instructions to make a single protein-say, a hormone or an 
enzyme. The full DNA molecule contains three billion of these bases. If we looked at a screen like 
this once a second, for eight hours a day, it'd still take more than two years to look at the entire 
DNA strand. It's that big." 

He pointed to the image. "This is a typical example, because you see the DNA has an error, 
down here in line 1201. Much of the DNA we extract is fragmented or incomplete. So the first 
thing we have to do is repair it-or rather, the computer has to. It'll cut the DNA, using what are 
called restriction enzymes. The computer will select a variety of enzymes that might do the job." 


1 
GCGTTGCTGGCGTTTTTCCATAGGGTCCGCCCCCCTGACGAGCATCACAAAAATCG 
ACGC 
61 
GGTGGCGAAACCCGACAGGACTFITAAAGATACCAGGCGTTTCCCCCTGGAAGCTC 
CCTCG 
NspO4 
121 
TGTTCCGACCCTGCCGCTTACCGGATACCTGTCCGCCTTITCTCCCTTCGGGAAGCG 
TGGC 
181 
TGCTCACGCTGTAGGTATCTCAGTTCGGTGTAGGTCGTTCGCTCCASGCTGGGCTG 
TGTG 
BrontlV 
241 
CCGTTCAGCCCGACCGCTGCGCCTTATCCGGTAACTATCGTCT TGAGTCCAACCCG 
GTAA 
301 
AGTAGGACAGGTGCCGGCAGCGCTCTGGGTCATTTT CGGCGAGGACCGCTTTCGC 
TGGAG 
434 DnxTl AoliBn 
361 
ATCGGCCTGTCGCTTGCGGTATTCGCAATCTTGCACGCCCTCGCTCAAGCCTTICGT 
CACT 
421 
CCAAACGTTTCGGCGAGAAGCAGGCCATAATCGCCGGCATGGCGGCCGACGCGCT 
GGGCT 
481 
GGCGTTCGCGACGCGAGGCTGGATGGCCTTCCCCATTATGATTCTTCTCGCTTCCG 


CCCGCGTTGCAGGCCATGCTGTCCAGGCAGGTAGATGACGHCCATCAGGGACAGC 
TTCAA 
601 

CGGCTCTTACCAGCCTAACTTCGATCACTGGACCGCTGATCGTCACGGCGATT TAT 
GCCG 
Nsp04 
661 

CACATGGACCCGTTGCTGGCGTTTTTCCATAGGCTCCGCCCCCCTGACGAGCATCA 
CAAA 
721 

CAAGTCAGAGGTGGCGAAACCCOACAGOACTATAAAGATACCAOOCOTTTCCCCCT 
GGAA 
924 Caoll | DinoLdn 
781 

GCGCTCTCCTOTTCCOACCCTOCCOCTTACCOGATACCTOTCCOCCTTTCTCCCTT 


CTTTCTCAATOCTCACOCTGTABGTATCTCAGTTCGGTOTAGGTCGTTCOCTCCAAO 
CTO 
901 

ACGAACCCCCCOTTCAGCCCGACCGCTGCGCCTTATCCGGTAACTATCGTCTTGAO 
TCCA 
961 

ACACOACTTAACCOOTTOOCATGGATTGTAGGCGCCGCCCTATACCTTGTCTOCCT 
CCCC 


1021 
GCGGTGCATGOAOCCOGOCCACCTCGACCTGAATOGAAGCCGOCGOCACCTCOC 
TAACOG 
1081 
CCAAGAATTGGAGCCAATCAATTCTTGCGGAGAACTGTGAATGCGCAAACCAACCC 
TTGG 
1141 
CCATCGCGTCCGCCATCTCCAGCAGCCGCACGCGGCGCATCTCGGGCAGCGTTGG 
GTCCT 
1416 DnxTl 
SSpd4 
1201 
GCGCATGATCGTGCT:+=:CCTGTCGTTGAGGACCCGGCTAGGCTGGCGGGGTTGC 
CTTACT 
1281 
ATGAATCACCGATACGCGAGCGAACGTGAAGCGACTGCTGCTGCAAAACGTCTGCG 
ACCT 


"Here is the same section of DNA, with the points of the restriction enzymes located. As you 
can see in line 1201, two enzymes will cut on either side of the damaged point. Ordinarily we let 
the computers decide which to use. But we also need to know what base pairs we should insert 
to repair the injury. For that, we have to align various cut fragments, like so." 


"Now we are finding a fragment of DNA that overlaps the injury area, and will tell us what is 
missing. And you can see we can find it, and go ahead and make the repair. The dark bars you 
see arc restriction fragments-small sections of dinosaur DNA, broken by enzymes and then 
analyzed. The computer is now recombining them, by searching for overlapping sections of code. 
It's a little bit like putting a puzzle together. The computer can do it very rapidly." 


1 

GCGTTGCTGGCGTTTT TCCATAGGCT CCGCCCCCCTGACGAGCATCACAAAAATCG 
ACGC 
61 

GGTGGCGAAACCCGACAGGACTATAAAGATACCAGGCGTTTCCCCCTGGAAGCTCC 
CTCG 
121 

TGTTCCGACCCTGCCGCTTACCGGATACCTGTCCGCCTTTCTCCCTTCGGGAAGCC 
TGGC 
181 

TGCTCACGCTGTAGGTATCTCAGTTCGGTGTAGGTCGTTCGCTCCAAGCTGGGCTG 
TGTG 
241 

CCGTTCAGCCCGACCGCTGCGCCTTATCCGGTAACTATCGTCTTGAGTCCAACCCG 
GTAA 
301 

AGTAGGACAGGTGCCGGCAGCGCTCTGGGTCATTTTCGGCGAGAACCGCTTTCGC 
TGGAG 
361 

ATCGGCCTGTCGCTTGCGGTATTCGGAATCT TGCACGCCCTCGCTCAAGCCTT CGT 
CACT 


421 
CCAAACGTTTCGGCGAGAAGCAGGCCATTATCGCCGGCATGGCGGCCGACGCGCT 
GGGCT 
481 
GGCGTTCGCGACGCGAGGCTGGATGGCCTTCCCCATTATGATTCTTCTCGCTTCCG 
GCGG 
541 
CCCGCGTTGCAGGCCATGCTGTCCAGGCAGGTAGATGACGACCATCAGGGACAGC 
TTCAA 
601 
CGGCTCTTACCAGCCTAACTTCGATCACTGGACCGCTGATCGTCACGGCGATTTAT 
GCCG 
661 
CACATGGACGCGTTGCTGGCGTTTTTCCATAGGCTCCGCCCCCCTGACGAGCATCA 
CAAA 
721 CAAGTCAGAGGTGGCGAAACCCGACAGGACTATAAAGATA 
CCAGGCGTTTCCCCCTGGAA 
781 
GCGCTCTCCTGTTCCGACCCTGCCGCTTACCGGATACCTGTCCGCCTTTCTCCCTT 
CGGG 
841 CTTTCTCAATGCTCACGCTGTAGGTATCTC 
AGTTCGGTGTAGGTCGTTCGCTCCAAGCTG 
901 
ACGAACCCCCCGTTCAGCCCGACCGCTGCGCCTTATCCGGTAACTATCGTCTTGAG 
TCCA 
961 
ACACGACTTAACGGGTTGGCATGGATTGTAGGCGCCGCCCTATACCTTGTCTGCCT 
CCCC 
1021 
GCGGTGCATGGAGCCGGGCCACCTCGACCTGAATGGAAGCCGGCGGCACCTCGC 
TAACGG 
1081 
CCAAGAATTGGAGCCAATCAATTCTTGCGGAGAACTGTGAATGCGCAAACCAACCG 
TTGG 
1141 
CCATCGCGTCCGCCATCTCCAGCAGCCGCACGCGGCGCATCT CGGGCAGCGTTGG 
GTCCT 
1201 
GCGCATGATCGTGCTAGCCTGTCGTTGAGGACCCGGCTAGGCTGGCGGGGTTGCC 
TT 
1281 AGAATGAATCACCGATACGCGAGCGAACGTGAAGCGACTG 
CTGCTGCAAAACGTCTGCGA 
1341 AACATGAATGGTCTTCGGTTTCCGTGTITC 
GTAAAGTCTGGAAACGCGGAAGTCAGCGCC 


"And here is the revised DNA strand, repaired by the computer. The operation you've 
witnessed would have taken months in a conventional lab, but we can do it in seconds." 

"Then are you working with the entire DNA strand?" Grant asked. 

"Oh no," Wu said. "That's impossible. We've come a long way from the sixties, when it took a 
whole laboratory four years to decode a screen like this. Now the computers can do it in a couple 
of hours. But, even so, the DNA molecule is too big. We look only at the sections of the strand 
that differ from animal to animal, or from contemporary DNA. Only a few percent of the 
nucleotides differ from one species to the next. That's what we analyze, and it's still a big job." 


Dennis Nedry yawned. He'd long ago concluded that InGen must be doing something like this. A 
couple of years earlier, when InGen had hired Nedry to design the park control systems, one of 
the initial design parameters called for data records with 3 X 109 fields. Nedry just assumed that 
was a mistake, and had called Palo Alto to verify it. But they had told him the Spec was correct. 
Three billion fields. 

Nedry had worked on a lot of large systems. He'd made a name for himself setting up 
worldwide telephone communications for multinational corporations. Often those systems had 
millions of records. He was used to that. But InGen wanted something so much larger. . . . 

Puzzled, Nedry had gone to see Barney Fellows over at Symbolics, near the M.I.T. campus in 
Cambridge. "What kind of a database has three billion records, Barney?" 

"A mistake," Barney said, laughing. "They put in an extra zero or two." 

"It's not a mistake. | checked. It's what they want." 

"But that's crazy," Barney said. "It's not workable. Even if you had the fastest processors and 
blindingly fast algorithms, a search would still take days. Maybe weeks." 

"Yeah," Nedry said. "| know. Fortunately I'm not being asked to do algorithms. I'm just being 
asked to reserve storage and memory for the overall system. But still . . . what could the 
database be for?" 

Barney frowned. "You operating under an ND?" 

"Yes," Nedry said. Most of his jobs required nondisclosure agreements. 

"Can you tell me anything?" "It's a 

bioengineering firm." 

"Bioengineering," Barney said. "Well, there's the obvious. . . ." 

"Which is?" 

"A DNA molecule." 

"Oh, come on," Nedry said. "Nobody could be analyzing a DNA molecule." He knew biologists 
were talking about the Human Genome Project, to analyze a complete human DNA strand. But 
that would take ten years of coordinated effort, involving laboratories around the world. It was an 
enormous undertaking, as big as the Manhattan Project, which made the atomic bomb. "This is a 
private company," Nedry said. 

"With three billion records," Barney said. "I don't know what else it could be. Maybe they're 
being optimistic designing their system." 

"Very optimistic," Nedry said. 

"Or maybe they're just analyzing DNA fragments, but they've got RAM-intensive algorithms." 

That made more sense. Certain database search techniques ate up a lot of memory. 

"You know who did their algorithms?" 

"No," Nedry said. "This company is very secretive." 

"Well, my guess is they're doing something with DNA," Barney said. "What's the system?" 

"Multi-XMP." 

"Multi-XMP? You mean more than one Cray? Wow." Barney was frowning, now, thinking that 
one over. "Can you tell me anything else?" 

"Sorry," Nedry said. "I can't." And he had gone back and designed the control systems. It had 
taken him and his programming team more than a year, and it was especially difficult because 
the company wouldn't ever tell him what the subsystems were for. The instructions were simply 
"Design a module for record keeping" or "Design a module for visual display." They gave him 
design parameters, but no details about use. He had been working in the dark. And now that the 
system was up and running, he wasn't surprised to learn there were bugs. What did they expect? 
And they'd ordered him down here in a panic, all hot and bothered about "his" bugs. It was 
annoying, Nedry thought. 

Nedry turned back to the group as Grant asked, "And once the computer has analyzed the 
DNA, how do you know what animal it encodes?" 

"We have two procedures," Wu said. "The first is phylogenetic mapping. DNA evolves over 
time, like everything else in an organism-hands or feet or any other physical attribute. So we can 
take an unknown piece of DNA and determine roughly, by computer, where it fits in the 
evolutionary sequence. It's time-consuming, but it can be done." 

"And the other way?" 


Wu shrugged. "Just grow it and find out what it is," he said. "That's what we usually do. I'll 
show you how that's accomplished." 


Tim felt a growing impatience as the tour continued. He liked technical things, but, even so, he 
was losing interest. They came to the next door, which was marked FERTLIZATION, Dr. Wu 
unlocked the door with his security card, and they went inside. 

Tim saw still another room with technicians working at microscopes. In the back was a section 
entirely lit by blue ultraviolet light. Dr. Wu explained that their DNA work required the interruption 
of cellular mitosis at precise instants, and therefore they kept some of the most virulent poisons in 
the world, "Helotoxins, colchicinolds, beta-alkaloids," he said, pointing to a series of syringes set 
out under the UV light. "Kill any living animal within a second or two." 

Tim would have liked to know more about the poisons, but Dr. Wu droned on about using 
unfertilized crocodile ova and replacing the DNA; and then Professor Grant asked some 
complicated questions. To one side of the room were big tanks marked LIQUID N2. And there 
were big walk-in freezers with shelves of frozen embryos, each stored in a tiny silver-foil wrapper. 

Lex was bored. Nedry was yawning. And even Dr. Sattler was losing interest. Tim was tired of 
looking at these complicated laboratories. He wanted to see the dinosaurs. 


The next room was labeled HATCHERY. "It's a little warm and damp in here," Dr. Wu said. "We 
keep it at ninety-nine degrees Fahrenheit and a relative humidity of one hundred percent. We 
also run a higher O2 concentration. It's up to thirty-three percent." 

"Jurassic atmosphere," Grant said. 

"Yes. At least we presume so. If any of you feel faint, just tell me." 

Dr. Wu inserted his security card into the slot, and the outer door hissed open. "Just a 
reminder: don't touch anything in this room. Some of the eggs are permeable to skin oils. And 
watch your heads. The sensors are always moving." 

He opened the inner door to the nursery, and they went inside. Tim faced a vast open room, 
bathed in deep infrared light. The eggs lay on long tables, their pale outlines obscured by the 
hissing low mist that covered the tables. The eggs were all moving gently, rocking. 

"Reptile eggs contain large amounts of yolk but no water at all. The embryos must extract 
water from the surrounding environment. Hence the mist," 

Dr. Wu explained that each table contained 150 eggs, and represented a new batch of DNA 
extractions. The batches were identified by numbers at each table: STEC-458/2 or TRIC-390/4. 
Waist-deep in the mist, the workers in the nursery moved from one egg to the next, plunging their 
hands into the mist, turning the eggs every hour, and checking the temperatures with thermal 
sensors. The room was monitored by overhead TV cameras and motion sensors. An overhead 
thermal sensor moved from one egg to the next, touching each with a flexible wand, beeping, 
then going on. 

"In this hatchery, we have produced more than a dozen crops of extractions, giving us a total 
of two hundred thirty-eight live animals. Our survival rate is somewhere around point four 
percent, and we naturally want to improve that. But by computer analysis we're working with 
something like five hundred variables: one hundred and twenty environmental, another two 
hundred intra-egg, and the rest from the genetic material itself. Our eggs are plastic. The 
embryos are mechanically inserted, and then hatched here." 

"And how long to grow?" 

"Dinosaurs mature rapidly, attaining full size in two to four years. So we now have a number of 
adult specimens in the park." 

"What do the numbers mean?" 

"Those codes," Wu said, "identify the various batch extractions of DNA. The first four letters 
identify the animals being grown. Over there, that TRIC means Triceratops. And the STEC 
means Stegosaurus, and so on. 

"And this table here?" Grant said. 

The code said XXXX-0001/1. Beneath was scrawled "Presumed Coelu." 

"That's a new batch of DNA," Wu said. "We don't know exactly what will grow out. The first 
time an extraction is done, we don't know for sure what the animal is. You can see it's marked 
‘Presumed Coelu,' so it is likely to be a coelurosaurus. A small herbivore, if | remember. It's hard 


for me to keep track of the names. There are something like three hundred genera of dinosaurs 
known so far." 

"Three hundred and forty-seven," Tim said. 

Grant smiled, then said, "Is anything hatching now?" 

"Not at the moment. The incubation period varies with each animal, but in general it runs about 
two months. We try to stagger hatchings, to make less work for the nursery staff. You can 
imagine how it is when we have a hundred and fifty animals born within a few days-though of 
course most don't survive. Actually, these X's are due any day now. Any other questions? No? 
Then we'll go to the nursery, where the newborns are." 


It was a circular room, all white. There were some incubators of the kind used in hospital 
nurseries, but they were empty at the moment. Rags and toys were scattered across the floor. A 
young woman in a white coat was seated on the floor, her back to them. 

"What've you got here today, Kathy?" Dr. Wu asked. 

"Not much," she said. "Just a baby raptor." 

"Let's have a look." 

The woman got to her feet and stepped aside. Tim heard Nedry say, "It looks like a lizard." 

The animal on the floor was about a foot and a half long, the size of a small monkey. It was 
dark yellow with brown stripes, like a tiger. It had a lizard's head and long snout, but it stood 
upright on strong hind legs, balanced by a thick straight tail. Its smaller front legs waved in the air. It 
cocked its head to one side and peered at the visitors staring down at it. 

"Velociraptor," Alan Grant said, in a low voice. 

"Velociraptor mongoliensis," Wu said, nodding. "A predator. This one's only six weeks old." 

"| just excavated a raptor," Grant said, as he bent down for a closer look. Immediately the little 
lizard sprang up, leaping over Grant's head into Tim's arms. 

"Hey!" 

"They can jump," Wu said. "The babies can jump. So can the adults, as a matter of fact." 

Tim caught the velociraptor and held it to him. The little animal didn't weigh very much, a 
pound or two. The skin was warm and completely dry. The little head was inches from Tim's face. 
Its dark, beady eyes stared at him. A small forked tongue flicked in and out. 

"Will he hurt me?" 

"No. She's friendly." 

"Are you sure about that?" asked Gennaro, with a look of concern. 

"Oh, quite sure," Wu said. "At least until she grows a little older. But, in any case, the babies 
don't have any teeth, even egg teeth." 

"Egg teeth?" Nedry said. 

"Most dinosaurs are born with egg teeth-little horns on the tip of the nose, like rhino horns, to 
help them break out of the eggs. But raptors aren't. They poke a hole in the eggs with their 
pointed snouts, and then the nursery staff has to help them out." 

"You have to help them out," Grant said, shaking his head. "What happens in the wild?" 

"In the wild?" 

"When they breed in the wild," Grant said. "When they make a nest." 

"Oh, they can't do that," Wu said. "None of our animals is capable of breeding. That's why we 
have this nursery. It's the only way to replace stock in Jurassic Park." 

"Why can't the animals breed?" 

"Well, as you can imagine, it's important that they not be able to breed,” Wu said. "And 
whenever we faced a critical matter such as this, we designed redundant systems. That is, we 
always arranged at least two control procedures. In this case, there are two independent reasons 
why the animals can't breed. First of a they're sterile, because we irradiate them with X-rays." 

"And the second reason?" 

"All the animals in Jurassic Park are female," Wu said, with a pleased smile. 

Malcolm said, "I should like some clarification about this. Because it seems to me that 
irradiation is fraught with uncertainty. The radiation dose may be wrong, or aimed at the wrong 
anatomical area of the animal-" 

"All true," Wu said. "But we're quite confident we have destroyed gonadal tissue." 


"And as for them all being female," Malcolm said, "is that checked? Does anyone go out and, 
ah, lift up the dinosaurs' skirts to have a look? | mean, how does one determine the sex of a 
dinosaur, anyway?" 

"Sex organs vary with the species. It's easy to tell on some, subtle on others. But, to answer 
your question, the reason we know all the animals are female is that we literally make them that 
way: we control their chromosomes, and we control the intra-egg developmental environment. 
From a bioengineering standpoint, females are easier to breed. You probably know that all 
vertebrate embryos are inherently female. We all start life as females. It takes some kind of 
added effect-such as a hormone at the right moment during development-to transform the 
growing embryo into a male. But, left to its own devices, the embryo will naturally become female. 
So our animals are all female. We tend to refer to some of them as male-such as the 
Tyrannosaurus rex; we all call it a ‘him'-but in fact, they're all female. And, believe me, they can't 
breed." 


The little velociraptor sniffed at Tim, and then rubbed her head against Tim's neck. Tim giggled. 

"She wants you to feed her," Wu said. 

"What does she eat?" 

"Mice. But she's just eaten, so we won't feed her again for a while." 

The little raptor leaned back, stared at Tim, and wiggled her forearms again in the air. Tim saw 
the small claws on the three fingers of each hamd. Then the raptor burrowed her head against 
his neck again. 

Grant came over, and peered critically at the creature. He touched the tiny three-clawed band. 
He said to Tim, "Do you mind?" and Tim released the raptor into his hands. 

Grant flipped the animal onto its back, inspecting it, while the little lizard wiggled and squirmed. 
Then he lifted the animal high to look at its profile, and it screamed shrilly. 

"She doesn't like that," Regis said. "Doesn't like to be held away from body contact. . . ." 

The raptor was still screaming, but Grant paid no attention. Now he was squeezing the tail, 
feeling the bones. Regis said, "Dr. Grant. If you please." 

"I'm not hurting her." 

"Dr. Grant. These creatures are not of our world. They come from a time when there were no 
human beings around to prod and poke them." 

"I'm not prodding and-" 

"Dr. Grant. Put her down, " Ed Regis said. 

“But-" 

"Now. " Regis was starting to get annoyed. 

Grant handed the animal back to Tim. It stopped squealing. Tim could feel its little heart 
beating rapidly against his chest. 

"I'm sorry, Dr. Grant," Regis said. "But these animals are delicate in infancy. We have lost 
several from a postnatal stress syndrome, which we believe is adrenocortically mediated. 
Sometimes they die within five minutes." 

Tim petted the little raptor. "It's okay, kid," he said. "Everything's fine now." The heart was still 
beating rapidly. 

"We feel it is important that the animals here be treated in the most humane manner," Regis 
said. "| promise you that you will have every opportunity to examine them later." 

But Grant couldn't stay away. He again moved toward the animal in Tim's arms, peering at it. 

The little velociraptor opened her jaws and hissed at Grant, in a posture of sudden intense 
fury. 

"Fascinating," Grant said. 

"Can | stay and play with her?" Tim said. 

"Not right now," Ed Regis said, glancing at his watch. "It's three o'clock, and it's a good time for 
a tour of the park itself, so you can see all the dinosaurs in the habitats we have designed for 
them." 

Tim released the velociraptor, which scampered across the room, grabbed a cloth rag, put it in 
her mouth, and tugged at the end with her tiny claws. 


Control 


Walking back toward the control room, Malcolm said, "| have one more question, Dr. Wu. How 
many different species have you made so far?" 

"I'm not exactly sure," Wu said. "I believe the number at the moment is fifteen. Fifteen species. 
Do you know, Ed?" 

"Yes, it's fifteen," Ed Regis said, nodding. 

"You don't know for sure?" Malcolm said, affecting astonishment. 

Wu smiled. "| stopped counting," he said, "after the first dozen. And you have to realize that 
sometimes we think we have an animal correctly made-from the standpoint of the DNA, which is 
our basic work-and the animal grows for six months and then something untoward happens. And 
we realize there is some error. A releaser gene isn't operating. A hormone not being released. Or 
some other problem in the developmental sequence. So we have to go back to the drawing board 
with that animal, so to speak." He smiled. "At one time, | thought | had more than twenty species, 
But now, only fifteen." 

"And is one of the fifteen species a-" Malcolm turned to Grant. "What was the name?" 

"Procompsognathus, " Grant said. 

"You have made some procompsognathuses, or whatever they're called?" Malcolm asked. 

"Oh yes," Wu said immediately. "Compys are very distinctive animals. And, we made an 
unusually large number of them." 

"Why is that?" 

"Well, we want Jurassic Park to be as real an environment as possible-as authentic as 
possible-and the procompsognathids are actual scavengers from the Jurassic period. Rather like 
jackals. So we wanted to have the compys around to clean up." 

"You mean to dispose of carcasses?" 

"Yes, if there were any. But with only two hundred and thirty-odd animals in our total 
population, we don't have many carcasses," Wu said. "That wasn't the primary objective. 
Actually, we wanted the compys for another kind of waste management entirely." 

"Which was?" 

"Well," Wu said, "we have some very big herbivores on this island. We have specifically tried 
not to breed the biggest sauropods, but even so, we've got several animals in excess of thirty 
tons walking around out there, and many others in the five- to ten-ton area. That gives us two 
problems. One is feeding them, and in fact we must import food to the island every two weeks. 
There is no way an island this small can support these animals for any time. 

"But the other problem is waste. | don't know if you've ever seen elephant droppings,” Wu said, 
“put they are substantial. Each spoor is roughly the size of a soccer ball. Imagine the droppings of 
a brontosaur, ten times as large. Now imagine the droppings of a herd of such animals, as we 
keep here. And the largest animals do not digest their food terribly well, so that they excrete a 
great deal. And in the sixty million years since dinosaurs disappeared, apparently the bacteria 
that specialize in breaking down their feces disappeared, too. At least, the sauropod feces don't 
decompose readily." 

"That's a problem," Malcolm said. 

"| assure you it is," Wu said, not smiling. "We had a hell of a time trying to solve it. You 
probably know that in Africa there is a specific insect, the dung beetle, which eats elephant feces. 
Many other large species have associated creatures that have evolved to eat their excrement. 
Well, it turns out that compys will eat the feces of large herbivores and redigest it. And the 
droppings of compys are readily broken down by contemporary bacteria. So, given enough 
compys, our problem was solved." 

"How many compys did you make?" 

"I've forgotten exactly, but | think the target population was fifty animals. And we attained that, 
or very nearly so. In three batches. We did a batch every six months until we had the number." 

"Fifty animals," Malcolm said, "is a lot to keep track of." 

"The control room is built to do exactly that. They'll show you how it's done." 

"I'm sure," Malcolm said. "But if one of these compys were to escape from the island, to get 
away . 

"They can't get away." 

"| know that, but just supposing one did.. ." 


"You mean like the animal that was found on the beach?" Wu said, raising his eyebrows. "The 
one that bit the American girl?" 

"Yes, for example." 

"| don't know what the explanation for that animal is," Wu said. "But | know it can't possibly be 
one of ours, for two reasons. First, the control procedures: our animals are counted by computer 
every few minutes. If one were missing, we'd know at once." 

"And the second reason?" 

"The mainland is more than a hundred miles away. It takes almost a day to get there by boat. 
And in the outside world our animals will die within twelve hours," Wu said. 

"How do you know?" 

"Because I've made sure that's precisely what will occur," Wu said, finally showing a trace of 
irritation. "Look, we're not fools. We understand these are prehistoric animals. They are part of a 
vanished ecology-a complex web of life that became extinct millions of years ago. They might 
have no predators in the contemporary world, no checks on their growth. We don't want them to 
survive in the wild. So I've made them lysine dependent. | inserted a gene that makes a single 
faulty enzyme in protein metabolism. As a result, the animals cannot manufacture the amino acid 
lysine. They must ingest it from the outside. Unless they get a rich dietary source of exogenous 
lysine-supplied by us, in tablet form-they'll go into a coma within twelve hours and expire. These 
animals are genetically engineered to be unable to survive in the real world. They can only live 
here in Jurassic Park. They are not free at all. They are essentially our prisoners." 


"Here's the control room," Ed Regis said. "Now that you know how the animals are made, you'll 
want to see the control room for the park itself, before we go out on the-" 

He stopped. Through the thick glass window, the room was dark. The monitors were off, 
except for three that displayed spinning numbers and the image of a large boat. 

"What's going on?" Ed Regis said. "Oh hell, they're docking." 

"Docking?" 

"Every two weeks, the supply boat comes in from the mainland. One of the things this island 
doesn't have is a good harbor, or even a good dock. It's a little hairy to get the ship in, when the 
seas are rough. Could be a few minutes." He rapped on the window, but the men inside paid no 
attention. "I guess we have to wait, then." 

Ellie turned to Dr. Wu. "You mentioned before that sometimes you make an animal and it 
seems to be fine but, as it grows, it shows itself to be flawed. . . ." 

"Yes," Wu said. "I don't think there's any way around that. We can duplicate the DNA, but there 
is a lot of timing in development, and we don't know if everything is working unless we actually 
see an animal develop correctly." 

Grant said, "How do you know if it's developing correctly? No one has ever seen these animals 
before." 

Wu smiled. "I have often thought about that. | suppose it is a bit of a paradox. Eventually, | 
hope, paleontologists such as yourself will compare our animals with the fossil record to verify the 
developmental sequence." 

Ellie said, "But the animal we just saw, the velociraptor-you said it was a mongoliensis?" 

"From the location of the amber," Wu said. "It it is from China." 

"Interesting," Grant said. "| was just digging up an infant antirrhopus. Are there any full-grown 
raptors here?" 

"Yes," Ed Regis said without hesitation. "Eight adult females. The females are the real hunters. 
They're pack hunters, you know." 

"Will we see them on the tour?" 

"No," Wu said, looking suddenly uncomfortable. And there was an awkward pause. Wu looked 
at Regis. 

"Not for a while," Regis said cheerfully. "The velociraptors haven't been integrated into the park 
setting just yet. We keep them in a holding pen," 

"Can | see them there?" Grant said. 

"Why, yes, of course. In fact, while we're waiting"-he glanced at his watch-"you might want to 
go around and have a look at them." 

"| certainly would," Grant said. 


"Absolutely," Ellie said. 

"| want to go, too," Tim said eagerly. 

"Just go around the back of this building, past the support facility, and you'll see the pen. But 
don't get too close to the fence. Do you want to go, too?" he said to the girl. 

"No," Lex said. She looked appraisingly at Regis. "You want to play a little pickle? Throw a 
few?" 

"Well, sure," Ed Regis said. "Why don't you and | go downstairs and we'll do that, while we wait 
for the control room to open up?" 


Grant walked with Ellie and Malcolm around the back of the main building, with the kid tagging 
along. Grant liked kids-it was impossible not to like any group so openly enthusiastic about 
dinosaurs. Grant used to watch kids in museums as they stared open-mouthed at the big 
skeletons rising above them. He wondered what their fascination really represented. He finally 
decided that children liked dinosaurs because these giant creatures personified the 
uncontrollable force of looming authority. They were symbolic parents. Fascinating and 
frightening, like parents. And kids loved them, as they loved their parents. 

Grant also suspected that was why even young children learned the names of dinosaurs. It 
never failed to amaze him when a three-year-old shrieked: "Stegosaurus!" Saying these 
complicated names was a way of exerting power over the giants, a way of being in control. 

"What do you know about Velociraptor? " Grant asked Tim. He was just making conversation. 

"It's a small carnivore that hunted in packs, like Deinonychus, " Tim said. 

"That's right," Grant said, "although the evidence for pack hunting is all circumstantial. It 
derives in part from the appearance of the animals, which are quick and strong, but small for 
dinosaurs-just a hundred and fifty to three hundred pounds each. We assume they hunted in 
groups if they were to bring down larger prey. And there are some fossil finds in which a single 
large prey animal is associated with several raptor skeletons, suggesting they hunted in packs. 
And, of course, raptors were large-brained, more intelligent than most dinosaurs." 

“How intelligent is that?" Malcolm asked. 

"Depends on who you talk to," Grant said. "Just as paleontologists have come around to the 
idea that dinosaurs were probably warm-blooded, a lot of us are starting to think some of them 
might have been quite intelligent, too. But nobody knows for sure." 

They left the visitor area behind, and soon they heard the loud hum of generators, smelled the 
faint odor of gasoline. They passed a grove of palm trees and saw a large, low concrete shed 
with a steel roof. The noise seemed to come from there. They looked in the shed. 

"It must be a generator," Ellie said. "It's 

big," Grant said, peering inside. 

The power plant actually extended two stories below ground level: a vast complex of whining 
turbines and piping that ran down in the earth, lit by harsh electric bulbs. "They can't need all this 
just for a resort," Malcolm said. "They're generating enough power here for a small city." 

"Maybe for the computers?" 

"Maybe." 

Grant heard bleating, and walked north a few yards. He came to an animal enclosure with 
goats. By a quick count, he estimated there were fifty or sixty goats. 

"What's that for?" Ellie asked. 

"Beats me." 

"Probably they feed 'em to the dinosaurs," Malcolm said. 

The group walked on, following a dirt path through a dense bamboo grove. At the far side, they 
came to a double-layer chain-link fence twelve feet high, with spirals of barbed wire at the top. 
There was an electric hum along the outer fence. 

Beyond the fences, Grant saw dense clusters of large ferns, five feet high. He heard a snorting 
sound, a kind of snuffling. Then the sound of crunching footsteps, coming closer. 

Then a long silence. 

"| don't see anything," Tim whispered, finally. 

"Ssssh." 

Grant waited. Several seconds passed. Flies buzzed in the air. He still saw nothing. 

Ellie tapped him on the shoulder, and pointed. 


Amid the ferns, Grant saw the head of an animal. It was motionless, partially hidden in the 
fronds, the two large dark eyes watching them coldly. 

The head was two feet long. From a pointed snout, a long row of teeth ran back to the hole of 
the auditory meatus which served as an ear. The head reminded him of a large lizard, or perhaps 
a crocodile. The eyes did not blink, and the animal did not move. Its skin was leathery, with a 
pebbled texture, and basically the same coloration as the infant's: yellow-brown with darker 
reddish markings, like the stripes of a tiger. 

As Grant watched, a single forelimb reached up very slowly to part the ferns beside the 
animal's face. The limb, Grant saw, was strongly muscled. The hand had three grasping fingers, 
each ending in curved claws. The band gently, slowly, pushed aside the ferns. 

Grant felt a chill and thought, He's hunting us. 

For a mammal like man, there was something indescribably alien about the way reptiles 
hunted their prey. No wonder men hated reptiles. The stillness, the coldness, the pace was all 
wrong. To be among alligators or other large reptiles was to be reminded of a different kind of life, a 
different kind of world, now vanished from the earth. Of course, this animal didn't realize that he 
had been spotted, that he- 

The attack came suddenly, from the left and right. Charging raptors covered the ten yards to 
the fence with shocking speed. Grant had a blurred impression of powerful, six-foot-tall bodies, 
stiff balancing tails, limbs with curving claws, open jaws with rows of jagged teetb. 

The animals snarled as they came forward, and then leapt bodily into the air, raising their hind 
legs with their big dagger-claws. Then they struck the fence in front of them, throwing off twin 
bursts of hot sparks. 

The veloctiraptors fell backward to the ground, hissing. The visitors all moved forward, 
fascinated. Only then did the third animal attack, leaping up to strike the fence at chest level. Tim 
screamed in fright as the sparks exploded all around him. The creatures snarled, a low reptilian 
hissing sound, and leapt back among the ferns. Then they were gone, leaving behind a faint odor 
of decay, and banging acrid smoke. 

"Holy shit," Tim said. 

"It was so fast," Ellie said. 

"Pack hunters," Grant said, shaking his head. "Pack hunters for whom ambush is an instinct . . 
. Fascinating." 

"| wouldn't call them tremendously intelligent," Malcolm said. 

On the other side of the fence, they heard snorting in the palm trees. Several heads poked 
slowly out of the foliage. Grant counted three . . . four... five... The animals watched them. 
Staring coldly. 

A black man in coveralls came running up to them. "Are you all right?" 

"We're okay,” Grant said. 

"The alarms were set off." The man looked at the fence, dented and charred. "They attacked 
you?" 

"Three of them did, yes." 

The black man nodded. "They do that all the time. Hit the fence, take a shock. They never 
seem to mind." 

"Not too smart, are they?" Malcolm said. 

The black man paused. He squinted at Malcolm in the afternoon light, "Be glad for that fence, 
sexor, " he said, and turned away. 


From beginning to end, the entire attack could not have taken more than six seconds. Grant was 
still trying to organize his impressions. The speed was astonishing-the animals were so fast, he 
had hardly seen them move. 

Walking back, Malcolm said, "They are remarkably fast." 

"Yes," Grant said. "Much faster than any living reptile. A bull alligator can move quickly, but 
only over a short distance-five or six feet. Big lizards like the five-foot Komodo dragons of 
Indonesia have been clocked at thirty miles an hour, fast enough to run down a man. And they kill 
men all the time. But I'd guess the animal behind the fence was more than twice that fast." 

"Cheetah speed," Malcolm said. "Sixty, seventy miles an hour." 

"Exactly." 


"But they seemed to dart forward," Malcolm said. "Rather like birds." 

"Yes." In the contemporary world, only very small mammals, like the cobra-fighting mongoose, 
had such quick responses. Small mammals, and of course birds. The snake-hunting secretary 
bird of Africa, or the cassowary. In fact, the velociraptor conveyed precisely the same impression 
of deadly, swift menace Grant had seen in the cassowary, the clawed ostrich-like bird of New 
Guinea. 

"So these velociraptors look like reptiles, with the skin and general appearance of reptiles, but 
they move like birds, with the speed and predatory intelligence of birds. Is that about it?" Malcolm 
said. 

"Yes," Grant said. "I'd say they display a mixture of traits." 

"Does that surprise you?" 

"Not really," Grant said. "It's actually rather close to what paleontologists believed a long time 
ago.” 


When the first giant bones were found in the 1820s and 1830s, scientists felt obliged to explain 
the bones as belonging to some oversize variant of a modern species. This was because it was 
believed that no species could ever become extinct, since God would not allow one of His 
creations to die. 

Eventually it became clear that this conception of God was mistaken, and the bones belonged 
to extinct animals. But what kind of animals? 

In 1842, Richard Owen, the leading British anatomist of the day, called them Dinosauria, 
meaning "terrible lizards." Owen recognized that dinosaurs seemed to combine traits of lizards, 
crocodiles, and birds. In particular, dinosaur hips were bird-like, not lizard-like. And, unlike lizards, 
many dinosaurs seemed to stand upright. Owen imagined dinosaurs to be quick-moving, active 
creatures, and his view was accepted for the next forty years. 

But when truly gigantic finds were unearthed-animals that had weighed a hundred tons in life- 
scientists began to envision the dinosaurs as stupid, slow-moving giants destined for extinction. 
The image of the sluggish reptile gradually predominated over the image of the quick-moving 
bird. In recent years, scientists like Grant had begun to swing back toward the idea of more active 
dinosaurs. Grant's colleagues saw him as radical in his conception of dinosaur behavior. But now 
he had to admit his own conception had fallen far short of the reality of these large, incredibly 
swift hunters. 

"Actually, what | was driving at," Malcolm said, "was this: Is it a persuasive animal to you? Is it 
in fact a dinosaur?" 

"I'd say So, yes." 

"And the coordinated attack behavior . . ." 

"To be expected,” Grant said. According to the fossil record, packs of velociraptors were 
capable of bringing down animals that weighed a thousand pounds, like Tenontosaurus, which 
could run as fast as a horse. Coordination would be required. 

"How do they do that, without language?" 

"Oh, language isn't necessary for coordinated hunting," Ellie said. "Chimpanzees do it all the 
time. A group of chimps will stalk a monkey and kill it. All communication is by eyes." 

"And were the dinosaurs in fact attacking us?" 

"Yes." 

"They would kill us and eat us if they could?" Malcolm said. 

"| think so." 

"The reason | ask," Malcolm said, "is that I'm told large predators such as lions and tigers are 
not born man-eaters. Isn't that true? These animals must learn somewhere along the way that 
human beings are easy to kill. Only afterward do they become man-killers." 

"Yes, | believe that's true," Grant said. 

"Well, these dinosaurs must be even more reluctant than lions and tigers. After all, they come 
from a time before human beings-or even large mammals-existed at all. God knows what they 
think when they see us. So | wonder: have they learned, somewhere along the line, that humans 
are easy to kill?" 

The group fell silent as they walked. 

"In any case," Malcolm said, "I shall be extremely interested to see the control room now." 


Version 4.4 


"Was there any problem with the group?" Hammond asked. 

"No," Henry Wu said, "there was no problem at all." 

"They accepted your explanation?" 

"Why shouldn't they?" Wu said. "It's all quite straightforward, in the broad strokes. It's only the 
details that get sticky. And | wanted to talk about the details with you today. You can think of it as 
a matter of aesthetics." 

John Hammond wrinkled his nose, as if he smelled something disagreeable. "Aesthetics?" he 
repeated. 

They were standing in the living room of Hammond's elegant bungalow, set back among palm 
trees in the northern sector of the park. The living room was airy and comfortable, fitted with a 
half-dozen video monitors showing the animals in the park. The file Wu had brought, stamped 
ANIMAL DEVELOPMENT: VERSION 4.4, lay on the coffee table. 

Hammond was looking at him in that patient, paternal way. Wu, thirty-three years old, was 
acutely aware that he had worked for Hammond all his professional life. Hammond had hired him 
right out of graduate school. 

"Of course, there are practical consequences as well," Wu said. "I really think you should 
consider my recommendations for phase two. We should go to version 4.4." 

"You want to replace all the current stock of animals?" Hammond said. 

"Yes, | do.” 

"Why? What's wrong with them?" 

"Nothing," Wu said, "except that they're real dinosaurs." 

"That's what | asked for, Henry," Hammond said, smiling. "And that's what you gave me." "! 

know," Wu said. "But you see. . ." He paused. How could he explain this to Hammond? 
Hammond hardly ever visited the island. And it was a peculiar situation that Wu was trying to 
convey. "Right now, as we stand here, almost no one in the world has ever seen an actual 
dinosaur. Nobody knows what they're really like." 

"Yes..." 

"The dinosaurs we have now are real," Wu said, pointing to the screens around the room, "but 
in certain ways they are unsatisfactory, Unconvincing. | could make them better." 

“Better in what way?" 

"For one thing, they move too fast," Henry Wu said. "People aren't accustomed to seeing large 
animals that are so quick. I'm afraid visitors will think the dinosaurs look speeded up, like film 
running too fast." 

"But, Henry, these are real dinosaurs. You said so yourself." 

"| know," Wu said. "But we could easily breed slower, more domesticated dinosaurs." 

"Domesticated dinosaurs?" Hammond snorted. "Nobody wants domesticated dinosaurs, 
Henry. They want the real thing." 

"But that's my point," Wu said. "I don't think they do. They want to see their expectation, which 
is quite different." 

Hammond was frowning. 

"You said yourself, John, this park is entertainment,” Wu said. "And entertainment has nothing 
to do with reality. Entertainment is antithetical to reality." 

Hammond sighed. "Now, Henry, are we going to have another one of those abstract 
discussions? You know | like to keep it simple. The dinosaurs we have now are real, and-" 

"Well, not exactly," Wu said. He paced the living room, pointed to the monitors. "I don't think we 
should kid ourselves. We haven't re-created the past here. The past is gone. It can never be re- 
created. What we've done is reconstruct the past-or at least a version of the past. And I'm saying 
we can make a better version." 

“Better than real?" 

"Why not?" Wu said. "After all, these animals are already modified. We've inserted genes to 
make them patentable, and to make them lysine dependent. And we've done everything we can 
to promote growth, and accelerate development into adulthood." 


Hammond shrugged. "That was inevitable. We didn't want to wait. We have investors to 
consider." 

"Of course. But I'm ‘ust saying, why stop there? Why not push ahead to make exactly the kind 
of dinosaur that we'd like to see? One that is more acceptable to visitors, and one that is easier 
for us to handle? A slower, more docile version for our park?" 

Hammond frowned. "But then the dinosaurs wouldn't be real." 

"But they're not real now," Wu said. "That's what I'm trying to tell you. There isn't any reality 
here." He shrugged helplessly. He could see he wasn't getting through. Hammond had never 
been interested in technical details, and the essence of the argument was technical. How could 
he explain to Hammond about the reality of DNA dropouts, the patches, the gaps in the sequence 
that Wu had been obliged to fill in, making the best guesses he could, but still, making guesses, 
The DNA of the dinosaurs was like old photographs that had been retouched, basically the same 
as the original but in some places repaired and clarified, and as a result- 

"Now, Henry," Hammond said, putting his arm around Wu's shoulder. "If you don't mind my 
saying so, | think you're getting cold feet. You've been working very hard for a long time, and 
you've done a hell of a job-a hell of a job-and it's finally time to reveal to some people what you've 
done. It's natural to be a little nervous. To have some doubts. But | am convinced, Henry, that the 
world will be entirely satisfied. Entirely satisfied." 

As he spoke, Hammond steered him toward the door. 

"But, John," Wu said. "Remember back in '87, when we started to build the containment 
devices? We didn't have any full-grown adults yet, so we had to predict what we'd need- We 
ordered big taser shockers, cars with cattle prods mounted on them, guns that blow out electric 
nets. All built specially to our specifications. We've got a whole array of devices now and they're 
all too slow. We've got to make some adjustments. You know that Muldoon wants military 
equipment: TOW missiles and laser-guided devices?" 

"Let's leave Muldoon out of this," Hammond said. "I'm not worried. It's just a zoo, Henry." 

The phone rang, and Hammond went to answer it. Wu tried to think of another way to press his 
case. But the fact was that, after five long years, Jurassic Park was nearing completion, and John 
Hammond lust wasn't listening to him any more. 


There had been a time when Hammond listened to Wu very attentively. Especially when he had 
first recruited him, back in the days when Henry Wu was a twenty-eight-year-old graduate 
student getting his doctorate at Stanford in Norman Atherton's tab. 

Atherton's death had thrown the lab into confusion as well as mourning; no one knew what 
would happen to the funding or the doctoral programs. There was a lot of uncertainty; people 
worried about their careers. 

Two weeks after the funeral, John Hammond came to see Wu. Everyone in the lab knew that 
Atherton had had some association with Hammond, although the details were never clear. But 
Hammond had approached Wu with a directness Wu never forgot. 

"Norman always said you're the best geneticist in his lab," he said. "What are your plans now?" 

"| don't know. Research." 

"You want a university appointment?" 

"Yes." 

"That's a mistake," Hammond said briskly. "At least, if you respect your talent." 

Wu had blinked. "Why?" 

"Because, let's face facts," Hammond said. "Universities are no longer the intellectual centers 
of the country. The very idea is preposterous. Universities are the backwater. Don't look so 
surprised. I'm not saying anything you don't know. Since World War Il, all the really important 
discoveries have come out of private laboratories. The laser, the transistor the polio vaccine, the 
microchip, the hologram, the personal computer, magnetic resonance imaging, CAT scans-the 
list goes on and on. Universities simply aren't where it's happening any more. And they haven't 
been for forty years. If you want to do something important in computers or genetics, you don't go 
to a university. Dear me, no." 

Wu found he was speechless. 

"Good heavens," Hammond said, "what must you go through to start a new project? How 
many grant applications, how many forms, how many approvals? The steering committee? The 


department chairman? The university resources committee? How do you get more work space if 
you need | . t? More assistants if you need them? How long does all that take? A brilliant man 
can't squander precious time with forms and committees. Life is too short, and DNA too long. You 
want to make your mark. If you want to get something done, stay out of universities." 

In those days, Wu desperately wanted to make his mark. John Hammond had his full attention. 

"I'm talking about work, "Hammond continued. "Real accomplishment. What does a scientist 
need to work? He needs time, and he needs money. I'm talking about giving you a five-year 
commitment, and ten million dollars a year in funding. Fifty million dollars, and no one tells you 
how to spend it. You decide. Everyone else just gets out of your way." 

It sounded too good to be true. Wu was silent for a long time. Finally he said, "In return for 
what?" 

"For taking a crack at the impossible," Hammond said. "For trying something that probably 
can't be done." 

"What does it involve?" 

"| can't give you details, but the general area involves cloning reptiles." 

"| don't think that's impossible," Wu said. "Reptiles are easier than mammals. Cloning's 
probably only ten, fifteen years off. Assuming some fundamental advances." 

"I've got five years," Hammond said. "And a lot of money, for somebody who wants to take a 
crack at it now." 

"Is my work publishable?" 

"Eventually." 

"Not immediately?" 

"But eventually publishable?" Wu asked, sticking on this point. 

Hammond had laughed. "Don't worry. If you succeed, the whole world will know about what 
you've done, | promise you." 


And now it seemed the whole world would indeed know, Wu thought. After five years of 
extraordinary effort, they were just a year away from opening the park to the public. Of course, 
those years hadn't gone exactly as Hammond had promised. Wu had had some people telling 
him what to do, and many times fearsome pressures were placed on him. And the work itself had 
shifted-it wasn't even reptilian cloning, once they began to understand that dinosaurs were so 
similar to birds. It was avian cloning, a very different proposition. Much more difficult. And for the 
last two years, Wu had been primarily an administrator, supervising teams of researchers and 
banks of computer-operated gene sequencers. Administration wasn't the kind of work he 
relished. It wasn't what he had bargained for. 

Still, he had succeeded. He had done what nobody really believed could be done, at least in so 
short a time. And Henry Wu thought that he should have some rights, some say in what 
happened, by virtue of his expertise and his efforts. Instead, he found his influence waning with 
each passing day. The dinosaurs existed. The procedures for obtaining them were worked out to 
the point of being routine. The technologies were mature. And John Hammond didn't need Henry 
Wu any more. 

"That should be fine," Hammond said, speaking into the phone. He listened for a while, and 
smiled at Wu. "Fine. Yes. Fine." He hung up. "Where were we, Henry?" 

"We were talking about phase two," Wu said. 

"Oh yes. We've gone over some of this before, Henry-" 

"| know, but you don't realize-" 

"Excuse me, Henry," Hammond said, with an edge of impatience in his voice. "I do realize. And 
| must tell you frankly, Henry. | see no reason to improve upon reality. Every change we've made 
in the genome has been forced on us by law or necessity. We may make other changes in the 
future, to resist disease, or for other reasons. But | don't think we should improve upon reality just 
because we think it's better that way. We have real dinosaurs out there now. That's what people 
want to see. And that's what they should see. That's our obligation, Henry. That's honest, Henry." 

And, smiling, Hammond opened the door for him to leave. 


Control 


Grant looked at all the computer monitors in the darkened control room, feeling irritable. Grant 
didn't like computers. He knew that this made him old-fashioned, dated as a researcher, but he 
didn't care. Some of the kids who worked for him had a real feeling for computers, an intuition. 
Grant never felt that. He found computers to be alien, mystifying machines. Even the fundamental 
distinction between an operating system and an application left him confused and disheartened, 
literally lost in a foreign geography he didn't begin to comprehend. But he noticed that Gennaro 
was perfectly comfortable, and Malcolm seemed to be in his element, making little sniffing 
sounds, like a bloodhound on a trail. 

"You want to know about control mechanisms?" John Arnold said, turning in his chair in the 
control room. The head engineer was a thin, tense, chain-smoking man of forty-five. He squinted 
at the others in the room. "We have unbelievable control mechanisms," Arnold said, and lit 
another cigarette. 

"For example," Gennaro said. 

"For example, animal tracking." Arnold pressed a button on his console, and the vertical glass 
map lit up with a pattern of jagged blue lines. "That's our juvenile T-rex. The little rex. All his 
movements within the park over the last twenty-four hours." Arnold pressed the button again. 
"Previous twenty-four." And again. "Previous twenty-four." 

The lines on the map became densely overlaid, a child's scribble. But the scribble was 
localized in a single area, near the southeast side of the lagoon. 

"You get a sense of his home range over time," Arnold said. "He's young, so he stays close to 
the water. And he stays away from the big adult rex. You put up the big rex and the little rex, and 
you'll see their paths never cross. 

"Where is the big rex right now?" Gennaro asked. 

Arnold pushed another button. The map cleared, and a single glowing spot with a code 
number appeared in the fields northwest of the lagoon. "He's right there.” 

"And the little rex?" 

"Hell, I'll show you every animal in the park," Arnold said. The map began to light up like a 
Christmas tree, dozens of spots of light, each tagged with a code number. "That's two hundred 
thirty-eight animals as of this minute." 

"How accurate?" 

"Within five feet." Arnold puffed on the cigarette. "Let's put it this way: you drive out in a vehicle 
and you will find the animals right there, exactly as they're shown on the map." 

"How often is this updated?" 

"Every thirty seconds." 

"Pretty impressive," Gennaro said. "How's it done?" 

"We have motion sensors all around the park," Arnold said. "Most of ‘em hard-wired, some 
radio-telemetered. Of course, motion sensors won't usually tell you the species, but we get image 
recognition direct off the video. Even when we're not watching the video monitors, the computer 
is. And checking where everybody is." 

"Does the computer ever make a mistake?" 

"Only with the babies. It mixes those up sometimes, because they're such small images. But 
we don't sweat that. The babies almost always stay close to herds of adults. Also you have the 
category tally." 

"What's that?" 

"Once every fifteen minutes, the computer tallies the animals in all categories," Arnold said. 
"Like this." 





Total Animals 238 

Species Expected Found Ver 
Tyrannosaurs 2 2 

41 
Maiasaurs 21 21 


3.3 


Stegosaurs 4 4 


3.9 

Triceratops 8 8 
3.1 

Procompsognathids 49 49 
3.9 

Othnielia 16 16 
3.1 

Velociraptors 8 8 
3.0 

Apatosaurs 17 17 
3.1 

Hadrosaurs 11 11 
3.1 

Dilophosaurs 7 7 
43 

Pterosaurs 6 6 
43 

Hypsilophodontids 33 33 
29 

Euoplocepbalids 16 16 
4.0 

Styracosaurs 18 18 
3.9 

Callovosaurs 22 22 
41 
Total 238 238 


"What you see here," Arnold said, "is an entirely separate counting procedure. It isn't based on 
the tracking data. It's a fresh look. The whole idea is that the computer can't make a mistake, 
because it compares two different ways of gathering the data. If an animal were missing, we'd 
know it within five minutes." 

"| see," Malcolm said. "And has that ever actually been tested?" 

"Well, in a way," Arnold said. "We've had a few animals die. An othniellan got caught in the 
branches of a tree and strangled. One of the stegos died of that intestinal illness that keeps 
bothering them. One of the hypsilophodonts fell and broke his neck. And in each case, once the 
animal stopped moving, the numbers stopped tallying and the computer signaled an alert." 

"Within five minutes." 

"Yes." 

Grant said, "What is the right-hand column?" 

"Release version of the animals. The most recent are version 4.1 or 4.3. We're considering 
going to version 4.4." 

"Version numbers? You mean like software? New releases?" 

"Well, yes," Arnold said. "It is like software, in a way. As we discover the glitches in the DNA, 
Dr. Wu's labs have to make a new version." 

The idea of living creatures being numbered like software, being subject to updates and 
revisions, troubled Grant. He could not exactly say why-it was too new a thought-out he was 
instinctively uneasy about it. They were, after all, living creatures. . . . 

Arnold must have noticed his expression, because he said, "Look, Dr. Grant, there's no point 
getting starry-eyed about these animals. It's important for everyone to remember that these 
animals are created. Created by man. Sometimes there are bugs. So, as we discover the bugs, 
Dr. Wu's labs have to make a new version. And we need to keep track of what version we have 
out there." 

"Yes, yes, of course you do," Malcolm said impatiently. "But, going back to the matter of 
counting-I take it all the counts are based on motion sensors?" 


"Yes." 

"And these sensors are everywhere in the park?" 

"They cover ninety-two percent of the land area," Arnold said. "There are only a few places we 
can't use them. For example, we can't use them on the jungle river, because the movement of the 
water and the convection rising from the surface screws up the sensors. But we have them nearly 
everywhere else. And if the computer tracks an animal into an unsensed zone, it'll remember, 
and look for the animal to come out again. And if it doesn't, it gives us an alarm." 

"Now, then," Malcolm said. "You show forty-nine procompsognatbids. Suppose | suspect that 
some of them aren't really the correct species. How would you show me that I'm wrong?" 

“Two ways," Arnold said. "First of all, | can track individual movements against the other 
presumed compys. Compys are social animals, they move in a group. We have two compy 
groups in the park. So the individuals should be within either group A or group B." 

"Yes, but-" 

"The other way is direct visual," he said. He punched buttons and one of the monitors began to 
flick rapidly through images of compys, numbered from 1 to 49. 

"These pictures are..." 

"Current ID images. From within the last five minutes." 

"So you can see all the animals, if you want to?" 

"Yes. | can visually review all the animals whenever | want." 

"How about physical containment?" Gennaro said. "Can they get out of their enclosures?" 

"Absolutely not," Arnold said. "These are expensive animals, Mr. Gennaro. We take very good 
care of them. We maintain multiple barriers. First, the moats." He pressed a button, and the 
board lit up with a network of orange bars. "These moats are never less than twelve feet deep, 
and water-filled. For bigger animals the moats may be thirty feet deep. Next, the electrified 
fences." Lines of bright red glowed on the board. "We have fifty miles of twelve-foot-high fencing, 
including twenty-two miles around the perimeter of the island. All the park fences carry ten 
thousand volts. The animals quickly learn not to go near them." 

"But if one did get out?" Gennaro said. 

Arnold snorted, and stubbed out his cigarette. 

"Just hypothetically," Gennaro said. "Supposing it happened?" 

Muldoon cleared his throat. "We'd go out and get the animal back," he said "We have lots of 
ways to do that-taser shock guns, electrified nets, tranquilizers. All nonlethal, because, as Mr. 
Arnold says, these are expensive animals." 

Gennaro nodded. "And if one got off the island?" 

"It'd die in less than twenty-four hours," Arnold said. "These are genetically engineered 
animals. They're unable to survive in the real world." 

"How about this control system itself?" Gennaro said. "Could anybody tamper with it?" 

Arnold was shaking his head. "The system is hardened. The computer is independent in every 
way. Independent power and independent backup power. The system does not communicate 
with the outside, so it cannot be influenced remotely by modem. The computer system is secure." 

There was a pause. Arnold puffed his cigarette. "Hell of a system," he said. "Hell of a 
goddamned system." 

"Then | guess," Malcolm said, "your system works so well, you don't have any problems." 
"We've got endless problems here," Arnold said, raising an eyebrow. "But none of the things 
you worry about. | gather you're worried that the animals will escape, and will get to the mainland 
and raise hell. We haven't got any concern about that at all. We see these animals as fragile and 
delicate. They've been brought back after sixty-five million years to a world that's very different 
from the one they left, the one they were adapted to. We have a hell of a time caring for them. 

"You have to realize," Arnold continued, "that men have been keeping mammals and reptiles in 
zoos for hundreds of years. So we know a lot about how to take care of an elephant or a croc. 
But nobody has ever tried to take care of a dinosaur before. They are new animals. And we just 
don't know. Diseases in our animals are the biggest concern." 

"Diseases?" Gennaro said, suddenly alarmed. "Is there any way that a visitor could get sick?" 

Arnold snorted again. "You ever catch a cold from a zoo alligator, Mr. Gennaro? Zoos don't 
worry about that. Neither do we. What we do worry about is the animals dying from their own 
illnesses, or infecting other animals. But we have programs to monitor that, too. You want to see 


the big rex's health file? His vaccination record? His dental record? That's something-you ought 
to see the vets scrubbing those big fangs so he doesn't get tooth decay. 

"Not just now," Gennaro said. "What about your mechanical systems?" 

"You mean the rides?" Arnold said. 

Grant looked up sharply: rides? 

"None of the rides are running yet," Arnold was saying. "We have the jungle River Ride, where 
the boats follow tracks underwater, and we have the Aviary Lodge Ride, but none of it's 
operational yet. The park'll open with the basic dinosaur tour-the one that you're about to take in 
a few minutes. The other rides will come on line six, twelve months after that." 

"Wait a minute," Grant said. "You're going to have rides? Like an amusement park?" 

Arnold said, "This is a zoological park. We have tours of different areas, and we call them 
rides. That's all." 

Grant frowned. Again he felt troubled. He didn't like the idea of dinosaurs being used for an 
amusement park. 

Malcolm continued his questions. "You can run the whole park from this control room?" 

"Yes," Arnold said. "| can run it single-handed, if | have to. We've got that much automation 
built in. The computer by itself can track the animals, feed them, and fill their water troughs for 
forty-eight hours without supervision." 

"This is the system Mr. Nedry designed?" Malcolm asked. Dennis Nedry was sitting at a 
terminal in the far corner of the room, eating a candy bar and typing. 

"Yes, that's right," Nedry said, not looking up from the keyboard. "It's 

a hell of a system," Arnold said proudly. 

"That's right," Nedry said absently. "Just one or two minor bugs to fix." 

"Now," Arnold said, "I see the tour is starting, so unless you have other questions . . ." 

"Actually, just one," Malcolm said. "Just a research question. You showed us that you can 
track the procompsognathids and you can visually display them individually. Can you do any 
studies of them as a group? Measure them, or whatever? If | wanted to know height or weight, or 


Arnold was punching buttons. Another screen came up. 


"We can do all of that, and very quickly," Arnold said. "The computer takes measurement data in 
the course of reading the video screens, so it is translatable at once. You see here we have a 
normal Poisson distribution for the animal population. It shows that most of the animals cluster 
around an average central value, and a few are either larger or smaller than the average, at the 
tails of the curve." 

"You'd expect that kind of graph," Malcolm said. 

"Yes. Any healthy biological population shows this kind of distribution. Now, then," Arnold said, 
lighting another cigarette, "are there any other questions?" 

"No," Malcolm said. "I've learned what | need to know." 

As they were walking out, Gennaro said, "It looks like a pretty good system to me. | don't see 
how any animals could get off this island," 

"Don't you?" Malcolm said. "| thought it was completely obvious." 

"Wait a minute," Gennaro said. "You think animals have gotten out?" 

"| know they have." 

Gennaro said, "But how? You saw for yourself. They can count all the animals. They can look 
at all the animals. They know where all the animals are at all times. How can one possibly 
escape? 

Malcolm smiled. "It's quite obvious," he said. "It's just a matter of your assumptions." 

"Your assumptions," Gennaro repeated, frowning. 

"Yes," Malcolm said. "Look here. The basic event that has occurred in Jurassic Park is that the 
scientists and technicians have tried to make a new, complete biological world. And the scientists 
in the control room expect to see a natural world. As in the graph they just showed us. Even 


though a moment's thought reveals that nice, normal distribution is terribly worrisome on this 
island." 

"It is?" 

"Yes. Based on what Dr. Wu told us earlier, one should never see a population graph like that." 

"Why not?" Gennaro said. 

"Because that is a graph for a normal biological population. Which is precisely what Jurassic 
Park is not. Jurassic Park is not the real world. It is intended to be a controlled world that only 
imitates the natural world. In that sense, it's a true park, rather like a Japanese formal garden. 
Nature manipulated to be more natural than the real thing, if you will." 

"I'm afraid you've lost me," Gennaro said, looking annoyed. "I'm 

sure the tour will make everything clear," Malcolm said. 


The Tour 


"This way, everybody, this way," Ed Regis said. By his side, a woman was passing out pith 
helmets with "Jurassic Park" labeled on the headband, and a little blue dinosaur logo. 

A line of Toyota Land Cruisers came out of an underground garage beneath the visitor center. 
Each car pulled up, driverless and silent. Two black men in safari uniforms were opening the 
doors for passengers. 

"Two to four passengers to a car, please, two to four passengers to a car," a recorded voice 
was saying. "Children under ten must be accompanied by an adult. Two to four passengers to a 
car, please..." 

Tim watched as Grant, Sattler, and Malcolm got into the first Land Cruiser with the lawyer, 
Gennaro. Tim looked over at Lex, who was standing pounding her fist into her glove. 

Tim pointed to the first car and said, "Can | go with them?" 

"I'm afraid they have things to discuss," Ed Regis said. "Technical things." 

"I'm interested in technical things," Tim said. "I'd rather go with them." 

"Well, you'll be able to hear what they're saying," Regis said. "We'll have a radio open between 
the cars." 

The second car came. Tim and Lex got in, and Ed Regis followed. "These are electric cars," 
Regis said. "Guided by a cable in the roadway." 

Tim was glad he was sitting in the front seat, because mounted in the dashboard were two 
computer Screens and a box that looked to him like a CD-ROM; that was a laser disk player 
controlled by a computer. There was also a portable walkie-talkie and some kind of a radio 
transmitter. There were two antennas on the roof, and some odd goggles in the map pocket. 

The black men shut the doors of the Land Cruiser. The car started off with an electric hum. Up 
ahead, the three scientists and Gennaro were talking and pointing, clearly excited. Ed Regis said, 
"Let's hear what they are saying." An intercom clicked. 

"| don't know what the hell you think you're doing here," Gennaro said, over the intercom. He 
sounded very angry. 

"| know quite well why I'm here," Malcolm said. 

"You're here to advise me, not play goddamned mind games. I've got five percent of this 
company and a responsibility to make sure that Hammond has done his job responsibly. Now 
you goddamn come here-" 

Ed Regis pressed the intercom button and said, "In keeping with the nonpolluting policies of 
Jurassic Park, these lightweight electric Land Cruisers have been specially built for us by Toyota in 
Osaka. Eventually we hope to drive among the animals-just as they do in African game parks- but, 
for now, sit back and enjoy the self-guided tour." He paused. "And, by the way, we can hear 
you back here." 

"Oh Christ," Gennaro said. "I have to be able to speak freely. | didn't ask for these damned kids 
to come-" 

Ed Regis smiled blandly and pushed a button. "We'll just begin the show, shall we?" They 
heard a fanfare of trumpets, and the interior screens flashed WELCOME TO JURASSIC PARK. A 
sonorous voice said, "Welcome to Jurassic Park. You are now entering the lost world of the 
prehistoric past, a world of mighty creatures long gone from the face of the earth, which you are 
privileged to see for the first time." 


"That's Richard Kiley," Ed Regis said. "We spared no expense." 

The Land Cruiser passed through a grove of low, stumpy palm trees. Richard Kiley was 
saying, "Notice, first of all, the remarkable plant life that surrounds you. Those trees to your left 
and right are called cycads, the prehistoric predecessors of palm trees. Cycads were a favorite 
food of the dinosaurs. You can also see bennettitaleans, and ginkgoes. The world of the dinosaur 
included more modern plants, such as pine and fir trees, and swamp cypresses. You will see 
these as well." 

The Land Cruiser moved slowly among the foliage. Tim noticed the fences and retaining walls 
were screened by greenery to heighten the illusion of moving through real jungle. 

"We imagine the world of the dinosaurs," said Richard Kiley's voice, "as a world of huge 
vegetarians, eating their way through the giant swampy forests of the Jurassic and Cretaceous 
world, a hundred million years ago. But most dinosaurs were not as large as people think. The 
smallest dinosaurs were no bigger than a house cat, and the average dinosaur was about as big 
as a pony. We are first going to visit one of these average-size animals, called hypsilophodonts. 
If you look to your left, you may catch a glimpse of them now." 

They all looked to the left. 

The Land Cruiser stopped on a low rise, where a break in the foliage provided a view to the 
east. They could see a sloping forested area which opened into a field of yellow grass that was 
about three feet high. There were no dinosaurs. 

"Where are they?" Lex said. 

Tim looked at the dashboard. The transmitter lights blinked and the CD-ROM whirred. 
Obviously the disk was being accessed by some automatic system. He guessed that the same 
motion sensors that tracked the animals also controlled the screens in the Land Cruiser. The 
screens now showed pictures of hypsilophodonts, and printed out data about them. 

The voice said, "Hypsilophodontids are the gazelles of the dinosaur world: small, quick animals 
that once roamed everywhere in the world, from England to Central Asia to North America. We 
think these dinosaurs were so successful because they had better jaws and teeth for chewing 
plants than their contemporaries did. In fact, the name 'hypsilophodontid' means ‘high-ridge 
tooth,’ which refers to the characteristic self-sharpening teeth of these animals. You can see them 
in the plains directly ahead, and also perhaps in the branches of the trees." 

"In the trees?" Lex said. "Dinosaurs in the trees?" 

Tim was scanning with binoculars, too. "To the right," he said. "Halfway up that big green trunk 


In the dappled shadows of the tree a motionless, dark green animal about the size of a baboon 
stood on a branch. It looked like a lizard standing on its hind legs. It balanced itself with a long 
drooping tail. 

"That's an othnielia," Tim said. 

"The small animals you see are called othnielia," the voice said, "in honor of the nineteenth- 
century dinosaur hunter Othniel Marsh of Yale." 

Tim spotted two more animals, on higher branches of the same tree. They were all about the 
same size. None of them were moving. 

"Pretty boring," Lex said. "They're not doing anything." 

"The main herd of animals can be found in the grassy plain below you," said the voice. "We 
can rouse them with a simple mating call." A loudspeaker by the fence gave a long nasal call, like 
the honking of geese. 

From the field of grass directly to their left, six lizard heads poked up, one after another. The 
effect was comical, and Tim laughed. 

The heads disappeared. The loudspeaker gave the call again, and once again the heads 
poked up-in exactly the same way, one after another. The fixed repetition of the behavior was 
striking. 

"Hypsilophodonts are not especially bright animals," the voice explained. "They have roughly 
the intelligence of a domestic cow." 

The heads were dull green, with a mottling of dark browns and blacks that extended down the 
slender necks. Judging from the size of the heads, Tim guessed their bodies were four feet long, 
about as large as deer. 


Some of the hypsilophodonts were chewing, the jaws working. One reached up and scratched 
its head, with a five-fingered band. The gesture gave the creature a pensive, thoughtful quality. 

"If you see them scratching, that is because they have skin problems. The veterinary scientists 
here at Jurassic Park think it may be a fungus, or an allergy. But they're not sure yet. After all, 
these are the first dinosaurs in history ever to be studied alive." 

The electric motor of the car started, and there was a grinding of gears. At the unexpected 
sound, the herd of hypsilophodonts suddenly leapt into the air and bounded above the grass like 
kangaroos, showing their full bodies with massive hind limbs and long tails in the afternoon 
sunlight. In a few leaps, they were gone. 

"Now that we've had a look at these fascinating herbivores, we will go on to some dinosaurs 
that are a little larger. Quite a bit larger, in fact." 

The Land Cruisers continued onward, moving south through Jurassic Park. 


Control 


"Gears are grinding," John Arnold said, in the darkened control room. "Have maintenance check 
the electric clutches on vehicles BB4 and BB5 when they come back." 

"Yes, Mr. Arnold," replied the voice on the intercom. 

"A minor detail," Hammond said, walking in the room. Looking out, he could see the two Land 
Cruisers moving south through the park. Muldoon stood in the corner, silently watching. 

Arnold pushed his chair back from the central console at the control panel. "There are no minor 
details, Mr. Hammond," he said, and he lit another cigarette. Nervous at most times, Arnold was 
especially edgy now. He was only too aware that this was the first time visitors had actually 
toured the park. In fact, Arnold's team didn't often go into the park. Harding, the vet, sometimes 
did. The animal handlers went to the individual feeding houses. But otherwise they watched the 
park from the control room. And now, with visitors out there, he worried about a hundred details. 

John Arnold was a systems engineer who had worked on the Polaris submarine missile in the 
late 1960s, until he had his first child and the prospect of making weapons became too 
distasteful. Meanwhile, Disney had started to create amusement park rides of great technological 
sophistication, and they employed a lot of aerospace people. Arnold helped build Disney World in 
Orlando, and had gone on to implement major Parks at Magic Mountain in California, Old 
Country in Virginia, and Astroworld in Houston. 

His continuous employment at parks had eventually given him a somewhat skewed view of 
reality. Arnold contended, only half jokingly, that the entire world was increasingly described by 
the metaphor of the theme park. "Paris is a theme park," he once announced, after a vacation, 
“although it's too expensive, and the park employees are unpleasant and sullen." 

For the past two years, Arnold's job had been to get Jurassic Park up and running. As an 
engineer, he was accustomed to long time schedules-he often referred to "the September 
opening," by which he meant September of the following year-and as the September opening 
approached, he was unhappy with the progress that had been made. He knew from experience 
that it sometimes took years to work the bugs out of a single park ride-let alone get a whole park 
running properly. 

"You're just a worrier," Hammond said. 

"| don't think so," Arnold said. "You've got to realize that, from an engineering standpoint, 
Jurassic Park is by far the most ambitious theme park in history. Visitors will never think about it, 
but | do." 

He ticked the points off on his fingers. 

"First, Jurassic Park has all the problems of any amusement park-ride maintenance, queue 
control, transportation, food handling, living accommodations, trash disposal, security. 

"Second, we have all the problems of a major zoo-care of the animals; health and welfare; 
feeding and cleanliness; protection from insects, pests, allergies, and illnesses- maintenance of 
barriers; and all the rest. 

"And, finally, we have the unprecedented problems of caring for a population of animals that no 
one has ever tried to maintain before." 

"Oh, it's not as bad as all that," Hammond said. 


"Yes, it is. You're just not here to see it," Arnold said. "The tyrannosaurs drink the lagoon water 
and sometimes get sick; we aren't sure why. The triceratops females kill each other in fights for 
dominance and have to be separated into groups smaller than six. We don't know why. The 
stegosaurs frequently get blisters on their tongues and diarrhea, for reasons no one yet 
understands, even though we've lost two. Hypsilophodonts get skin rashes. And the 
veloctraptors-" 

"Let's not start on the velociraptors," Hammond said. "I'm sick of hearing about the 
velociraptors. How they're the most vicious creatures anyone has ever seen." 

"They are," Muldoon said, in a low voice. "They should all be destroyed." 

"You wanted to fit them with radio collars," Hammond said. "And | agreed." 

"Yes. And they promptly chewed the collars off. But even if the raptors never get free," Arnold 
said, “I think we have to accept that Jurassic Park is inherently hazardous." 

"Oh balls, " Hammond said. "Whose side are you on, anyway? 

"We now have fifteen species of extinct animals, and most of them are dangerous," Arnold 
said. "We've been forced to delay the jungle River Ride because of the dilophosaurs; and the 
Pteratops Lodge in the aviary, because the pterodactyls are so unpredictable. These aren't 
engineering delays, Mr. Hammond. They're problems with control of the animals." 

"You've had plenty of engineering delays," Hammond said. "Don't blame it on the animals." 

"Yes, we have. In fact, it's all we could do to get the main attraction, Park Drive, working 
correctly, to get the CD-ROMs inside the cars to be controlled by the motion sensors. It's taken 
weeks of adjustment to get that working properly-and now the electric gearshifts on the cars are 
acting up! The gearshifts!" 

"Let's keep it in perspective," Hammond said. "You get the engineering correct and the animals 
will fall into place. After all, they're trainable." 

From the beginning, this had been one of the core beliefs of the planners. The animals, 
however exotic, would fundamentally behave like animals in zoos anywhere. They would learn 
the regularities of their care, and they would respond. 

"Meanwhile, how's the computer?" Hammond said. He glanced at Dennis Nedry, who was 
working at a terminal in the corner of the room. "This damn computer has always been a 
headache." 

"We're getting there," Nedry said. 

"If you had done it right in the first place," Hammond began, but Arnold put a restraining band 
on his arm. Arnold knew there was no point in antagonizing Nedry while he was working. 

"It's a large system," Arnold said. "There are bound to be glitches." 

In fact, the bug list now ran to more than 130 items, and included many odd aspects. For 
example: 

The animal-feeding program reset itself every twelve hours, not every twenty-four hours, and 
would not record feedings on Sundays. As a result, the staff could not accurately measure how 
much the animals were eating. 

The security system, which controlled all the security-card-operated doors, cut out whenever 
main power was lost, and did not come back on with auxiliary power. The security Program only 
ran with main power. 

The physical conservation program, intended to dim lights after 10:00 p.m., only worked on 
alternate days of the week. 

The automated fecal analysis (called Auto Poop), designed to check for parasites in the animal 
stools, invariably recorded all specimens as having the parasite Phagostomum venulosum, 
although none did. The program then automatically dispensed medication into the animals' food. If 
the handlers dumped the medicine out of the hoppers to prevent its being dispensed, an alarm 
sounded which could not be turned off. 

And so it went, page after page of errors. 

When he had arrived, Dennis Nedry had been under the impression that he could make all the 
fixes himself over the weekend. He had paled when he saw the full listing. Now he was calling his 
office in Cambridge, telling his staff programmers they were going to have to cancel their 
weekend plans and work overtime until Monday. And he had told John Arnold that he would need 
to use every telephone link between Isla Nublar and the mainland just to transfer program data 
back and forth to his programmers. 


While Nedry worked, Arnold punched up a new window in his own monitor. It allowed him to 
see what Nedry was doing at the corner console. Not that he didn't trust Nedry. But Arnold just 
liked to know what was going on. 

He looked at the graphics display on his right-hand console, which showed the progress of the 
electric Land Cruisers. They were following the river, just north of the aviary, and the 
ornithischian paddock. 


"If you look to your left,” said the voice, "you will see the dome of the Jurassic Park aviary, which is 
not yet finished for visitors." Tim saw sunlight glinting off aluminum struts in the distance. "And 
directly below is our Mesozoic jungle river-where, if you are lucky, you just may catch a glimpse 
of a very rare carnivore. Keep your eyes peeled, everyone!" 

Inside the Land Cruiser, the screens showed a bird-like head topped with a flaming red crest. 
But everyone in Tim's car was looking out the windows. The car was driving along a high ridge, 
overlooking a fast-moving river below. The river was almost enclosed by dense foliage on both 
sides. 

"There they are now," said the voice. "The animals you see are called dilophosaurs." 

Despite what the recording said, Tim saw only one. The dilophosaur crouched on its hind legs 
by the river, drinking. It was built on the basic carnivore pattern, with a heavy tail, strong hind 
limbs, and a long neck. Its ten-foot-tall body was spotted yellow and black, like a leopard. 

But it was the head that held Tim's attention. Two broad curving crests ran along the top of the 
head from the eyes to the nose. The crests met in the center, making a V shape above the 
dinosaur's head. The crests had red and black stripes, reminiscent of a parrot or toucan. The 
animal gave a soft hooting cry, like an owl. 

"They're pretty,” Lex said. 

"Dilophosaurus, " the tape said, "is one of the earliest carnivorous dinosaurs. Scientists 
thought their jaw muscles were too weak to kill prey, and imagined they were primarily 
scavengers. But now we know they are poisonous." 

"Hey." Tim grinned. "All right." 

Again the distinctive booting call of the dilophosaur drifted across the afternoon air toward 
them. 

Lex shifted uneasily in her seat. "Are they really poisonous, Mr. Regis?" 

"Don't worry about it," Ed Regis said. 

"But are they?" 

"Well, yes, Lex." 

"Along with such living reptiles as Gila monsters and rattlesnakes, Dilophosaurus secretes a 
hematotoxin from glands in its mouth. Unconsciousness follows within minutes of a bite. The 
dinosaur will then finish the victim off at its leisure-making Dilophosaurus a beautiful but deadly 
addition to the animals you see here at Jurassic Park." 

The Land Cruiser turned a corner, leaving the river behind. Tim looked back, hoping for a last 
glimpse of the dilophosaur. This was amazing! Poisonous dinosaurs! He wished he could stop 
the car, but everything was automatic. He bet Dr. Grant wanted to stop the car, too. 

"If you look on the bluff to the right, you'll see Les Gigantes, the site of our superb three-star 
dining room. Chef Alain Richard hails from the world-famous Le BeaumaniSre in France. Make 
your reservations by dialing four from your hotel rooms." 

Tim looked up on the bluff, and saw nothing. 

"Not for a while, though," Ed Regis said. "The restaurant won't even start construction until 
November." 

"Continuing on our prehistoric safari, we come next to the herbivores of the ornithischian 
group. If you look to your right, you can probably see them now." 

Tim saw two animals, standing motionless in the shade of a large tree. Triceratops: the size 
and gray color of an elephant, with the truculent stance of a rhino. The horns above each eye 
curved five feet into the air, looking almost like inverted elephant tusks. A third, rhino-like born 
was located near the nose. And they had the beaky snout of a rhino. 

"Unlike other dinosaurs," the voice said, "Triceratops serratus can't see well. They're 
nearsighted, like the rhinos of today, and they tend to be surprised by moving objects. They'd 
charge our car if they were close enough to see it! But relax, folks-we're safe enough here." 


"Triceratops have a fan-shaped crest behind their heads. It's made of solid bone, and it's very 
strong. These animals weigh about seven tons each. Despite their appearance, they are actually 
quite docile. They know their handlers, and they'll allow themselves to be petted. They 
particularly like to be scratched in the hindquarters." 

"Why don't they move?" Lex said. She rolled down her window. "Hey! Stupid dinosaur! Move!" 

"Don't bother the animals, Lex," Ed Regis said. 

"Why? It's stupid. They just sit there like a picture in a book," Lex said. 

The voice was saying, "-easygoing monsters from a bygone world stand in sharp contrast to 
what we will see next. The most famous predator in the history of the world: the mighty tyrant 
lizard, known as Tyrannosaurus rex." 

"Good, Tyrannosaurus rex, " Tim said. 

"| hope he's better than these bozos," Lex said, turning away from the triceratops. 

The Land Cruiser rumbled forward. 


Big Rex 


"The mighty tyrannosaurs arose late in dinosaur history. Dinosaurs ruled the earth for a hundred 
and twenty million years, but there were tyrannosaurs for only the last fifteen million years of that 
period.” 

The Land Cruisers had stopped at the rise of a hill. They overlooked a forested area sloping 
down to the edge of the lagoon. The sun was falling to the west, sinking into a misty horizon. The 
whole landscape of Jurassic Park was bathed in soft light, with lengthening shadows. The 
surface of the lagoon rippled in pink crescents. Farther south, they saw the graceful necks of the 
camarasaurs, standing at the water's edge, their bodies mirrored in the moving surface. It was 
quiet, except for the soft drone of cicadas. As they stared out at that landscape, it was possible to 
believe that they had really been transported millions of years back in time to a vanished world. 

"It works, doesn't it?" they heard Ed Regis say, over the intercom. "I like to come here 
sometimes, in the evening. And just sit." 

Grant was unimpressed. "Where is T-rex?" 

"Good question. You often see the little one down in the lagoon. The lagoon's stocked, so we 
have fish in there. The little one has learned to catch the fish. Interesting how he does it. He 
doesn't use his hands, but he ducks his whole head under the water. Like a bird." 

"The little one?" 

"The little T-rex. He's a juvenile, two years old, and about a third grown now. Stands eight feet 
high, weighs a ton and a half. The other one's a full-grown tyrannosaur. But | don't see him at the 
moment." 

"Maybe he's down hunting the camarasaurs,” Grant said. 

Regis laughed, his voice tinny over the radio. "He would if he could, believe me. Sometimes he 
stands by the lagoon and stares at those animals, and wiggles those little forearms of his in 
frustration. But the T-rex territory is completely enclosed with trenches and fences. They're 
disguised from view, but believe me, he can't go anywhere." 

"Then where is he?" 

"Hiding," Regis said. "He's a little shy." 

"Shy?" Malcolm said. "Tyrannosaurus rex is shy?" 

"Well, he conceals himself as a general rule. You almost never see him out in the open, 
especially in daylight.” 

"Why is that?" 

"We think it's because he has sensitive skin and sunburns easily." 

Malcolm began to laugh. 

Grant sighed. "You're destroying a lot of illusions." 

"| don't think you'll be disappointed,” Regis said. "Just wait." 

They heard a soft bleating sound. In the center of a field, a small cage rose up into view, lifted 
on hydraulics from underground. The cage bars slid down, and the goat remained tethered in the 
center of the field, bleating plaintively. 

"Any minute now," Regis said again. They stared out the window. 


"Look at them," Hammond said, watching the control room monitor. "Leaning out of the windows, 
so eager. They can't wait to see it. They have come for the danger." 

"That's what I'm afraid of," Muldoon said. He twirled the keys on his finger and watched the 
Land Cruisers tensely. This was the first time that visitors had toured Jurassic Park, and Muldoon 
shared Arnold's apprehension. 

Robert Muldoon was a big man, fifty years old, with a steel-gray mustache and deep blue eyes. 
Raised in Kenya, he had spent most of his life as a guide for African big-game hunters, as had 
his father before him. But since 1980, he had worked principally for conservation groups and zoo 
designers as a wildlife consultant. He had become well known; an article in the London Sunday 
Times had said, "What Robert Trent Jones is to golf courses, Robert Muldoon is to zoos: a 
designer of unsurpassed knowledge and skill." 

In 1986, he had done some work for a San Francisco company that was building a private 
wildlife park on an island in North America. Muldoon had laid out the boundaries for different 
animals, defining space and habitat requirements for lions, elephants, zebras, and hippos. 
Identifying which animals could be kept together, and which had to be separated. At the time, it 
had been a fairly routine job. He had been more interested in an Indian park called TigerWorld in 
southern Kashmir. 

Then, a year ago, he was offered a job as game warden of Jurassic Park. It coincided with a 
desire to leave Africa; the salary was excellent; Muldoon had taken it on for a year. He was 
astonished to discover the park was really a collection of genetically engineered prehistoric 
animals. 

It was of course interesting work, but during his years in Africa, Muldoon had developed an 
unblinking view of animals-an unromantic view-that frequently set him at odds with the Jurassic 
Park management in California, particularly the little martinet standing beside him in the control 
room. In Muldoon's opinion, cloning dinosaurs in a laboratory was one thing. Maintaining them in 
the wild was quite another. 

It was Muldoon's view that some dinosaurs were too dangerous to be kept in a park setting. In 
part, the danger existed because they still knew so little about the animals. For example, nobody 
even suspected the dilophosaurs were poisonous until they were observed hunting indigenous 
rats on the island-biting the rodents and then stepping back, to wait for them to die. And even 
then nobody suspected the dilophosaurs could spit until one of the handlers was almost blinded 
by spitting venom. 

After that, Hammond had agreed to study dilophosaur venom, which was found to contain 
seven different toxic enzymes. It was also discovered that the dilophosaurs could spit a distance 
of fifty feet. Since this raised the possibility that a guest in a car might be blinded, management 
decided to remove the poison sacs. The vets had tried twice, on two different animals, without 
success, No one knew where the poison was being secreted. And no one would ever know until 
an autopsy was performed on a dilophosaur and management would not allow one to be killed. 

Muldoon worried even more about the velociraptors. They were instinctive hunters, and they 
never passed up prey, They killed even when they 't weren't hungry. They killed for the pleasure of 
killing. They were swift: strong runners and astonishing jumpers. They had lethal claws on all four 
limbs; one swipe of a forearm would disembowel a man, spilling his guts out. And they had 
powerful tearing jaws that ripped flesh instead of biting it. They were far more intelligent than the 
other dinosaurs, and they seemed to be natural cage-breakers. 

Every zoo expert knew that certain animals were especially likely to get free of their cages. 
Some, like monkeys and elephants, could undo cage doors. Others, like wild pigs, were 
unusually intelligent and could lift gate fasteners with their snouts. But who would suspect that 
the giant armadillo was a notorious cage-breaker? Or the moose? Yet a moose was almost as 
skillful with its snout as an elephant with its trunk. Moose were always getting free; they had a 
talent for it. 

And so did velociraptors. 

Raptors were at least as intelligent as chimpanzees. And, like chimpanzees, they had agile 
hands that enabled them to open doors and manipulate objects. They could escape with ease. 
And when, as Muldoon had feared, one of them finally escaped, it killed two construction workers 
and maimed a third before being recaptured. After that episode, the visitor lodge had been 


reworked with heavy barred gates, a high perimeter fence, and tempered-glass windows. And the 
raptor holding pen was rebuilt with electronic sensors to warn of another impending escape. 

Muldoon wanted guns as well. And he wanted shoulder-mounted TOW-missile launchers. 
Hunters knew how difficult it was to bring down a four-ton African elephant-and some of the 
dinosaurs weighed ten times as much. Management was horrified, insisting there be no guns 
anywhere on the island. When Muldoon threatened to quit, and to take his story to the press, a 
compromise was reached. In the end, two specially built laser-guided missile launchers were kept in 
a locked room in the basement. Only Muldoon had keys to the room. 

Those were the keys Muldoon was twirling now. "I'm going downstairs," he said. 

Arnold, watching the control screens, nodded. The two Land Cruisers sat at the top of the hill, 
waiting for the T-rex to appear. 

"Hey," Dennis Nedry called, from the far console. "As long as you're up, get me a Coke, okay?" 


Grant waited in the car, watching quietly. The bleating of the goat became louder, more insistent. 
The goat tugged frantically at its tether, racing back and forth. Over the radio, Grant heard Lex 
say in alarm, "What's going to happen to the goat? Is she going to eat the goat?" 

"| think so," someone said to her, and then Ellie turned the radio down. Then they smelled the 
odor, a garbage stench of putrefaction and decay that drifted up the hillside toward them. 

Grant whispered, "He's here." "She," 

Malcolm said. 

The goat was tethered in the center of the field, thirty yards from the nearest trees. The 
dinosaur must be somewhere among the trees, but fora moment Grant could see nothing at all. 
Then he realized he was looking too low: the animal's head stood twenty feet above the ground, 
half concealed among the upper branches of the palm trees. 

Malcolm whispered, "Oh, my God. . . . She's as large as a bloody building. . . ." 

Grant stared at the enormous square head, five feet long, mottled reddish brown, with huge 
jaws and fangs. The tyrannosaur's jaws worked once, opening and closing. But the huge animal 
did not emerge from hiding. 

Malcolm whispered: "How long will it wait?" 

"Maybe three or four minutes. Maybe-" 

The tyrannosaur sprang silently forward, fully revealing her enormous body. In four bounding 
steps she covered the distance to the goat, bent down, and bit it through the neck. The bleating 
stopped. There was silence. 

Poised over her kill, the tyrannosaur became suddenly hesitant. Her massive head turned on 
the muscular neck, looking in all directions. She stared fixedly at the Land Cruiser, high above on 
the hill. 

Malcolm whispered, "Can she see us?" 

"Oh yes," Regis said, on the intercom. "Let's see if she's going to eat here in front of us, or if 
she's going to drag the prey away." 

The tyrannosaur bent down, and sniffed the carcass of the goat. A bird chirped: her head 
snapped up, alert, watchful. She looked back and forth, scanning in small jerking shifts. 

"Like a bird," Ellie said. 

Still the tyrannosaur hesitated. "What is she afraid of?" Malcolm whispered. 

"Probably another tyrannosaur," Grant whispered. Big carnivores like lions and tigers often 
became cautious after a kill, behaving as if suddenly exposed. Nineteenth-century zoologists 
imagined the animals felt guilty for what they had done. But contemporary scientists documented 
the effort behind a kill-hours of patient stalking before the final lunge-as well as the frequency of 
failure. The idea of "nature, red in tooth and claw" was wrong; most often the prey got away. 
When a carnivore finally brought down an animal, it was watchful for another predator, who might 
attack it and steal its prize. Thus this tyrannosaur was probably fearful of another tyrannosaur. 

The huge animal bent over the goat again. One great hind limb held the carcass in place as 
the jaws began to tear the flesh. 

"She's going to stay," Regis whispered. "Excellent." The tyrannosaur lifted her head again, 
ragged chunks of bleeding flesh in her jaws. She stared at the Land Cruiser. She began to chew. 
They heard the sickening crunch of bones. 

"Ewww," Lex said, over the intercom. "That's disgusting." 


And then, as if caution had finally gotten the better of her, the tyrannosaur lifted the remains of 
the goat in her jaws and carried it silently back among the trees. 

"Ladies and gentlemen, Tyrannosaurus rex, " the tape said. The Land Cruisers started up, and 
moved silently off, through the foliage. 

Malcolm sat back in his seat. "Fantastic," he said. 

Gennaro wiped his forehead. He looked pale. 


Control 


Henry Wu came into the control room to find everyone sitting in the dark, listening to the voices 
on the radio. 

"-Jesus, if an animal like that gets out," Gennaro was saying, his voice tinny on the speaker, 
"there'd be no stopping it." 

"No stopping it, no..." 

"Huge, with no natural enemies .. ." 

"My God, think of it. . ." 

In the control room, Hammond said, "Damn those people. They are so negative." 

Wu said, "They're still going on about an animal escaping? | don't understand. They must have 
seen by now that we have everything under control. We've engineered the animals and 
engineered the resort. . . ." He shrugged. 

It was Wu's deepest perception that the park was fundamentally sound, as he believed his 
paleo-DNA was fundamentally sound. Whatever problems might arise in the DNA were 
essentially point-problems in the code, causing a specific problem in the phenotype: an enzyme 
that didn't switch on, or a protein that didn't fold. Whatever the difficulty, it was always solved with a 
relatively minor adjustment in the next version. 

Similarly, he knew that Jurassic Park's problems were not fundamental problems. They were 
not control problems. Nothing as basic, or as serious, as the possibility of an animal escaping. 
Wu found it offensive to think that anyone would believe him capable of contributing to a system 
where such a thing could happen. 

"It's that Malcolm," Hammond said darkly. "He's behind it all. He was against us from the start, 
you know. He's got his theory that complex systems can't be controlled and nature can't be 
imitated. | don't know what his problem is. Hell, we're just making a zoo here. World's full of ‘em, 
and they all work fine. But he's going to prove his theory or die trying. | just hope he doesn't panic 
Gennaro into trying to shut the park down." 

Wu said, "Can he do that?" 

"No," Hammond said. "But he can try. He can try and frighten the Japanese investors, and get 
them to withdraw funds. Or he can make a stink with the San Jos, government. He can make 
trouble.” 

Arnold stubbed out his cigarette. "Let's wait and see what happens," he said. "We believe in 
the park. Let's see how it plays out." 


Muldoon got off the elevator, nodded to the ground-floor guard, and went downstairs to the 
basement. He flicked on the lights. The basement was filled with two dozen Land Cruisers, 
arranged in neat rows. These were the electric cars that would eventually form an endless loop, 
touring the park, returning to the visitor center. 

In the corner was a Jeep with a red stripe, one of two gasoline-powered vebicles-Harding, the 
vet, had taken the other that morning-which could go anywhere in the park, even among the 
animals. The Jeeps were painted with a diagonal red stripe because for some reason it 
discouraged the triceratops from charging the car. 

Muldoon moved past the Jeep, toward the back. The steel door to the armaments room was 
unmarked. He unlocked it with his key, and swung the heavy door wide. Gun racks lined the 
interior. He pulled out a Randler Shoulder Launcher and a case of canisters. He tucked two gray 
rockets under his other arm. 

After locking the door behind him, he put the gun into the back seat of the Jeep. As he left the 
garage, he heard the distant rumble of thunder. 


"Looks like rain," Ed Regis said, glancing up at the sky. 

The Land Cruisers had stopped again, near the sauropod swamp. A large herd of apatosaurs 
was grazing at the edge of the lagoon, eating the leaves of the upper branches of the palm trees. 
In the same area were several duckbilled hadrosaurs, which in comparison looked much smaller. 

Of course, Tim knew the hadrosaurs weren't really small. It was only that the apatosaurs were 
so much larger. Their tiny heads reached fifty feet into the air, extending out on their long necks. 

"The big animals you see are commonly called Brontosaurus, " the recording said, "but they 
are actually Apatosaurus. They weigh more than thirty tons. That means a single animal is as big 
as a whole herd of modern elephants. And you may notice that their preferred area, alongside the 
lagoon, is not swampy. Despite what the books say, brontosaurs avoid swamps. They prefer dry 
land." 

"Brontosaurus is the biggest dinosaur, Lex," Ed Regis said. Tim didn't bother to contradict him. 
Actually, Brachiosaurus was three times as large. And some people thought Ultrasaurus and 
Seismosaurus were even larger than Brachiosaurus. Seismosaurus might have weighed a 
hundred tons! 

Alongside the apatosaurs, the smaller hadrosaurs stood on their hind legs to get at foliage. 
They moved gracefully for such large creatures. Several infant hadrosaurs scampered around the 
adults, eating the leaves that dropped from the mouths of the larger animals. 

"The dinosaurs of Jurassic Park don't breed," the recording said. "The young animals you see 
were introduced a few months ago, already hatched. But the adults nurture them anyway." 

There was the rolling growl of thunder. The sky was darker, lower, and menacing. 

"Yeah, looks like rain, all right," Ed Regis said. 

The car started forward, and Tim looked back at the hadrosaurs. Suddenly, off to one side, he 
saw a pale yellow animal moving quickly. There were brownish stripes on its back. He recognized 
it instantly. "Hey!" he shouted. "Stop the car!" 

‘What is it?" Ed Regis said. 

‘Quick! Stop the car!" 

"We move on now to see the last of our great prehistoric animals, the stegosaurs," the 
recorded voice said. 

"What's the matter, Tim?" 

"| saw one! | saw one in the field out there!" 

"Saw what?" 

"A raptor! In that field!" 

"The stegosaurs are a mid-Jurassic animal, evolving about a hundred and seventy million 
years ago," the recording said. "Several of these remarkable herbivores live here at Jurassic 
Park-" 

"Oh, | don't think so, Tim," Ed Regis said. "Not a raptor." 

"| did! Stop the car!" 

There was a babble on the intercom, as the news was relayed to Grant and Malcolm. "Tim 
says he saw a raptor." 

"Where?" 

"Back at the field." 

"Let's go back and look." 

"We can't go back," Ed Regis said. "We can only go forward. The cars are programmed." 

"We can't go back?" Grant said. 

"No," Regis said. "Sorry, You see, it's kind of a ride-" 

"Tim, this is Professor Malcolm," said a voice cutting in on the intercom. "I have just one 
question for you about this raptor. How old would you say it was?" 

"Older than the baby we saw today," Tim said. "And younger than the big adults in the pen. 
The adults were six feet tall. This one was about half that size." 

"That's fine," Malcolm said. 

"| only saw it for a second," Tim said. 

"I'm sure it wasn't a raptor," Ed Regis said. "It couldn't possibly be a raptor. Must have been 
one of the othys. They're always jumping their fences. We have a hell of a time with them." 

"| know | saw a raptor," Tim said. 

"I'm hungry," Lex said. She was starting to whine. 


In the control room, Arnold turned to Wu. "What do you think the kid saw?" 

"| think it must have been an otby." 

Arnold nodded. "We have trouble tracking otbys, because they spend so much time In the 
trees." The otbys were an exception to the usual minute-to-minute control they maintained over 
the animals. The computers were constantly losing and picking up the othys, as they went into 
the trees and then came down again. 

"What burns me," Hammond said, "is that we have made this wonderful park, this fantastic 
park, and our very first visitors are going through it like accountants, just looking for problems. 
They aren't experiencing the wonder of it at all.” 

"That's their problem," Arnold said. "We can't make them experience wonder." The intercom 
clicked, and Arnold heard a voice drawl, "Ah, John, this is the Anne B over at the dock. We 
haven't finished offloading, but I'm looking at that storm pattern south of us. I'd rather not be tied 
up here if this chop gets any worse." 

Arnold turned to the monitor showing the cargo vessel, which was moored at the dock on the 
east side of the island. He pressed the radio button. "How much left to do, Jim?" 

"Just the three final equipment containers. | haven't checked the mainfest, but | assume you 
can wait another two weeks for it. We're not well berthed here, you know, and we are one 
hundred miles offshore." 

"You requesting permission to leave?" 

"Yes, John." 

"| want that equipment,” Hammond said. "That's equipment for the labs. We need it." 

"Yes," Arnold said. "But you didn't want to put money into a storm barrier to protect the pier. So 
we don't have a good harbor. If the storm gets worse, the ship will be pounded against the dock. 
I've seen ships lost that way. Then you've got all the other expenses, replacement of the vessel 
plus salvage to clear your dock . . . and you can't use your dock until you do. . . ." 

Hammond gave a dismissing wave. "Get them out of there." 

"Permission to leave, Anne B, " Arnold said, into the radio. 

"See you in two weeks," the voice said. 

On the video monitor, they saw the crew on the decks, casting off the lines. Arnold turned back 
to the main console bank. He saw the Land Cruisers moving through fields of steam. 

"Where are they now?" Hammond said. 

"It looks like the south fields," Arnold said. The southern end of the island had more volcanic 
activity than the north. "That means they should be almost to the stegos. I'm sure they'll stop and 
see what Harding is doing." 


Stegosaur 


As the Land Cruiser came to a stop, Ellie Sattler stared through the plumes of steam at the 
stegosaurus. It was standing quietly, not moving. A Jeep with a red stripe was parked alongside tt. 

"| have to admit, that's a funny-looking animal," Malcolm said. 

The stegosaurus was twenty feet long, with a huge bulky body and vertical armor plates along 
its back. The tail had dangerous-looking three-foot spikes. But the neck tapered to an absurdly 
small head with a stupid gaze, like a very dumb horse. 

As they watched, a man walked around from behind the animal. "That's our vet, Dr. Harding," 
Regis said, over the radio. "He's anesthetized the stego, which is why it's not moving. It's sick." 

Grant was already getting out of the car, hurrying toward the motionless stegosaur. Ellie got 
out and looked back as the second Land Cruiser pulled up and the two kids jumped out. "What's 
he sick with?" Tim said. 

"They're not sure," Ellie said. 

The great leathery plates along the stegosaur's spine drooped slightly. It breathed slowly, 
laboriously, making a wet sound with each breath. 

"Is it contagious?" Lex said. 

They walked toward the tiny head of the animal, where Grant and the vet were on their knees, 
peering into the stegosaur's mouth. 


Lex wrinkled her nose. "This thing sure is big," she said. "And smelly." 

"Yes, it is." Ellie had already noticed the stegosaur had a peculiar odor, like rotting fish. It 
reminded her of something she knew, but couldn't quite place. In any case, she had never 
smelled a stegosaur before. Maybe this was its characteristic odor. But she had her doubts. Most 
herbivores did not have a strong smell. Nor did their droppings. It was reserved for the meat- 
eaters to develop a real stink. 

"Is that because it's sick?" Lex asked. 

"Maybe. And don't forget the vet's tranquilized it." 

"Ellie, have a look at this tongue," Grant said. 

The dark purple tongue drooped limply from the animal's mouth. The vet shone a light on it so 
she could see the very fine silvery blisters. "Microvesicles," Ellie said. "Interesting." 

"We've had a difficult time with these stegos," the vet said. "They're always getting sick." 

"What are the symptoms?" Ellie asked. She scratched the tongue with her fingernail. A clear 
liquid exuded from the broken blisters. 

"Ugh," Lex said, 

"Imbalance, disorientation, labored breathing, and massive diarrhea," Harding said. "Seems to 
happen about once every six weeks or so." 

"They feed continuously?" 

"Oh yes," Harding said. "Animal this size has to take in a minimum of five or six hundred 
pounds of plant matter daily just to keep going. They're constant foragers." 

“Then it's not likely to be poisoning from a plant," Ellie said. Constant browsers would be 
constantly sick if they were eating a toxic plant. Not every six weeks. 

"Exactly," the vet said. 

"May |?" Ellie asked. She took the flashlight from the vet. "You have pupillary effects from the 
tranquilizer?" she said, shining the light in the stegosaur's eye. 

"Yes. There's a miotic effect, pupils are constricted." "But 

these pupils are dilated," she said. 

Harding looked. There was no question: the stegosaur's pupil was dilated, and did not contract 
when light shone on it. "I'll be damned,” he said. "That's a pharmacological effect." 

"Yes." Ellie got back on her feet and looked around. "What is the animal's range?" 

"About five square miles." 

"In this general area?" she asked. They were in an open meadow, with scattered rocky 
outcrops, and intermittent plumes of steam rising from the ground. It was late afternoon, and the 
sky was pink beneath the lowering gray clouds. 

"Their range is mostly north and cast of here," Harding said. "But when they get sick, they're 
usually somewhere around this particular area." 

It was an interesting puzzle, she thought. How to explain the periodicity of the poisoning? She 
pointed across the field. "You see those low, delicate-looking bushes?" 

"West Indian lilac." Harding nodded. "We know it's toxic. The animals don't eat it." 

"You're sure?" 

"Yes. We monitor them on video, and I've checked droppings just to be certain. The stegos 
never eat the lilac bushes." 

Melia azedarach, called chinaberry or West Indian lilac, contained a number of toxic alkaloids. 
The Chinese used the plant as a fish poison. 

"They don't eat it,” the vet said. 

"Interesting," Ellie said. "Because otherwise | would have said that this animal shows all the 
classic signs of Melia toxicity: stupor, blistering of the mucous membranes, and pupillary 
dilatation." She set off toward the field to examine the plants more closely, her body bent over the 
ground. "You're right," she said. "Plants are healthy, no sign of being eaten. None at all." 

"And there's the six-week interval," the vet reminded her. 

"The stegosaurs come here how often?" 

"About once a week," he said. "Stegos make a slow loop through their home-range territory, 
feeding as they go. They complete the loop in about a week." 

"But they're only sick once every six weeks." 

"Correct," Harding said. 

"This is boring," Lex said. 


"Ssshb," Tim said. "Dr. Sattler's trying to think." 

"Unsuccesstfully,” Ellie said, walking farther out into the field. 

Behind her, she heard Lex saying, "Anybody want to play a little pickle?" 

Ellie stared at the ground. The field was rocky in many places. She could hear the sound of the 
surf, somewhere to the left. There were berries among the rocks. Perhaps the animals were just 
eating berries. But that didn't make sense. West Indian lilac berries were terribly bitter. 

"Finding anything?" Grant said, coming up to join her. 

Ellie sighed. "Just rocks," she said. "We must be near the beach, because all these rocks are 
smooth. And they're in funny little piles." 

"Funny little piles?" Grant said. 

"All over. There's one pile right there." She pointed. 

As soon as she did, she realized what she was looking at. The rocks were worn, but it had 
nothing to do with the ocean. These rocks were heaped in small piles, almost as if they had been 
thrown down that way. 

They were piles of gizzard stones. 

Many birds and crocodiles swallowed small stones, which collected in a muscular pouch in the 
digestive tract, called the gizzard. Squeezed by the muscles of the gizzard, the stones helped 
crush tough plant food before it reached the stomach, and thus aided digestion. Some scientists 
thought dinosaurs also had gizzard stones. For one thing, dinosaur teeth were too small, and too 
little worn, to have been used for chewing food. It was presumed that dinosaurs swallowed their 
food whole and let the gizzard stones break down the plant fibers. And some skeletons had been 
found with an associated pile of small stones in the abdominal area. But it had never been 
verified, and- 

"Gizzard stones," Grant said. 

"| think so, yes. They swallow these stones, and after a few weeks the stones are worn 
smooth, so they regurgitate them, leaving this little pile, and swallow fresh stones. And when they 
do, they swallow berries as well. And get sick." 

"I'll be damned," Grant said. "I'm sure you're right." 

He looked at the pile of stones, brushing through them with his band, following the instinct of a 
paleontologist. 

Then he stopped. 

"Ellie," he said. "Take a look at this.” 


"Put it there, babe! Right in the old mitt!" Lex cried, and Gennaro threw the ball to her. 

She threw it back so hard that his hand stung. "Take it easy! | don't have a glove!" 

"You wimp!" she said contemptuously. 

Annoyed, he fired the ball at her, and heard it smack! in the leather. "Now that's more like it," 
she said. 

Standing by the dinosaur, Gennaro continued to play catch as he talked to Malcolm. "How 
does this sick dinosaur fit into your theory?" 

"It's predicted," Malcolm said. 

Gennaro shook his head. "Is anything not predicted by your theory?" 

"Look," Malcolm said. "It's nothing to do with me. It's chaos theory. But | notice nobody is 
willing to listen to the consequences of the mathematics. Because they imply very large 
consequences for human life. Much larger than Heisenberg's principle or G"del's theorem, which 
everybody rattles on about. Those are actually rather academic considerations. Philosophical 
considerations. But chaos theory concerns everyday life. Do you know why computers were first 
built?" 

"No," Gennaro said. 

"Burn it in there," Lex yelled. "Computers were built in the late 1940s because mathematicians 
like John von Neumann thought that if you had a computer-a machine to handle a lot of variables 
simultaneously-you would be able to predict the weather. Weather would finally fall to human 
understanding. And men believed that dream for the next forty years. They believed that 
prediction was just a function of keeping track of things. If you knew enough, you could predict 
anything. That's been a cherished scientific belief since Newton." 

"And?" 


"Chaos theory throws it right out the window. It says that you can never predict certain 
phenomena at all. You can never predict the weather more than a few days away. All the money 
that has been spent on long-range forecasting-about half a billion dollars in the last few decades- 
is money wasted. It's a fool's errand. It's as pointless as trying to turn lead into gold. We look 
back at the alchemists and laugh at what they were trying to do, but future generations will laugh at 
us the same way. We've tried the impossible-and spent a lot of money doing it. Because in fact 
there are great categories of phenomena that are inherently unpredictable." 

"Chaos says that?" 

"Yes, and it is astonishing how few people care to hear it," Malcolm said. "I gave all this 
information to Hammond long before he broke ground on this place. You're going to engineer a 
bunch of prehistoric animals and set them on an island? Fine. A lovely dream. Charming. But it 
won't go as planned. It is inherently unpredictable, just as the weather is." 

"You told him this?" Gennaro said. 

"Yes. | also told him where the deviations would occur. Obviously the fitness of the animals to 
the environment was one area. This stegosaur is a hundred million years old. It isn't adapted to 
our world. The air is different, the solar radiation is different, the land is different, the insects are 
different, the sounds are different, the vegetation is different. Everything is different. The oxygen 
content is decreased. This poor animal's like a human being at ten thousand feet altitude. Listen 
to him wheezing." 

"And the other areas?" 

"Broadly speaking, the ability of the park to control the spread of life forms. Because the history 
of evolution is that life escapes all barriers. Life breaks free. Life expands to new territories. 
Painfully, perhaps even dangerously. But life finds a way." Malcolm shook his head. "I don't mean 
to be philosophical, but there it is." 

Gennaro looked over. Ellie and Grant were across the field, waving their arms and shouting. 


"Did you get my Coke?" Dennis Nedry asked, as Muldoon came back into the control room. 

Muldoon didn't bother to answer. He went directly to the monitor and looked at what was 
happening. Over the radio he heard Harding's voice saying, "-the stego-finally-handle on-now-" 

"What's that about?" Muldoon said. 

"They're down by the south point," Arnold said. "That's why they're breaking up a little. I'll 
switch them to another channel. But they found out what's wrong with the stegos. Eating some 
kind of berry." 

Hammond nodded. "| knew we'd solve that sooner or later," he said. 


"It's not very impressive," Gennaro said. He held the white fragment, no larger than a postage 
stamp, up on his fingertip in the fading light. "You sure about this, Alan?" 

"Absolutely sure," Grant said. "What gives it away is the patterning on the interior surface, the 
interior curve. Turn it over and you will notice a faint pattern of raised lines, making roughly 
triangular shapes." 

"Yes, | see them." 

"Well, I've dug out two eggs with patterns like that at my site in Montana." 

"You're saying this is a piece of dinosaur eggshell?" 

"Absolutely," Grant said. 

Harding shook his head. "These dinosaurs can't breed." 

"Evidently they can," Gennaro said. 

"That must be a bird egg," Harding said. "We have literally dozens of species on the island." 

Grant shook his head. "Look at the curvature. The shell is almost flat. That's from a very big 
egg. And notice the thickness of the shell. Unless you have ostriches on this island, it's a 
dinosaur egg." 

"But they can't possibly breed," Harding insisted. "All the animals are female." 

"All | know," Grant said, "is that this is a dinosaur egg." 

Malcolm said, "Can you tell the species?" "Yes," 

Grant said. "It's a velociraptor egg." 


Control 


"Absolutely absurd," Hammond said in the control room, listening to the report over the radio. "It 
must be a bird egg. That's all it can be." 

The radio crackled. He heard Malcolm's voice. "Let's do a little test, shall we? Ask Mr. Arnold 
to run one of his computer tallies." 


"Now?" 


"Yes, right now. | understand you can transmit it to the screen in Dr. Harding's car. Do that, 


too, will you?" 


"No problem," Arnold said. A moment later, the screen in the control room printed out: 


Total Animals 
Species 


Tyrannosaurs 
41 
Maiasaurs 
3.3 
Stegosaurs 
3.9 
Triceratops 
3.1 
Procompsognathids 
3.9 
Othnielia 
3.1 
Velociraptors 
3.0 
Apatosaurs 
3.1 
Hadrosaurs 
3.1 
Dilophosaurs 
43 
Pterosaurs 
43 


238 





Expected 


21 


Found Ver 


21 


49 


16 


17 


11 


Hypsilophodontids 33 33 
29 


Euoplocepbalids 16 16 
4.0 

Styracosaurs 18 18 
3.9 

Callovosaurs 22 22 
41 
Total 238 238 


"| hope you're satisfied," Hammond said. "Are you receiving it down there on your screen?" 

"We see it," Malcolm said. 

“Everything accounted for, as always." He couldn't keep the satisfaction out of his voice. 

"Now then," Malcolm said. "Can you have the computer search for a different number of 
animals?" 

"Like what?" Arnold said. 

“Try two hundred thirty-nine." 

"Just a minute," Arnold said, frowning. A moment later the screen printed: 





Total Animals 239 
Species Expected Found Ver 
Tyrannosaurs 2 2 
41 
Maiasaurs 21 21 
3.3 
Stegosaurs 4 4 
3.9 
Triceratops 8 8 
3.1 
Procompsognathids 49 50 
3.9 
Othnielia 16 16 
3.1 
Velociraptors 8 8 
3.0 
Apatosaurs 17 17 
3.1 
Hadrosaurs 11 11 
3.1 
Dilophosaurs 7 7 
43 
Pterosaurs 6 6 
43 
Hypsilophodontids 33 33 
29 
Euoplocepbalids 16 16 
4.0 
Styracosaurs 18 18 
3.9 
Callovosaurs 22 22 
41 


Total 238 239 


Hammond sat forward. "What the hell is that?" 

"We picked up another compy." 

"From where?" "I don't 

know!" 

The radio crackled. "Now, then: can you ask the computer to search for, let us say, three 
hundred animals?" 

"What is he talking about?" Hammond said, his voice rising. "Three hundred animals? What's 
he talking about?" 

"Just a minute," Arnold said. "That'll take a few minutes." He punched buttons on the screen. 
The first line of the totals appeared: 


Total Animals 239 





"| don't understand what he's driving at," Hammond said. 
"I'm afraid | do," Arnold said. He watched the screen. The numbers on the first line were 
clicking: 


Total Animals 244 





"Two hundred forty-four?" Hammond said. "What's going on?" 

"The computer Is counting the animals in the park," Wu said. "All the animals." 

"| thought that's what it always did." He spun. "Nedry! Have you screwed up again?" 

"No," Nedry said, looking up from his console. "Computer allows the operator to enter an 
expected number of animals, in order to make the counting process faster. But it's a 
convenience, not a flaw." 

"He's right," Arnold said. "We just always used the base count of two hundred thirty-eight 
because we assumed there couldn't be more." 


Total Animals 262 





"Wait a minute," Hammond said. "These animals can't breed. The computer must be counting 
field mice or something." 

"| think so, too,” Arnold said. "It's almost certainly an error in the visual tracking. But we'll know 
soon enough." 

Hammond turned to Wu. "They can't breed, can they?" 

"No," Wu said. 


Total Animals 270 





"Where are they coming from?" Arnold said, 
"Damned if | know," Wu said. 
They watched the numbers climb. 


Total Animals 283 





Over the radio, they heard Gennaro say, "Holy shit, how much more?" 

And they heard the girl say, "I'm getting hungry. When are we going home?" 
"Pretty soon, Lex. " 

On the screen, there was a flashing error message: 


ERROR: Search Params: 3000 Animals Not Found 





"An error," Hammond said, nodding. "I thought so. | had the feeling all along there must be an 
error." 
But a moment later the screen printed: 





Total Animals 292 
Species Expected Found Ver 

Tyrannosaurs 2 2 
41 

Maiasaurs 21 22 
3.3 

Stegosaurs 4 4 
3.9 

Triceratops 8 8 
3.1 

Procompsognathids 49 65 
3.9 

Othnielia 16 23 
3.1 

Velociraptors 8 37 
3.0 

Apatosaurs 17 17 
3.1 

Hadrosaurs 11 11 
3.1 

Dilophosaurs 7 7 
43 

Pterosaurs 6 6 
43 

Hypsilophodontids 33 34 
29 

Euoplocepbalids 16 16 
4.0 

Styracosaurs 18 18 
3.9 

Callovosaurs 22 22 
41 
Total 238 292 


The radio crackled. "Now you see the flaw in your procedures," Malcolm said. "You only 
tracked the expected number of dinosaurs. You were worried about losing animals, and your 
procedures were designed to advise you instantly if you had less than the expected number. But 
that wasn't the problem. The problem was, you had more than the expected number." 

"Christ," Arnold said. 


"There can't be more," Wu said. "We know how many we've released. There can't be more 
than that." 

"Afraid so, Henry," Malcolm said. "They're breeding." 

"No." 

"Even if you don't accept Grant's eggshell, you can prove it with your own data. Take a look at 
the compy height graph. Arnold will put it up for you." 


"Notice anything about it?" Malcolm said. 

"It's a Poisson distribution," Wu said. "Normal curve." 

"But didn't you say you introduced the compys in three batches? At six-month intervals?" 

"Yes..." 

"Then you should get a graph with peaks for each of the three separate batches that were 
introduced," Malcolm said, tapping the keyboard. "Like this." 


"But you didn't get this graph," Malcolm said. "The graph you actually got is a graph of a 
breeding population. Your compys are breeding." 

Wu shook his head. "I don't see how." 

"They're breeding, and so are the othnielia, the maiasaurs, the hypsys-and the velociraptors." 

"Christ," Muldoon said. "There are raptors free in the park." 

"Well, it's not that bad," Hammond said, looking at the screen. "We have increases in just three 
categories-well, five categories. Very small increases in two of them. . ." 

"What are you talking about?" Wu said, loudly. "Don't you know what this means?" 

"Of course | know what this means, Henry," Hammond said. "It means you screwed up." 

"Absolutely not." 

"You've got breeding dinosaurs out there, Henry.' 

"But they're all female," Wu said. "It's impossible. There must be a mistake. And look at the 
numbers. A small increase in the big animals, the maiasaurs and the hypsys. And big increases 
in the number of small animals. It just doesn't make sense. It must be a mistake." 

The radio clicked. "Actually not," Grant said. "I think these numbers confirm that breeding is 
taking place. In seven different sites around the island." 


Breeding Sites 


The sky was growing darker. Thunder rumbled in the distance. Grant and the others leaned in the 
doors of the Jeep, staring at the screen on the dashboard. "Breeding sites?" Wu said, over the 
radio. 

"Nests," Grant said. "Assuming the average clutch is eight to twelve hatching eggs, these data 
would indicate the compys have two nests. The raptors have two nests. The othys have one nest. 
And the hypsys and the maias have one nest each." 

"Where are these nests?" 

"We'll have to find them," Grant said. "Dinosaurs build their nests in secluded places." 

"But why are there so few big animals?" Wu said. "If there is a maia nest of eight to twelve 
eggs, there should be eight to twelve new maias. Not just one." 

"That's right," Grant said. "Except that the raptors and the compys that are loose in the park 
are probably eating the eggs of the bigger animals and perhaps eating the newly hatched young, 
as well." 

"But we've never seen that," Arnold said, over the radio. 

"Raptors are nocturnal," he said. "Is anyone watching the park at night?" 

There was a long silence. 

"| didn't think so," Grant said. 


"It still doesn't make sense," Wu said. "You can't support fifty additional animals on a couple of 
nests of eggs." 

"No," Grant said. "| assume they are eating something else as well. Perhaps small rodents. 
Mice and rats?" 

There was another silence. 

"Let me guess,” Grant said. "When you first came to the island, you had a problem with rats. 
But as time passed, the problem faded away." 

"Yes. That's true..." 

"And you never thought to investigate why.” "Well, 

we just assumed . . ." Arnold said. 

"Look," Wu said, "the fact remains, all the animals are female. They can't breed." 

Grant had been thinking about that. He had recently learned of an intriguing West German 
study that he suspected held the answer. "When you made your dinosaur DNA," Grant said, "you 
were working with fragmentary pieces, is that right?" 

"Yes," Wu said. 

"In order to make a complete strand, we're you ever required to include DNA fragments from 
other species?" 

"Occasionally, yes," Wu said. "It's the only way to accomplish the job. Sometimes we included 
avian DNA, from a variety of birds, and sometimes reptilian DNA." 

"Any amphibian DNA? Specifically, frog DNA?" 

"Possibly. I'd have to check." 

"Check," Grant said. "I think you'll find that holds the answer." 

Malcolm said, "Frog DNA? Why frog DNA?" 

Gennaro said impatiently, “Listen, this is all very intriguing, but we're forgetting the main 
question: have any animals gotten off the island?" 

Grant said, "We can't tell from these data." 

"Then how are we going to find out?" 

"There's only one way | know," Grant said. "We'll have to find the individual dinosaur nests, 
inspect them, and count the remaining egg fragments. From that we may be able to determine 
how many animals were originally hatched. And we can begin to assess whether any are 
missing." 

Malcolm said, "Even so, you won't know if the missing animals are killed, or dead from natural 
causes, or whether they have left the island." 

"No," Grant said, "but it's a start. And | think we can get more information from an intensive 
look at the population graphs." 

"How are we going to find these nests?" 

"Actually," Grant said, "I think the computer will be able to help us with that." 

"Can we go back now?" Lex said. "I'm hungry." 

"Yes, let's go," Grant said, smiling at her. "You've been very patient." 

"You'll be able to eat in about twenty minutes," Ed Regis said, starting toward the two Land 
Cruisers. 

"I'll stay for a while," Ellie said, "and get photos of the stego with Dr. Harding's camera. Those 
vesicles in the mouth will have cleared up by tomorrow." 

"| want to get back," Grant said. "I'll go with the kids." "I 

will, too," Malcolm said. 

"I think I'll stay," Gennaro said, "and go back with Harding in his Jeep, with Dr. Sattler." 

"Fine, let's go." 

They started walking. Malcolm said, "Why exactly is our lawyer staying?" 

Grant shrugged. "I think it might have something to do with Dr. Sattler." 

"Really? The shorts, you think?" 

"It's happened before," Grant said. 

When they came to the Land Cruisers, Tim said, "I want to ride in the front one this time, with 
Dr. Grant." 

Malcolm said, "Unfortunately, Dr. Grant and | need to talk." "I'll 

just sit and listen. | won't say anything," Tim said. "It's a private 

conversation,” Malcolm said. 


"Tell you what, Tim," Ed Regis said. "Let them sit in the rear car by themselves. We'll sit in the 
front car, and you can use the night-vision goggles. Have you ever used night-vision goggles, 
Tim? They're goggles with very sensitive CCDs that allow you to see in the dark." 

"Neat," he said, and moved toward the first car. 

"Hey!" Lex said. "I want to use it, too." "No," 

Tim said. 

"No fair! No fair! You get to do everything, Timmy!" 

Ed Regis watched them go and said to Grant, "| can see what the ride back is going to be like." 

Grant and Malcolm climbed into the second car. A few raindrops spattered the windshield. 
"Let's get going," Ed Regis said. "I'm about ready for dinner. And | could do with a nice banana 
daiquiri. What do you say, folks? Daiquiri sound good?" He pounded the metal panel of the car. 
"See you back at camp" he said, and he started running toward the first car, and climbed aboard. 

A red light on the dashboard blinked. With a soft electric whirr, the Land Cruisers started off. 


Driving back in the fading light, Malcolm seemed oddly subdued. Grant said, "You must feel 
vindicated. About your theory." 

"As a matter of fact, I'm feeling a bit of dread. | suspect we are at a very dangerous point." 

"Why?" 

"Intuition." 

"Do mathematicians believe in intuition?" 

"Absolutely. Very important, intuition. Actually, | was thinking of fractals," Malcolm said. "You 
know about fractals?" 

Grant shook his head. "Not really, no." 

"Fractals are a kind of geometry, associated with a man named Mandelbrot. Unlike ordinary 
Euclidean geometry that everybody learns in school-squares and cubes and spheres-fractal 
geometry appears to describe real objects in the natural world. Mountains and clouds are fractal 
shapes. So fractals are probably related to reality. Somehow. 

"Well, Mandelbrot found a remarkable thing with his geometric tools. He found that things 
looked almost identical at different scales." 

"At different scales?" Grant said. 

"For example," Malcolm said, "a big mountain, seen from far away, has a certain rugged 
mountain shape. If you get closer, and examine a small peak of the big mountain, it will have the 
same mountain shape. In fact, you can go all the way down the scale to a tiny speck of rock, 
seen under a microscope-it will have the same basic fractal shape as the big mountain." 

"| don't really see why this is worrying you," Grant said. He yawned. He smelled the sulfur 
fumes of the volcanic steam. They were coming now to the section of road that ran near the 
coastline, overlooking the beach and the ocean. 

"It's a way of looking at things," Malcolm said. "Mandelbrot found a sameness from the 
smallest to the largest. And this sameness of scale also occurs for events." 

"Events?" 

"Consider cotton prices," Malcolm said. "There are good records of cotton prices going back 
more than a hundred years. When you study fluctuations in cotton prices, you find that the graph of 
price fluctuations in the course of a day looks basically like the graph for a week, which looks 
basically like the graph for a year, or for ten years. And that's how things are. A day is like a 
whole life. You start out doing one thing, but end up doing something else, plan to run an errand, 
but never get there. . . . And at the end of your life, your whole existence has that same 
haphazard quality, too. Your whole life has the same shape as a single day." 

"| guess it's one way to look at things," Grant said. 

"No," Malcolm said. "It's the only way to look at things. At least, the only way that is true to 
reality. You see, the fractal idea of sameness carries within it an aspect of recursion, a kind of 
doubling back on itself, which means that events are unpredictable. That they can change 
suddenly, and without warning." 

"Okay..." 

"But we have soothed ourselves into imagining sudden change as something that happens 
outside the normal order of things. An accident, like a car crash. Or beyond our control, like a 
fatal illness. We do not conceive of sudden, radical, irrational change as built into the very fabric 


of existence. Yet it is. And chaos theory teaches us," Malcolm said, "that straight linearity, which 
we have come to take for granted in everything from physics to fiction, simply does not exist. 
Linearity is an artificial way of viewing the world. Real life isn't a series of interconnected events 
occurring one after another like beads strung on a necklace. Life is actually a series of 
encounters in which one event may change those that follow in a wholly unpredictable, even 
devastating way." Malcolm sat back in his seat, looking toward the other Land Cruiser, a few 
yards ahead. "That's a deep truth about the structure of our universe. But, for some reason, we 
insist on behaving as if it were not true." 

At that moment, the cars jolted to a stop, "What's happened?" Grant said. 

Up ahead, they saw the kids in the car, pointing toward the ocean. Offshore, beneath lowering 
clouds, Grant saw the dark outline of the supply boat making its way back toward Puntarenas. 

"Why have we stopped?" Malcolm said. 

Grant turned on the radio and heard the girl saying excitedly, "Look there, Timmy! You see it, 
it's there!" 

Malcolm squinted at the boat. "They talking about the boat?" 

“Apparently.” 

Ed Regis climbed out of the front car and came running back to their window. "I'm sorry," he 
said, "but the kids are all worked up. Do you have binoculars here?" 

"For what?" 

"The little girl says she sees something on the boat. Some kind of animal," Regis said. 


Grant grabbed the binoculars and rested his elbows on the window ledge of the Land Cruiser. He 
scanned the long shape of the supply ship. It was so dark it was almost a silhouette; as he 
watched, the ship's running lights came on, brilliant in the dark purple twilight. 

"Do you see anything?" Regis said. "No," 

Grant said. 

"They're low down," Lex said, over the radio. "Look low down." 

Grant tilted the binoculars down, scanning the bull just above the waterline. The supply ship 
was broad-beamed, with a splash flange that ran the length of the ship. But it was quite dark now, 
and he could hardly make out details. 

"No, nothing. . ." 

"| can see them," Lex said impatiently. "Near the back. Look near the back! " 

"How can she see anything in this light?" Malcolm said. 

"Kids can see," Grant said. "They've got visual acuity we forgot we ever had." 

He swung the binoculars toward the stern, moving them slowly, and suddenly he saw the 
animals. They were playing, darting among the silhouetted stern structures. He could see them 
only briefly, but even in the fading light he could tell that they were upright animals, about two feet 
tall, standing with stiff balancing tails. 

"You see them now?" Lex said. "| see 

them," he said. 

"What are they?" 

"They're raptors," Grant said, "At least two. Maybe more. Juveniles.” 

"Jesus, " Ed Regis said. "That boat's going to the mainland." 

Malcolm shrugged. "Don't get excited. Just call the control room and tell them to recall the 
boat." 

Ed Regis reached in and grabbed the radio from the dashboard. They heard hissing static, and 
clicks as he rapidly changed channels. "There's something wrong with this one," he said. "It's not 
working." 

He ran off to the first Land Cruiser. They saw him duck into it. Then he looked back at them. 
"There's something wrong with both the radios," he said. "I can't raise the control room." 

"Then let's get going," Grant said. 


In the control room, Muldoon stood before the big windows that overlooked the park. At seven 
o'clock, the quartz floodlights came on all over the island, turning the landscape into a glowing 

jewel stretching away to the south. This was his favorite moment of the day. He heard the crackle of 
static from the radios. 


"The Land Cruisers have started again," Arnold said. "They're on their way home." 

"But why did they stop?" Hammond said. "And why can't we talk to them?" 

"| don't know," Arnold said. "Maybe they turned off the radios in the cars. 

"Probably the storm," Muldoon said. "Interference from the storm." 

"They'll be here in twenty minutes," Hammond said. "You better call down and make sure the 
dining room is ready for them. Those kids are going to be hungry." 

Arnold picked up the phone and heard a steady monotonous hiss. "What's this? What's going 
on?" 

"Jesus, hang that up," Nedry said. "You'll screw up the data stream." 

"You've taken all the phone lines? Even the internal ones?" 

"I've taken all the lines that communicate outside," Nedry said. "But your internal lines should 
still work." 

Arnold punched console buttons one after another. He heard nothing but hissing on all the 
lines. 

"Looks like you've got 'em all." 

"Sorry about that," Nedry said. "I'll clear a couple for you at the end of the next transmission, in 
about fifteen minutes." He yawned. "Looks like a long weekend for me. | guess I'll go get that 
Coke now." He picked up his shoulder bag and headed for the door. "Don't touch my console, 
okay?" 

The door closed. 

"What a slob," Hammond said. 

"Yeah," Arnold said. "But | guess he knows what he's doing." 


Along the side of the road, clouds of volcanic steam misted rainbows in the bright quartz lights. 
Grant said into the radio, "How long does it take the ship to reach the mainland?" 

"Eighteen hours," Ed Regis said. "More or less. It's pretty reliable." He glanced at his watch. "It 
should arrive around eleven tomorrow morning." 

Grant frowned. "You still can't talk to the control room?" 

"Not so far." 

"How about Harding? Can you reach him?" 

"No, I've tried. He may have his radio turned off." 

Malcolm was shaking his head. "So we're the only ones who know about the animals on the 
ship." 

"I'm trying to raise somebody," Ed Regis said. "| mean, Christ, we don't want those animals on 
the mainland." 

"How long until we get back to the base?" 

"From here, another sixteen, seventeen minutes," Ed Regis said. 

At night, the whole road was illuminated by big floodlights. It felt to Grant as if they were driving 
through a bright green tunnel of leaves. Large raindrops spattered the windshield. 

Grant felt the Land Cruiser slow, then stop. "Now what?" 

Lex said, "I don't want to stop. Why did we stop?" 

And then, suddenly, all the floodlights went out. The road was plunged into darkness, Lex said, 
"Hey!" 

"Probably just a power outage or something," Ed Regis said. "I'm sure the lights'll be on ina 
minute.” 


"What the hell?" Arnold said, staring at his monitors. 

"What happened?" Muldoon said. "You lose power?" 

"Yeah, but only power on the perimeter. Everything in this building's working fine. But outside, 
in the park, the power is gone. Lights, TV cameras, everything." His remote video monitors had 
gone black. 

"What about the two Land Cruisers?" 

"Stopped somewhere around the tyrannosaur paddock." 

"Well," Muldoon said, "call Maintenance and let's get the power back on. 


Arnold picked up one of his phones and heard hissing: Nedry's computers talking to each 
other. "No phones. That damn Nedry. Nedry! Where the hell is he?" 


Dennis Nedry pushed open the door marked FERTILIZATION, With the perimeter power out, all 
the security-card locks were disarmed. Every door in the building opened with a touch. 

The problems with the security system were high on Jurassic Park's bug list. Nedry wondered 
if anybody ever imagined that it wasn't a bug-tbat Nedry had programmed it that way. He had 
built in a classic trap door. Few programmers of large computer systems could resist the 
temptation to leave themselves a secret entrance. Partly it was common sense: if inept users 
locked up the system-and then called you for help-you always had a way to get in and repair the 
mess. And partly it was a kind of signature: Kilroy was here. 

And partly it was insurance for the future. Nedry was annoyed with the Jurassic Park project; 
late in the schedule, InGen had demanded extensive modifications to the system but hadn't been 
willing to pay for them, arguing they should be included under the original contract. Lawsuits were 
threatened; letters were written to Nedry's other clients, implying that Nedry was unreliable. It was 
blackmail, and in the end Nedry had been forced to eat his overages on Jurassic Park and to 
make the changes that Hammond wanted. 

But later, when he was approached by Lewis Dodgson at Biosyn, Nedry was ready to listen. 
And able to say that he could indeed get past Jurassic Park security. He could get into any room, 
any system, anywhere in the park. Because he had programmed it that way. Just in case. 

He entered the fertilization room. The lab was deserted; as he had anticipated, all the staff was 
at dinner. Nedry unzipped his shoulder bag and removed the can of Gillette shaving cream. He 
unscrewed the base, and saw the interior was divided into a series of cylindrical slots. 

He pulled on a pair of heavy insulated gloves and opened the walk-in freezer marked 
CONTENTS VIABLE BIOLOGICAL MAINTAIN -10C MINIMUM. The freezer was the size of a 
small closet, with shelves from floor to ceiling. Most of the shelves contained reagents and liquids 
in plastic sacs. To one side he saw a smaller nitrogen cold box with a heavy ceramic door. He 
opened it, and a rack of small tubes slid out, in a cloud of white liquid-nitrogen smoke. 

The embryos were arranged by species: Stegosaurus, Apatosaurus, Hadrosaurus, 
Tyrannosaurus. Each embryo in a thin glass container, wrapped in silver foil, stoppered with 
polylene. Nedry quickly took two of each, slipping them into the shaving cream can. 

Then he screwed the base of the can shut and twisted the top. There was a hiss of releasing 
gas inside, and the can frosted in his hands. Dodgson had said there was enough coolant to last 
thirty-six hours. More than enough time to get back to San Jos,. 

Nedry left the freezer, returned to the main lab. He dropped the can back in his bag, zipped it 
shut. 

He went back into the hallway. The theft had taken less than two minutes. He could imagine 
the consternation upstairs in the control room, as they began to realize what had happened. All 
their security codes were scrambled, and all their phone lines were jammed. Without his help, it 
would take hours to untangle the mess-but in just a few minutes Nedry would he back in the 
control room, setting things right. 

And no one would ever suspect what he had done. 

Grinning, Dennis Nedry walked down to the ground floor, nodded to the guard, and continued 
downstairs to the basement. Passing the neat lines of electric Land Cruisers, he went to the 
gasoline-powered Jeep parked against the wall. He climbed into it, noticing some odd gray tubing 
on the passenger seat. It looked almost like a rocket launcher, he thought, as he turned the 
ignition key and started the Jeep. 

Nedry glanced at his watch. From here, into the park, and three minutes straight to the east 
dock. Three minutes from there back to the control room. 

Piece of cake. 


"Damn it!" Arnold said, punching buttons on the console. "It's all screwed up. 

Muldoon was standing at the windows, looking out at the park. The lights had gone out all over 
the island, except in the immediate area around the main buildings. He saw a few staff personnel 
hurrying to get out of the rain, but no one seemed to realize anything was wrong. Muldoon looked 
over at the visitor lodge, where the lights burned brightly. 


"Uh-oh," Arnold said. "We have real trouble." 

"What's that?" Muldoon said. He turned away from the window, and so he didn't see the Jeep 
drive out of the underground garage and head east along the maintenance road into the park. 

"That idiot Nedry turned off the security systems," Arnold said. "The whole building's opened 
up. None of the doors are locked any more." 

"I'll notify the guards," Muldoon said. 

"That's the least of it," Arnold said. "When you turn off the security, you turn off all the 
peripheral fences as well." 

"The fences?" Muldoon said. 

"The electrical fences," Arnold said. "They're off, all over the island." 

"You mean..." 

"That's right," Arnold said. "The animals can get out now." Arnold lit a cigarette. "Probably 
nothing will happen, but you never know. . . ." 

Muldoon started toward the door. "| better drive out and bring in the people in those two Land 
Cruisers," he said. "Just in case." 

Muldoon quickly went downstairs to the garage. He wasn't really worried about the fences 
going down. Most of the dinosaurs had been in their paddocks for nine months or more, and they 
had brushed up against the fences more than once, with notable results. Muldoon knew how 
quickly animals learned to avoid shock stimuli. You could train a laboratory pigeon with just two or 
three stimulation events. So it was unlikely the dinosaurs would now approach the fences. 

Muldoon was more concerned about what the people in the cars would do. He didn't want 
them getting out of the Land Cruisers, because once the power came back on, the cars would 
start moving again, whether the people were inside them or not. They might be left behind. Of 
course, in the rain it was unlikely they would leave the cars. But, still ... you never knew. .. . 

He reached the garage and hurried toward the Jeep. It was lucky, he thought, that he had had 
the foresight to put the launcher in it. He could start right out, and he out there in- 

It was gone! 

"What the hell?" Muldoon stared at the empty parking space, astonished. 

The Jeep was gone! 

What the hell was happening? 


FOURTH ITERATION 


"Inevitably, underlying instabilities begin to appear.” 


IAN MALCOLM 
The Main Road 


Rain drummed loudly on the roof of the Land Cruiser. Tim felt the night-vision goggles pressing 
heavily on his forehead. He reached for the knob near his ear and adjusted the intensity. There 
was a brief phosphorescent flare, and then, in shades of electronic green and black, he could see 
the Land Cruiser behind, with Dr. Grant and Dr. Malcolm inside. Neat! 

Dr. Grant was staring out the front windshield toward him. Tim saw him pick up the radio from 
the dash. There was a burst of static, and then he heard Dr. Grant's voice: "Can you see us back 
here?" 

Tim picked up the radio from Ed Regis. "| see you." 

“Everything all right?" 

"We're fine, Dr. Grant." 

"Stay in the car." 

"We will. Don't Worry." He clicked the radio off. 

Ed Regis snorted. "It's pouring down rain. Of course we'll stay in the car," he muttered. 

Tim turned to look at the foliage at the side of the road. Through the goggles, the foliage was a 
bright electronic green, and beyond he could see sections of the green grid pattern of the fence. 
The Land Cruisers were stopped on the downslope of a hill, which must mean they were 
someplace near the tyrannosaur area. It would be amazing to see a tyrannosaur with these night- 
vision goggles. A real thrill. Maybe the tyrannosaur would come to the fence and look over at 
them. Tim wondered if its eyes would glow in the dark when he saw them. That would be neat. 

But he didn't see anything, and eventually he stopped looking. Everyone in the cars fell silent. 
The rain thrummed on the roof of the car. Sheets of water streamed down over the sides of the 
windows. It was hard for Tim to see out, even with the goggles. 

"How long have we been sitting here?" Malcolm asked. 

"| don't know. Four or five minutes." 

"| wonder what the problem is." 

"Maybe a short circuit from the rain." 

"But it happened before the rain really started." 

There was another silence. In a tense voice, Lex said, "But there's no lightning, right?" She 
had always been afraid of lightning, and she now sat nervously squeezing her leather mitt in her 
hands. 

Dr. Grant said, "What was that? We didn't quite read that." 

"Just my sister talking.” 

"Oh." 

Tim again scanned the foliage, but saw nothing. Certainly nothing as big as a tyrannosaur. He 
began to wonder if the tyrannosaurs came out at night. Were they nocturnal animals? Tim wasn't 
sure if he had ever read that. He had the feeling that tyrannosaurs were all-weather, day or night 
animals. The time of day didn't matter to a tyrannosaur. 

The rain continued to pour. 

"Hell of a rain," Ed Regis said. "It's really coming down." 

Lex said, "I'm hungry." 

"| know that, Lex," Regis said, "but we're stuck here, sweetie. The cars run on electricity in 
buried cables in the road." 

"Stuck for how long?" 

"Until they fix the electricity." 

Listening to the sound of the rain, Tim felt himself growing sleepy. He yawned, and turned to 
look at the palm trees on the left side of the road, and was startled by a sudden tbump as the 
ground shook. He swung back just in time to catch a glimpse of a dark shape as it swiftly crossed 
the road between the two cars. 

“Jesus! " 

"What was it?" 

"It was huge, it was big as the car-" 

"Tim! Are you there?" 

He picked up the radio. "Yes, I'm here." 

"Did you see it, Tim?" 

"No," Tim said. "I missed it." 

"What the hell was it?" Malcolm said. 


"Are you wearing the night-vision goggles, Tim?" 

"Yes. I'll watch," Tim said. 

"Was it the tyrannosaur?" Ed Regis asked. 

"| don't think so. It was in the road." 

"But you didn't see it?" Ed Regis said. 

"No." 

Tim felt had that he had missed seeing the animal whatever it was. 

There was a sudden white crack of lightning, and his night goggles flared bright green. He 
blinked his eyes and started counting. "One one thousand . . . two one thousand . . ." 

The thunder crashed, deafeningly loud and very close. Lex began to cry. "Oh, no .. ." 

"Take it easy, honey," Ed Regis said. "It's just lightning." 

Tim scanned the side of the road. The rain was coming down bard now, shaking the leaves 
with hammering drops. It made everything move. Everything seemed alive. He scanned the 
leaves. ... 

He stopped. There was something beyond the leaves. Tim 

looked up, higher. 

Behind the foliage, beyond the fence, he saw a thick body with a pebbled, grainy surface like 
the bark of a tree. But it wasn't a tree. He continued to look higher, sweeping the goggles 
upward- 

He saw the huge head of the tyrannosaurus. Just standing there, looking over the fence at the 
two Land Cruisers. The lightning flashed again, and the big animal rolled its head and bellowed in 
the glaring light. Then darkness, and silence again, and the pounding rain. 

"Tim?" 

"Yes, Dr. Grant." 

"You see what it is?" 

"Yes, Dr. Grant." 

Tim had the sense that Dr. Grant was trying to talk in a way that wouldn't upset his sister. 

"What's going on right now?" 

"Nothing," Tim said, watching the tyrannosaur through his night goggles. "Just standing on the 
other side of the fence." 

"| can't see much from here, Tim." 

"| can see fine, Dr. Grant. It's just standing there." 

"Okay." 

Lex continued to cry, snuffling. 

There was another pause. Tim watched the tyrannosaur. The head was huge! The animal 
looked from one vehicle to another. Then back again. It seemed to stare right at Tim. 

In the goggles, the eyes glowed bright green. 

Tim felt a chill, but then, as he looked down the animal's body, moving down from the massive 
head and jaws, he saw the smaller, muscular forelimb. It waved in the air and then it gripped the 
fence. 

"Jesus Christ," Ed Regis said, staring out the window. 


The greatest preditor the world has ever known. The most fearsome attack in human history. 
Somewhere in the back of his publicist's brain, Ed Regis was still writing copy. But he could feel 
his knees begin to shake uncontrollably, his trousers flapping like flags, Jesus, he was frightened. 
He didn't want to be here. Alone among all the people in the two cars, Ed Regis knew what a 
dinosaur attack was like. He knew what happened to people. He had seen the mangled bodies 
that resulted from a raptor attack. He could picture it in his mind. And this was a rex! Much, much 
bigger! The greatest meat-eater that ever walked the earth! 

Jesus. 

When the tyrannosaur roared it was terrifying, a scream from some other world. Ed Regis felt 
the spreading warmth in his trousers. He'd peed in his pants. He was simultaneously 
embarrassed and terrified. But he knew he had to do something. He couldn't just stay here. He 
had to do something. Something. His hands were shaking, trembling against the dash. 

"Jesus Christ," he said again. 


"Bad language," Lex said, wagging her finger at him. 

Tim heard the sound of a door opening, and he swung his head away from the tyrannosaur-the 
night-vision goggles streaked laterally-in time to see Ed Regis stepping out through the open 
door, ducking his head in the rain. 

"Hey," Lex said, "where are you going?" 

Ed Regis just turned and ran in the opposite direction from the tyrannosaur, disappearing into 
the woods. The door to the Land Cruiser hung open; the paneling was getting wet. 

"He left!" Lex said. "Where did he go? He left us alone!" 

"Shut the door," Tim said, but she had started to scream, "He left us! He left us!" 

"Tim, what's going on?" It was Dr. Grant, on the radio. "Tim?" 

Tim leaned forward and tried to shut the door. From the back seat, he couldn't reach the 
handle. He looked back at the tyrannosaur as lightning flashed again, momentarily silhouetting 
the huge black shape against the white-flaring sky. 

“Tim, what's happening?" 

"He left us, he left us!" 

Tim blinked to recover his vision. When he looked again, the tyrannosaur was standing there, 
exactly as before, motionless and huge. Rain dripped from its jaws. The forelimb gripped the 
fence. ... 

And then Tim realized: the tyrannosaur was holding on to the fence! The fence wasn't 
electrified any more! 

"Lex, close the door!" 

The radio crackled. "Tim!" 

"I'm here, Dr. Grant." 

"What's going on?" 

"Regis ran away," Tim said. 

"He what?" 

"He ran away. | think he saw that the fence isn't electrified," Tim said. 

"The fence isn't electrified?" Malcolm said, over the radio. "Did he say the fence isn't 
electrified?" 

"Lex," Tim said, "close the door. " But Lex was screaming, “He left us, he left us!" in a steady, 
monotonous wail, and there was nothing for Tim to do but climb out of the back door, into the 
slashing rain, and shut the door for her. Thunder rumbled, and the lightning flashed again. Tim 
looked up and saw the tyrannosaur crashing down the cyclone fence with a giant hind limb. 

"Timmy!" 

He jumped back in and slammed the door, the sound lost in the tobunderclap. 

The radio: "Tim! Are you there?" 

He grabbed the radio. "I'm here." He turned to Lex. "Lock the doors. Get in the middle of the 
car. And shut up." 

Outside, the tyrannosaur rolled its head and took an awkward step forward. The claws of its 
feet had caught in the grid of the flattened fence. Lex saw the animal finally, and became silent, 
still. She watched with wide eyes. 

Radio crackle. "Tim." 

"Yes, Dr. Grant." 

"Stay in the car. Stay down. Be quiet. Don't move, and don't make noise." 

"Okay." 

"You should be all right. | don't think it can open the car." 

"Okay." 

"Just stay quiet, so you don't arouse its attention any more than necessary. 

"Okay." Tim clicked the radio off. "You hear that, Lex?" His sister nodded, silently. She never 
took her eyes off the dinosaur. The tyrannosaur roared. In the glare of lightning, they saw it pull 
free of the fence and take a bounding step forward. 

Now it was standing between the two cars. Tim couldn't see Dr. Grant's car any more, because 
the huge body blocked his view. The rain ran in rivulets down the pebbled skin of the muscular 
hind legs. He couldn't see the animal's head, which was high above the roofline. 


The tyrannosaur moved around the side of their car. It went to the very spot where Tim had 
gotten out of the car. Where Ed Regis had gotten out of the car. The animal paused there. The 
big head ducked down, toward the mud. 

Tim looked back at Dr. Grant and Dr. Malcolm in the rear car. Their faces were tense as they 
stared forward through the windshield. 

The huge head raised back up, jaws open, and then stopped by the side windows. In the glare 
of lightning, they saw the beady, expressionless reptile eye moving in the socket. 

It was looking in the car. 

His sister's breath came in ragged, frightened gasps. He reached out and squeezed her arm, 
hoping she would stay quiet. The dinosaur continued to stare for a long time through the side 
window. Perhaps the dinosaur couldn't really see them, he thought. Finally the head lifted up, out of 
view again. 

"Timmy . . ." Lex whispered. 

"It's okay," Tim whispered. "I don't think it saw us." 

He was looking back toward Dr. Grant when a jolting impact rocked the Land Cruiser and 
shattered the windshield in a spiderweb as the tyrannosaur's head crashed against the hood of 
the Land Cruiser. Tim was knocked flat on the seat. The night-vision goggles slid off his 
forehead. 

He got back up quickly, blinking in the darkness, his mouth warm with blood. 

"Lex?" 

He couldn't see his sister anywhere. 

The tyrannosaur stood near the front of the Land Cruiser, its chest moving as it breathed, the 
forelimbs making clawing movements in the air. 

"Lex!" Tim whispered. Then he heard her groan. She was lying somewhere on the floor under 
the front seat. 

Then the huge head came down, entirely blocking the shattered windshield. The tyrannosaur 
banged again on the front hood of the Land Cruiser. Tim grabbed the seat as the car rocked on 
its wheels. The tyrannosaur banged down twice more, denting the metal. 

Then it moved around the side of the car. The big raised tail blocked his view out of all the side 
windows. At the back, the animal snorted, a deep rumbling growl that blended with the thunder. It 
sank its jaws into the spare tire mounted on the back of the Land Cruiser and, in a single head 
shake, tore it away. The rear of the car lifted into the air for a moment; then it thumped down with a 
muddy splash. 

"Tim!" Dr. Grant said. "Tim, are you there?" 

Tim grabbed the radio. "We're okay," he said. There was a shrill metallic scrape as claws 
raked the roof of the car. Tim's heart was pounding in his chest. He couldn't see anything out of 
the windows on the right side except pebbled leathery flesh. The tyrannosaur was leaning against 
the car, which rocked back and forth with each breath, the springs and metal creaking loudly. 

Lex groaned again. Tim put down the radio, and started to crawl over into the front seat. The 
tyrannosaur roared and the metal roof dented downward. Tim felt a sharp pain in his head and 
tumbled to the floor, onto the transmission bump. He found himself lying alongside Lex, and he 
was shocked to see that the whole side of her head was covered in blood. She looked 
unconscious. 

There was another jolting impact, and pieces of glass fell all around him. Tim felt rain. He 
looked up and saw that the front windshield had broken out. There was just a jagged rim of glass 
and, beyond, the big head of the dinosaur. 

Looking down at him. 

Tim felt a sudden chill and then the head rushed forward toward him, the jaws open. There 
was the squeal of metal against teeth, and he felt the hot stinking breath of the animal and a thick 
tongue stuck into the car through the windshield opening. The tongue slapped wetly around 
inside the car-he felt the hot lather of dinosaur saliva-and the tyrannosaur roared-a deafening 
sound inside the car- 

The head pulled away abruptly. 

Tim scrambled up, avoiding the dent in the roof. There was still room to sit on the front seat by 
the passenger door. The tyrannosaur stood in the rain near the front fender. It seemed confused 
by what had happened to it. Blood dripped freely from its jaws. 


The tyrannosaur looked at Tim, cocking its head to stare with one big eye. The head moved 
close to the car, sideways, and peered in. Blood spattered on the dented bood of the Land 
Cruiser, mixing with the rain. 

It can't get to me, Tim thought. It's too big. 

Then the head pulled away, and in the flare of lightning he saw the hind leg lift up. And the 
world tilted crazily as the Land Cruiser slammed over its side, the windows splatting in the mud. 
He saw Lex fall helplessly against the side window, and he fell down beside her, banging his 
head. Tim felt dizzy. Then the tyrannosaur's jaws clamped onto the window frame, and the whole 
Land Cruiser was lifted up into the air, and shaken. 

"Timmy!" Lex shrieked, so near to his ear that it hurt. She was suddenly awake, and he 
grabbed her as the tyrannosaur crashed the car down again. Tim felt a stabbing pain in his side, 
and his sister fell on top of him. The car went up again, tilting crazily. Lex shouted "Timmy!" and he 
saw the door give way beneath her, and she fell out of the car into the mud but Tim couldn't 
answer, because in the next instant everything swung crazily-he saw the trunks of the palm trees 
sliding downward past him-moving sideways through the air-he glimpsed the ground very far 
below-the hot roar of the tyrannosaur-the blazing eye-the tops of the palm trees- 

And then, with a metallic scraping shriek, the car fell from the tyrannosaur's jaws, a sickening 
fall, and Tim's stomach heaved in the moment before the world became totally black, and silent. 


In the other car, Malcolm gasped. "Jesus! What happened to the car?" Grant blinked his eyes as 
the lightning faded. 

The other car was gone. 

Grant couldn't believe it. He peered forward, trying to see through the rain-streaked windshield. 
The dinosaur's body was so large, it was probably just blocking- 

No. In another flash of lightning, he saw clearly: the car was gone. 

"What happened?" Malcolm said. 

"| don't know." 

Faintly, over the rain, Grant heard the sound of the little girl screaming. The dinosaur was 
standing in darkness on the road up ahead, but they could see well enough to know that it was 
bending over now, sniffing the ground. 

Or eating something on the ground. 

"Can you see?" Malcolm said, squinting. 

"Not much, no," Grant said. The rain pounded on the roof of the car. He listened for the little 
girl, but he didn't hear her any more. The two men sat in the car, listening. 

"Was it the girl?" Malcolm said, finally. "It sounded like the girl." 

"It did, yes." 

"Was it?" 

"| don't know," Grant said. He felt a seeping fatigue overtake him. Blurred through the rainy 
windshield, the dinosaur was coming toward their car. Slow, ominous strides, coming right toward 
them. 

Malcolm said, "You know, at times like this one feels, well, perhaps extinct animals should be 
left extinct. Don't you have that feeling now?" 

"Yes," Grant said. He was feeling his heart pounding. 

"Umm. Do you, ah, have any suggestions about what we do now?" "| 

can't think of a thing," Grant said. 

Malcolm twisted the handle, kicked open the door, and ran. But even as he did, Grant could 
see he was too late, the tyrannosaur too close. There was another crack of lightning, and in that 
instant of glaring white light, Grant watched in horror as the tyrannosaur roared, and leapt 
forward. 

Grant was not clear about exactly what happened next. Malcolm was running, his feet 
splashing in the mud. The tyrannosaur bounded alongside him and ducked its massive head, and 
Malcolm was tossed into the air like a small doll. 

By then Grant was out of the car, too, feeling the cold rain slashing his face and body. The 
tyrannosaur had turned its back to him, the huge tail swinging through the air. Grant was tensing to 
run for the woods when suddenly the tyrannosaur spun back to face him, and roared. 

Grant froze. 


He was standing beside the passenger door of the Land Cruiser, drenched in rain. He was 
completely exposed, the tyrannosaur no more than eight feet away. The big animal roared again. 
At so close a range the sound was terrifyingly loud. Grant felt himself shaking with cold and fright. 
He pressed his trembling hands against the metal of the door panel to steady them. 

The tyrannosaur roared once more, but it did not attack. It cocked its head, and looked with 
first one eye, then the other, at the Land Cruiser. And it did nothing. 

It just stood there. 

What was going on? 

The powerful jaws opened and closed. The tyrannosaur bellowed angrily, and then the big hind 
leg came up and crashed down on the roof of the car; the claws slid off with a metal screech, 
barely missing Grant as he stood there, still unmoving. 

The foot splashed in the mud. The head ducked down in a slow arc, and the animal inspected 
the car, snorting. It peered into the front windshield. Then, moving toward the rear, it banged the 
passenger door shut, and moved right toward Grant as he stood there. Grant was dizzy with fear 
his heart pounding inside his chest. With the animal so close, he could smell the rotten flesh in 
the mouth, the sweetish blood-smell, the sickening stench of the carnivore. . . . 

He tensed his body, awaiting the inevitable. 

The big head slid past him, toward the rear of the car. Grant blinked. 

What had happened? 

Was it possible the tyrannosaur hadn't seen him? It seemed as if it hadn't. But how could that 
be? Grant looked back to see the animal sniffing the rear-mounted tire. It nudged the tire with its 
snout, and then the head swung back. Again it approached Grant. 

This time the animal stopped, the black flaying nostrils just inches away. Grant felt the animal's 
startling hot breath on his face. But the tyrannosaur wasn't sniffing like a dog. It was just 
breathing, and if anything it seemed puzzled. 

No, the tyrannosaur couldn't see him. Not if he stood motionless. And in a detached academic 
corner of his mind he found an explanation for that, a reason why- 

The laws opened before him, the massive head raised up. Grant squeezed his fists together, 
and bit his lip, trying desperately to remain motionless, to make no sound. 

The tyrannosaur bellowed in the night air. 

But by now Grant was beginning to understand. The animal couldn't see him, but it suspected 
he was there, somewhere, and was trying with its bellowing to frighten Grant into some revealing 
movement. So long as he stood his ground, Grant realized, he was invisible. 

In a final gesture of frustration, the big hind leg lifted up and kicked the Land Cruiser over, and 
Grant felt searing pain and the surprising sensation of his own body flying through the air. It 
seemed to be happening very slowly, and he had plenty of time to feel the world turn colder, and 
watch the ground rush up to strike him in the face. 


Return 


"Oh damn," Harding said. "Will you look at that." 

They were sitting in Harding's gasoline-powered Jeep, staring forward past the flick flick of the 
windshield wipers. In the yellow flare of the headlamps, a big fallen tree blocked the road. 

"Must have been the lightning," Gennaro said. "Hell of a tree." 

"We can't get past it," Harding said. "| better tell Arnold in control." He picked up the radio and 
twisted the channel dial. "Hello, John. Are you there, John?" 

There was nothing but steady hissing static. "| don't understand,” he said. "The radio lines 
seem to be down." 

"It must be the storm," Gennaro said. "| 

suppose," Harding said. 

"Try the Land Cruisers," Ellie said. 

Harding opened the other channels, but there was no answer. 

"Nothing," he said. "They're probably back to camp by now, and outside the range of our little 
set. In any case, | don't think we should stay here. It'll be hours before Maintenance gets a crew 
out here to move that tree." 

He turned the radio off, and put the Jeep into reverse. 


"What're you going to do?" Ellie said. 

"Go back to the turnout, and get onto the maintenance road. Fortunately there's a second road 
system," Harding explained. "We have one road for visitors, and a second road for animal 
handlers and feed trucks and so on. We'll drive back on that maintenance road. It's a little longer. 
And not so scenic. But you may find it interesting. If the rain lets up, we'll get a glimpse of some of 
the animals at night. We should be back in thirty, forty minutes," Harding said. "If | don't get lost." 

He turned the Jeep around in the night, and headed south again. 


Lightning flashed, and every monitor in the control room went black. 

Arnold sat forward, his body rigid and tense. Jesus, not now. Not now. That was all he needed- 
to have everything go out now in the storm. All the main power circuits were surge-protected, of 
course, but Arnold wasn't sure about the modems Nedry was using for his data transmission. 
Most people didn't know it was possible to blow an entire system through a modem-the lightning 
pulse climbed back into the computer through the telephone line, and-bang!-no more 
motherboard. No more RAM. No more file server. No more computer. 

The screens flickered. And then, one by one, they came back on. 

Arnold sighed, and collapsed back in his chair. 

He wondered again where Nedry had gone. Five minutes ago, he'd sent guards to search the 
building for him. The fat bastard was probably in the bathroom reading a comic book. But the 
guards hadn't come back, and they hadn't called in. 

Five minutes. If Nedry was in the building, they should have found him by now. 

"Somebody took the damned Jeep," Muldoon said as he came back in the room. "Have you 
talked to the Land Cruisers yet?" 

"Can't raise them on the radio," Arnold said. "| have to use this, because the main board is 
down. It's weak, but it ought to work. I've tried on all six channels. | know they have radios in the 
cars, but they're not answering.” 

"That's not good," Muldoon said. 

"If you want to go out there, take one of the maintenance vehicles." 

"| would,” Muldoon said, "but they're all in the east garage, more than a mile from here. 
Where's Harding?" 

"| assume he's on his way back." 

"Then he'll pick up the people in the Land Cruisers on his way." 

"| assume So." 

"Anybody tell Hammond the kids aren't back yet?" 

"Hell no," Arnold said. "| don't want that son of a bitch running around here, screaming at me. 
Everytbing's all right, for the moment. The Land Cruisers are just stuck in the rain. They can sit a 
while, until Harding brings them back. Or until we find Nedry, and make that little bastard turn the 
systems back on." 

"You can't get them back on?" Muldoon said. 

Arnold shook his head. "I've been trying. But Nedry's done something to the system. | can't 
figure out what, but if | have to go into the code itself, that'll take hours. We need Nedry. We've 
got to find the son of a bitch right away.” 


Nedry 


The sign said ELECTRIFIED FENCE 10,000 VOLTS DO NOT TOUCH, but Nedry opened it with 
his bare band, and unlocked the gate, swinging it wide. He went back to the Jeep, drove through 
the gate, and then walked back to close it behind him. 

Now he was inside the park itself, no more than a mile from the east dock. He stepped on the 
accelerator and bunched forward over the steering wheel, peering through the rain-slashed 
windshield as he drove the Jeep down the narrow road. He was driving fast-too fast-but he had to 
keep to his timetable. He was surrounded on all sides by black jungle, but soon he should be 
able to see the beach and the ocean off to his left. 

This damned storm, he thought. It might screw up everything. Because if Dodgson's boat 
wasn't waiting for him at the east dock when Nedry got there, the whole plan would be ruined. 
Nedry couldn't wait very long, or he would be missed back at the control room. The whole idea 


behind the plan was that he could drive to the east dock, drop off the embryos, and be back in a 
few minutes, before anyone noticed. It was a good plan, a clever plan. Nedry'd worked on it 
carefully, refining every detail. This plan was going to make him a million and a half dollars, one 
point five meg. That was ten years of income in a single tax-free shot, and it was going to change 
his life. Nedry'd been damned careful, even to the point of making Dodgson meet him in the San 
Francisco airport at the last minute with an excuse about wanting to see the money, Actually, 
Nedry wanted to record his conversation with Dodgson, and mention him by name on the tape. 
Just so that Dodgson wouldn't forget he owed the rest of the money, Nedry was including a copy of 
the tape with the embryos. In short, Nedry had thought of everything. 

Except this damned storm. 

Something dashed across the road, a white flash in his headlights. It looked like a large rat. It 
scurried into the underbrush, dragging a fat tail. Possum. Amazing that a possum could survive 
here. You'd think the dinosaurs would get an animal like that. 

Where was the damned dock? 

He was driving fast, and he'd already been gone five minutes. He should have reached the 
east dock by now. Had he taken a wrong turn? He didn't think so. He hadn't seen any forks in the 
road at all. 

Then where was the dock? 

It was a shock when he came around a corner and saw that the road terminated in a gray 
concrete barrier, six feet tall and streaked dark with rain. He slammed on the brakes, and the 
Jeep fishtailed, losing traction in an end-to-end spin, and for a horrified moment he thought he 
was going to smash into the barrier-he knew he was going to smash-and he spun the wheel 
frantically, and the Jeep slid to a stop, the headlamps just a foot from the concrete wall. 

He paused there, listening to the rhythmic flick of the wipers. He took a deep breath and 
exhaled slowly. He looked back down the road. He'd obviously taken a wrong turn somewhere. 
He could retrace his steps, but that would take too long. 

He'd better try and find out where the hell he was. 

He got out of the Jeep, feeling heavy raindrops spatter his head. It was a real tropical storm, 
raining so hard that it hurt. He glanced at his watch, pushing the button to illuminate the digital 
dial. Six minutes gone. Where the hell was he? He walked around the concrete barrier and on the 
other side, along with the rain, he heard the sound of gurgling water. Could it be the ocean? 
Nedry hurried forward, his eyes adjusting to the darkness as he went. Dense jungle on all sides. 
Raindrops slapping on the leaves. 

The gurgling sound became louder, drawing him forward, and suddenly he came out of the 
foliage and felt his feet sink into soft earth and saw the dark currents of the river. The river! He 
was at the jungle river! 

Damn, he thought. At the river where? The river ran for miles through the island. He looked at 
his watch again. Seven minutes gone. "You have a problem, Dennis,” he said aloud. 

As if in reply, there was a soft hooting cry of an owl in the forest. 

Nedry hardly noticed; he was worrying about his plan. The plain fact was that time had run out. 
There wasn't a choice any more. He had to abandon his original plan. All he could do was go 
back to the control room, restore the computer, and somehow try to contact Dodgson, to set up 
the drop at the east dock for the following night. Nedry would have to scramble to make that 
work, but he thought he could pull it off. The computer automatically logged all calls; after Nedry 
got through to Dodgson, he'd have to go back into the computer and erase the record of the call. 
But one thing was sure-he couldn't stay out in the park any longer, or his absence would be 
noticed. 

Nedry started back, heading toward the glow of the car's headlights. He was drenched and 
miserable. He heard the soft booting cry once more, and this time he paused. That hadn't really 
sounded like an owl. And it seemed to be close by, in the jungle somewhere off to his right. 

As he listened, he heard a crashing sound in the underbrush. Then silence. He waited, and 
heard it again. It sounded distinctly like something big, moving slowly through the jungle toward 
him. 

Something big. Something near. A big dinosaur. Get 

out of here. 


Nedry began to run. He made a lot of noise as he ran, but even so he could hear the animal 
crashing through the foliage. And hooting. 

It was coming closer. 

Stumbling over tree roots in the darkness, clawing his way past dripping branches, he saw the 
Jeep ahead, and the lights shining around the vertical wall of the barrier made him feel better. In 
a moment he'd be in the car and then he'd get the hell out of here. He scrambled around the 
barrier and then he froze. 

The animal was already there. 

But it wasn't close. The dinosaur stood forty feet away, at the edge of the illumination from the 
headlamps. Nedry hadn't taken the tour, so he hadn't seen the different types of dinosaurs, but 
this one was strange-looking. The ten-foot-tall body was yellow with black spots, and along the 
head ran a pair of red V-shaped crests. The dinosaur didn't move, but again gave its soft hooting 
cry. 
Nedry waited to see if it would attack. It didn't. Perhaps the headlights from the Jeep frightened it, 
forcing it to keep its distance, like a fire. 

The dinosaur stared at him and then snapped its head in a single swift motion. Nedry felt 
something smack wetly against his chest. He looked down and saw a dripping glob of foam on 
his rain-soaked shirt. He touched it curiously, not comprehending. . . . 

It was spit. 

The dinosaur had spit on him. 

It was creepy, he thought. He looked back at the dinosaur and saw the head snap again, and 
immediately felt another wet smack against his neck, just above the shirt collar. He wiped it away 
with his hand. 

Jesus, it was disgusting. But the skin of his neck was already starting to tingle and burn. And 
his hand was tingling, too. It was almost like he had been touched with acid. 

Nedry opened the car door, glancing back at the dinosaur to make sure it wasn't going to 
attack, and felt a sudden, excruciating pain in his eyes, stabbing like spikes into the back of his 
skull, and he squeezed his eyes shut and gasped with the intensity of it and threw up his hands 
to cover his eyes and felt the slippery foam trickling down both sides of his nose. 

Spit. 

The dinosaur had spit in his eyes. 

Even as he realized it, the pain overwhelmed him, and he dropped to his knees, disoriented, 
wheezing. He collapsed onto his side, his cheek pressed to the wet ground, his breath coming in 
thin whistles through the constant, ever-screaming pain that caused flashing spots of light to 
appear behind his tightly shut eyelids. 

The earth shook beneath him and Nedry knew the dinosaur was moving, he could hear its soft 
hooting cry, and despite the pain he forced his eyes open and still he saw nothing but flashing 
spots against black. Slowly the realization came to him. 

He was blind. 

The hooting was louder as Nedry scrambled to his feet and staggered back against the side 
panel of the car, as a wave of nausea and dizziness swept over him. The dinosaur was close 
now, he could feel it coming close, he was dimly aware of its snorting breath. 

But he couldn't see. 

He couldn't see anything, and his terror was extreme. 

He stretched out his hands, waving them wildly in the air to ward off the attack he knew was 
coming. 

And then there was a new, searing pain, like a fiery knife in his belly, and Nedry stumbled, 
reaching blindly down to touch the ragged edge of his shirt, and then a thick, slippery mass that 
was surprisingly warm, and with horror he suddenly knew he was holding his own intestines in his 
hands. The dinosaur had torn him open. His guts had fallen out. 

Nedry fell to the ground and landed on something scaly and cold, it was the animal's foot, and 
then there was new pain on both sides of his head. The pain grew worse, and as he was lifted to 
his feet he knew the dinosaur had his head in its jaws, and the horror of that realization was 
followed by a final wish, that it would all be ended soon. 


Bungalow 


"More coffee?" Hammond asked politely. 

"No, thank you," Henry Wu said, leaning back in his chair. "| couldn't eat anything more." They 
were sitting in the dining room of Hammond's bungalow, in a secluded corner of the park not far 
from the labs. Wu had to admit that the bungalow Hammond had built for himself was elegant, 
with sparse, almost Japanese lines. And the dinner had been excellent, considering the dining 
room wasn't fully staffed yet. 

But there was something about Hammond that Wu found troubling. The old man was different in 
some way . . . subtly different. All during dinner, Wu had tried to decide what it was. In part, a 
tendency to ramble, to repeat himself, to retell old stories. In part, it was an emotional lability, 
flaring anger one moment, maudlin sentimentality the next. But all that could be understood as a 
natural concomitant of age. John Hammond was, after all, almost seventy-seven. 

But there was something else. A stubborn evasiveness. An insistence on having his way. And, in 
the end, a complete refusal to deal with the situation that now faced the park. 

Wu had been stunned by the evidence (he did not yet allow himself to believe the case was 
proved) that the dinosaurs were breeding. After Grant had asked about amphibian DNA, Wu had 
intended to go directly to his laboratory and check the computer records of the various DNA 
assemblies. Because, if the dinosaurs were in fact breeding, then everything about Jurassic Park 
was called into question-their genetic development methods, their genetic control methods, 
everything. Even the lysine dependency might be suspect. And if these animals could truly breed, 
and could also survive in the wild. . . 

Henry Wu wanted to check the data at once. But Hammond had stubbornly insisted Wu 
accompany him at dinner. 

"Now then, Henry, you must save room for ice cream," Hammond said, pushing back from the 
table. "Maria makes the most wonderful ginger ice cream." 

"All right." Wu looked at the beautiful, silent serving girl. His eyes followed her out of the room, 
and then he glanced up at the single video monitor mounted in the wall. The monitor was dark. 
"Your monitor's out," Wu said. 

"Is it?" Hammond glanced over. "Must be the storm." He reached behind him for the telephone. 
"I'll just check with John in control." 

Wu could hear the static crackle on the telephone line. Hammond shrugged, and set the 
receiver back in its cradle. "Lines must be down," he said. "Or maybe Nedry's still doing data 
transmission. He has quite a few bugs to fix this weekend. Nedry's a genius in his way, but we 
had to press him quite hard, toward the end, to make sure he got things right." 

"Perhaps | should go to the control room and check," Wu said. 

"No, no," Hammond said, "There's no reason. If there were any problem, we'd hear about it. 
Ah." 

Maria came back into the room, with two plates of ice cream. 

"You must have just a little, Henry," Hammond said. "It's made with fresh ginger, from the 
eastern part of the island. It's an old man's vice, ice cream. But still. . ." 

Dutifully, Wu dipped his spoon. Outside, lightning flashed, and there was the sharp crack of 
thunder. "That was close," Wu said. "| hope the storm isn't frightening the children." 

"| shouldn't think so," Hammond said. He tasted the ice cream. "But | can't help but hold some 
fears about this park, Henry." 

Inwardly, Wu felt relieved. Perhaps the old man was going to face the facts, after all. "What 
kind of fears?" 

"You know, Jurassic Park's really made for children. The children of the world love dinosaurs, 
and the children are going to delight-just delight-in this place. Their little faces will shine with the 
joy of finally seeing these wonderful animals. But | am afraid . . . | may not live to see it, Henry. | 
may not live to see the joy on their faces." 

"| think there are other problems, too,” Wu said, frowning. 

"But none so pressing on my mind as this," Hammond said, "that | may not live to see their 
shining, delighted faces. This is our triumph, this park. We have done what we set out to do. And, 
you remember, our original intent was to use the newly emerging technology of genetic 
engineering to make money. A lot of money." 


Wu knew Hammond was about to launch into one of his old speeches. He held up his hand. 
"I'm familiar with this, John-" 

"If you were going to start a bioengineering company, Henry, what would you do? Would you 
make products to help mankind, to fight illness and disease? Dear me, no. That's a terrible idea. 
A very poor use of new technology." 

Hammond shook his head sadly. "Yet, you'll remember," he said, "the original genetic 
engineering companies, like Genentech and Cetus, were all started to make pharmaceuticals. 
New drugs for mankind. Noble, noble purpose. Unfortunately, drugs face all kinds of barriers. 
FDA testing alone takes five to eight years-if you're lucky. Even worse, there are forces at work in 
the marketplace. Suppose you make a miracle drug for cancer or heart disease-as Genentech 
did. Suppose you now want to charge a thousand dollars or two thousand dollars a dose. You 
might imagine that is your privilege. After all, you invented the drug, you paid to develop and test 
it; you should be able to charge whatever you wish. But do you really think that the government 
will let you do that? No, Henry, they will not. Sick people aren't going to pay a thousand dollars a 
dose for needed medication-they won't be grateful, they'll be outraged. Blue Cross isn't going to 
pay it. They'll scream highway robbery. So something will happen. Your patent application will be 
denied. Your permits will be delayed. Something will force you to see reason-and to sell your 
drug at a lower cost. From a business standpoint, that makes helping mankind a very risky 
business. Personally, | would never help mankind." 

Wu had heard the argument before. And he knew Hammond was right, some new 
bioengineered pharmaceuticals had indeed suffered inexplicable delays and patent problems. 

"Now," Hammond said, "think how different it is when you're making entertainment, Nobody 
needs entertainment. That's not a matter for government intervention. If | charge five thousand 
dollars a day for my park, who is going to stop me? After all, nobody needs to come here. And, 
far from being highway robbery, a costly price tag actually increases the appeal of the park. A 
visit becomes a status symbol, and all Americans love that. So do the Japanese, and of course 
they have far more money." 

Hammond finished his ice cream, and Maria silently took the dish away. "She's not from here, 
you know," he said. "She's Haitian. Her mother is French. But in any case, Henry, you will recall 
that the original purpose behind pointing my company in this direction in the first place-was to 
have freedom from government intervention, anywhere in the world." 

"Speaking of the rest of the world .. ." 

Hammond smiled. "We have already leased a large tract in the Azores, for Jurassic Park 
Europe. And you know we long ago obtained an island near Guam, for Jurassic Park Japan. 
Construction on the next two Jurassic Parks will begin early next year. They will all be open 
within four years. At that time, direct revenues will exceed ten billion dollars a year, and 
merchandising, television, and ancillary rights should double that. | see no reason to bother with 
children's pets, which I'm told Lew Dodgson thinks we're planning to make." 

"Twenty billion dollars a year," Wu said softly, shaking his head. 

"That's speaking conservatively," Hammond said. He smiled. "There's no reason to speculate 
wildly. More ice cream, Henry?" 


"Did you find him?" Arnold snapped, when the guard walked into the control room. 
"No, Mr. Arnold." 
"Find him." 
"| don't think he's in the building, Mr. Arnold." 
"Then look in the lodge," Arnold said, "look in the maintenance building, look in the utility shed, 
look everywhere, but just find him." 
"The thing is . . ." The guard hesitated. "Mr. Nedry's the fat man, is that right?" 
"That's right," Arnold said. "He's fat. A fat slob." 
"Well, Jimmy down in the main lobby said he saw the fat man go into the garage." 
Muldoon spun around. "Into the garage? When?" 
"About ten, fifteen minutes ago." 
"Jesus," Muldoon said. 


The Jeep screeched to a stop. "Sorry," Harding said. 


In the headlamps, Ellie saw a herd of apatosaurs lumbering across the road. There were six 
animals, each the size of a house, and a baby as large as a full-grown horse. The apatosaurs 
moved in unhurried silence, never looking toward the Jeep and its glowing headlamps. At one 
point, the baby stopped to lap water from a puddle in the road, then moved on. 

A comparable herd of elephants would have been startled by the arrival of a car, would have 
trumpeted and circled to protect the baby. But these animals showed no fear. "Don't they see 
us?" she said. 

"Not exactly, no,” Harding said. "Of course, in a literal sense they do see us, but we don't really 
mean anything to them. We hardly ever take cars out at night, and so they have no experience of 
them. We are just a strange, smelly object in their environment. Representing no threat, and 
therefore no interest. I've occasionally been out at night, visiting a sick animal, and on my way 
back these fellows blocked the road for an hour or more. 

"What do you do?" 

Harding grinned. "Play a recorded tyrannosaur roar. That gets them moving. Not that they care 
much about tyrannosaurs. These apatosaurs are so big they don't really have any predators. 
They can break a tyrannosaur's neck with a swipe of their tail. And they know it. So does the 
tyrannosaur." 

"But they do see us. | mean, if we were to get out of the car..." 

Harding shrugged. "They probably wouldn't react. Dinosaurs have excellent visual acuity, but 
they have a basic amphibian visual system: it's attuned to movement. They don't see unmoving 
things well at all." 

The animals moved on, their skin glistening in the rain. Harding put the car in gear. "| think we 
can continue now," he said. 


Wu said, "| suspect you may find there are pressures on your park, just as there are pressures on 
Genentech's drugs." He and Hammond had moved to the living room, and they were now 
watching the storm lash the big glass windows. 

"I can't see how," Hammond said. 

"The scientists may wish to constrain you. Even to stop you. 

"Well, they can't do that, " Hammond said. He shook his finger at Wu. "You know why the 
scientists would try to do that? It's because they want to do research, of course. That's all they 
ever want to do, is research. Not to accomplish anything. Not to make any progress. Just do 
research. Well, they have a surprise coming to them." 

"| wasn't thinking of that," Wu said. 

Hammond sighed. "I'm sure it would be interesting for the scientists, to do research. But you 
arrive at the point where these animals are simply too expensive to be used for research. This is 
wonderful technology, Henry, but it's also frightfully expensive technology. The fact is, it can only 
be supported as entertainment." Hammond shrugged. "That's just the way it is." 

"But if there are attempts to close down-" 

"Face the damn facts, Henry," Hammond said irritably. "This isn't America. This isn't even 
Costa Rica. This is my island. | own it. And nothing is going to stop me from opening Jurassic 
Park to all the children of the world." He chuckled. "Or, at least, to the rich ones. And | tell you, 
they'll love it." 


In the back seat of the Jeep, Ellie Sattler stared out the window. They had been driving through 
rain-drenched jungle for the last twenty minutes, and had seen nothing since the apatosaurs 
crossed the road. 

"We're near the jungle river now," Harding said, as he drove. "It's off there somewhere to our 
left." 

Abruptly he slammed on the brakes again, The car skidded to a stop in front of a flock of small 
green animals. "Well, you're getting quite a show tonight," he said. "Those are compys." 

Procompsognathids, Ellie thought, wishing that Grant were here to see them. This was the 
animal they had seen in the fax, back in Montana. The little dark green procompsognathids 
scurried to the other side of the road, then squatted on their hind legs to look at the car, 
chattering briefly, before hurrying onward into the night. 


"Odd," Harding said. "Wonder where they're off to? Compys don't usually move at night, you 
know. They climb up in a tree and wait for daylight." 

“Then why are they out now?" Ellie said. 

"| can't imagine. You know compys are scavengers, like buzzards. They're attracted to a dying 
animal, and they have tremendously sensitive smell. They can smell a dying animal for miles." 

"Then they're going to a dying animal?" 

"Dying, or already dead." 

"Should we follow them?" Ellie said. 

"I'd be curious," Harding said. "Yes, why not? Let's go see where they're going. He 

turned the car around, and headed back toward the compys. 
